<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89821-0020 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-21-89.f2.A1019</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54 No. 160 / Monday, August 21, 1989 /Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">SMALL BUSINESS ADMINISTRATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">13 CFR Part 124</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>agency:</T2> Small Business Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>action:</T2> Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>summary:</T2> The Small Business Administration (SBA) hereby amendsits regulations governing the Minority Small Business and Capital OwnershipDevelopment Program authorized by sections 7(j)(10) and 8(a) of the SmallBusiness Act (15 U.S.C. 636(j)(10), 637(a)). In most instances the revisionsimplement changes required by the Business Opportunity Development ReformAct of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-656), enacted November 15, 1988 and the BusinessOpportunity Development Reform Act Technical Corrections Act (Pub. L. 101-37),enacted June 15, 1989. Some provisions, however, incorporate into the regulationsexisting Agency policy while others implement policy changes.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>effective dates:</T2> Except for andSection;andSection; 124.311 and 124.312,this regulation is effective on August 21, 1989. Sections 124.311 and 124.312are effective on October 1, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>for further information contact:</T2> Associate Administrator for MinoritySmall Business and Capital Ownership Development, (202) 653-6407, JaneP. Butler, (202) 653-6813, or Rodney A. Lewis, (202) 653-6549.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>supplementary information: </T2>On March 23, 1989, SBA published aproposed rule in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> (54 FR 12054) which revised the Minority SmallBusiness and Capital Ownership Development Program (8(a) Program) and implementedthe Business Opportunity Development Reform Act of 1988 (Reform Act) (Pub.L. 100-656, enacted November 15, 1988). In preparing the proposed rule,SBA held two public meetings in December 1988 to receive public commenton the nature and extent of the regulations needed to implement the ReformAct. The first was held in San Francisco, California on December 9, 1988and was attended by approximately 75 members of the public. The secondwas held in Washington, DC, on December 19, 1988, and was attended by approximately325 members of the public. All comments received at the hearings were consideredin the preparation of the proposed rule.Since, at the time of publication of the proposed rule, the Reform Actrequired SBA to publish final implementing regulations by June 15, 1989,SBA was able to provide a 30 day public comment period on the proposedregulations. The required implementation date for the final rule was subsequentlyextended to August 15, 1989 by Public Law 101-37, which was enacted June15, 1989. During the public comment period, SBA received approximately330 comment letters. SBA has analyzed these comments and has made changesto the rules where appropriate. A summary of the key issues raised by thepublic comments and the action SBA took with respect to the comment followsthe general overview portion of this preamble.<ITAG tagnum="84">General Overview</ITAG>The numbering scheme of these regulations is generally similar to thatused in SBA's previous 8(a) program regulations, published October 8, 1986(51 FR 36132, <T3>et seq.</T3>). Some sections, however, have been renumbered or combinedwith other sections to accommodate new provisions required by the ReformAct. Sections 124.1 through 124.7 address issues which pertain to the programin general. Section 124.100 sets forth definitions of key terms used inthe regulations. Some of these definitions are identicial to those previouslyincluded in SBA's existing regulations. Others have been added or amendedin this final rule in response to public comment.Sections 124.101 through 124.113 address matters relating to program eligibilityrequirements both for admission to the 8(a) program and for continued participationin the 8(a) program. Sections 124.201 through 124.205 set forth informationconcerning the application process. Sections 124.206 through 124.211 setforth procedures relating to the Agency review of applications, programgraduations, program terminations and suspensions as well as proceduresrelating to administrative appeal rights which the Reform Act affords programapplicants and participants.Sections 124.300 through 124.320 address requirements relating to businessdevelopment and contracting. Sections 124.401 through 124.403 relate tospecial methods of contract financing: advance payments and business developmentexpense. In this final rule, SBA has renumbered, but has not amended, formerandSection;andSection; 124.501 and 124.502, concerning the Development AssistanceProgram authorized by the Minority Small Business and Capital OwnershipDevelopment Program as andSection;andSection; 124.404 and 124.405. Section124.501, proposed as andSection; 124.601, sets forth miscellaneous reportingrequirements for current and former 8(a) Program Participants. It has beenrenumbered in this final rule to correct an inadvertent overlap with regulationspublished in subpart B of part 124, relating to protest and appeal proceduresfor small disadvantaged businesses.The Reform Act also contains provisions imposing new requirements relatingto standards of conduct for certain SBA employees who have 8(a) programresponsibilities and authorizing a loan program for 8(a) Program Participants.SBA is publishing separate rules amending parts 105 and 122 of this title,respectively, to implement these Reform Act requirements. In addition,in order to implement the adminsitrative hearing requirements of the ReformAct, SBA is promulgating separate conforming amendments to its administrativehearing procedures found in part 134 of this title which complement andSection;andSection;124.206 through 124.211 of this rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of Issues Raised by Public Comment </ITAG>Many commenters objected to the brevity of the 30 day comment period andrequested that SBA extend it. As noted previously, the statutorily mandatedpublication timetable for implementing rules made it impossible for SBAto do so. Some commenters objected to SBA's inclusion of certain provisions of theproposed regulation which were not required by the Reform Act. The commentersbelieved that SBA violated the Administrative Procedure Act (APA, 5 U.S.C.551, <T3>et seq.</T3>) by proposing regulatory provisions which were not specificallyauthorized or required by statute. This view, however, is not consistent with the requirements of the APA.In promulgating rules, the APA does not limit an agency to provisions specificallyrequired by statute. Under section 5(b)(6) of the Small Business Act (15U.S.C. 632(b)(6)), the Administrator of SBA has general rulemaking authorityto ``make such rules and regulations as he/she deems necessary to carryout the authority vested in him/her by or pursuant to this Act.'' Thisauthority permits SBA to fashion rules to operate its programs effectivelyand efficiently. It is for this purpose as well as to implement the specificrequirements of the Reform Act that SBA is promulgating these revisionsto the 8(a) program regulations. Section 124.1 describes the scope of these regulations. The rules applyto participants in the 8(a) program, as authorized by sections 7(j)(10)and 8(a) of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. 636(j)(10) and 637(a)). Certainsections of these rules relating to social and economic disadvantaged statusapply to other Federal programs for which social and economic disadvantagedstatus is a requirement of program eligibility. Such programs include,among others, the Defense Department's (DoD's) Small Disadvantaged Business(SDB) Set-aside and Bid Preference programs authorized by section 1207(a)of Pub. L. 99-661, and the section 8(d) Subcontracting Program, authorizedby section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. 637(d)). SBA receivedno public comments on this section. Concerns with applications in process on the effective date of andSection;124.107will be subject to Agency policy requirements regarding potential for successwhich were in effect on the date of application. They will not be requiredto meet the new provisions of andSection;124.107(a) regarding length of timein business. In addition, concerns with applications in process on theeffective date of andSection;124.109 will not be subject to the provisionsof section 109(b) which excludes franchises from 8(a) program participation.The regulations also provide that actions to graduate, terminate or suspendwhich were commenced by the issuance of an Order to Show Cause prior tothe effective date of andSection;andSection;124.206 through 124.211 will begoverned by the procedures in effect on the date the Order to Show Causewas issued. Sections 124.2 and 124.3 describe statutorily mandated changes to 8(a)program administration. Section 124.2 provides that the position of theAssociate Administrator for Minority Small Business and Capital OwnershipDevelopment (AA/MSBandamp;COD) is required to be a career civil service positionas opposed to a non-career appointive position. SBA received one publiccomment on this section which supported the idea of a career civil serviceposition for the AA/MSBandamp;COD and addressed selection criteria, whichare not appropriately addressed in these regulations. Section 124.3 providesinformation regarding the Division of Program Certification and Eligibility.No comments were received on this section. Section 124.4 describes the Commission on Minority Business Developmentwhich was authorized by section 505 of the Reform Act. The purpose of theCommission is to review all Federal programs designed to promote the developmentof minority owned businesses in order to ascertain whether the congressionallydescribed goals and purposes of such programs are being realized. SBA receiveda few comments on the Commission which expressed the view that the conclusionsof the Commission may be biased if SBA is a member and is responsible forselecting staff for the Commission. SBA believes that Agency participationis essential and that it can maintain its objectivity. In any case, thefinal rule makes no change to the provisions concerning the Commissionbecause the composition of the Commission is statutorily mandated and cannotbe altered by regulation. Section 124.5 repeats previous andSection;124.3 which describes the effectof an 8(a) program applicant's willful violation of any SBA's regulationsgoverning its other programs. SBA received no comments on this provision.Section 124.6 notifies 8(a) program applicants and participants of therange and severity of penalties which could result from making misrepresentationsor false statements in relation to the 8(a) program. A number of commentersobjected to the imposition of such penalties when representations are madebased on a good faith interpretation of the requirements, but are foundto be misrepresentation. Although SBA cannot alter the penalties whichare imposed by statute, in response to public comments, SBA has revisedthe proposed rule relating to social and economic disadvantage to makethe criteria to which a certification would relate more specific. SBA hasalso added the word ``intentional'' to andSection;124.6 to clarify that suchpenalties will only attach when a misrepresentation is intentional. One commenter asked if the penalties described in andSection;124.6 applyto misrepresentations of small disadvantaged business status made for purposesof DoD's Small Disadvantaged Business (SDB) Program or for other programsfor which social and economic disadvantage are requirements of eligibility.Section 124.6 implements section 405 of the Reform Act which, in an amendmentto section 16(d)(1)(D), specifically applies the penalties to situationswhere the misrepresentations have been made to obtain ``any prime or subcontractto be awarded as a result, or in furtherance, of any other provision ofFederal law that specifically references section 8(d) [of the Small BusinessAct] for a definition of program eligibility * * *'' Since DoD's SDB programrelies on section 8(d) of the Small Business Act for its definition ofsocial and economic disadvantage, the penalties set forth in andSection;124.6apply misrepresentations of that Small Disadvantaged Business status. Section 124.7 sets forth restrictions on fees for applicant and 8(a) participantrepresentatives. As proposed, this section prohibited any applicant concernor Program Participant from, among other things, paying any fee to suchrepresentatives which is contingent on program certification or on specific8(a) contract award(s). A number of commenters objected to the restrictionsas they relate to contingent fees for assistance in obtaining a contract.The commenters cited section 3.4 of the Federal Acquisition Regulations(48 CFR 3.4) (FAR) which permits some contingent fees for such assistancein limited circumstances. SBA has amended paragraph (b) of andSection;124.7to adopt the FAR provisions. SBA has retained without change the remainderof the section, which contains prohibitions against contingent fees forassistance in program admission and against fees which are based on a percentageof any contract awarded. SBA has amended andSection;124.100 to include a number of new and changeddefinitions for terms used throughout this title and has eliminated definitionswhich are no longer relevant or which are defined in the body of the regulations.For ease of amendment, the lettered paragraphs have been deleted from thesection and the terms appear alphabetically. The definition of ``Fixed Program Participation Term'' (``FPPT'') has beenchanged to clarify that an FPPT is the specific term of Program Participationnegotiated with a concern under the authority of the Small Business Act,as amended by Public Law 96-481, effective April 21, 1982.The definition of ``primary industry classification'' has been changedto conform to the definition of ``primary industry'' provided in SBA'sSize Regulations (part 121 of this title).SBA has also amended its definition of ``principal place of business.''This definition requires SBA to determine a concern's principal place ofbusiness based on two factors: The location of the concern's books andrecords, and the location at which the individual who manages the concern'sday-to-day operations spends the majority of his/her working hours. Incommenting on this definition, one commenter urged SBA to include a grandfatheringprovision in the definition. The commenter's view was that a concern whichhad participated in the 8(a) program for 3 years or more should not haveto change either its SBA Servicing Office or its principal place of businessto comply with the new definition. The commenter believed that to do sowould disrupt the working relationship of the concern in the SBA districtor region in which it is currently operating. SBA considered this commentand, in light of the 12 month grandfathering provision contained in andSection;124.101(b), SBA decided not to adopt the comment. The grandfathering provisioncontained in andSection; 124.101(b) applies to all requirements of this finalrule which have not been previously imposed by regulation. SBA believesthat a compliance period of one year from the effective date of these regulationsallows firms a reasonable amount of time to adjust to the new requirements.Another commenter urged that the definition of ``disadvantaged owner''be amended to include a reference to Indian tribes, since tribally-ownedconcerns are eligible to participate in the 8(a) program and the proposeddefinition was phrased only in terms of individuals, not tribal entities.SBA has adopted this comment and has amended the term ``disadvantaged owner''accordingly.Section 124.101 describes the process for determining 8(a) program eligibility.Except for concerns owned by Indian tribes, including Alaska Native Corporations,and Native Hawaiian Organizations, addressed by andSection;andSection; 124.112and 124.113, respectively, each applicant concern must meet the requirementsset forth in andSection;andSection; 124.102 through 124.109. Under 8(a) eligibilityprocedures, the AA/MSBandamp;COD will approve or decline each applicationin writing setting forth the basis of his or her determination. An applicantis entitled to appeal to SBA's Office of Hearings and Appeals (OHA) ifits application is declined based solely on a negative finding of one ormore of the following eligibility criteria: Social disadvantage, economicdisadvantage, ownership or control. Appeal procedures are set forth inandSection; 124.210 and part 134 of this title. The written decision of OHAis the final agency action on the matter.Under these regulations, Program Participants are required to continueto meet the eligibility criteria of andSection;andSection; 124.102 through124.109, except as provided in andSection; 124.111(a). Failure to maintain8(a) program eligibility is grounds for termination from the 8(a) program.Paragraph (c) of andSection; 124.101 describes grounds for which SBA wouldreview the eligibility of any applicant concern or Program Participant.One commenter expressed the view that due process rights, including a hearingbefore OHA, should be afforded an individual or concern about whom informationhas been submitted which leads SBA to reexamine the concern's program eligibility.SBA considered the comment but did not adopt it. Due process rights, includinghearings, are already provided for terminations, graduations and suspensions.(<T3>See</T3> andSection;andSection; 124.206 through 124.211.) If SBA takesno action, there is no need to afford the concern a hearing.Section 124.102 discusses the requirement that 8(a) applicant concernsand Program Participants qualify as small businesses under andSection; 121.4of title 13, Code of Federal Regulations. Paragraphs (a), (c), and (d)restate the requirements of existing paragraphs (a) and (b) of andSection;124.102 and have been reorganized as proposed paragraphs (a), (c), and(d) for greater clarity. Paragraph (d) also references an exemption fromthe size requirement authorized by Public Law 100-656 and set forth inproposed andSection; 124.321 for contracts awarded to joint ventures controlledby eligible Indian tribes.Paragraph (b) of andSection; 124.102, as proposed, authorized the Divisionof Program Certification and Eligibility (Division) to deny an applicationor to request a formal size determination when it is unable to determinethat an applicant qualifies as a small business. In response to a publiccomment, this paragraph has been amended to replace all references to theDivision with references to the AA/MSBandamp;COD. The commenter correctlynoted that only the AA/MSBandamp;COD has the authority to deny an applicationeven if the denial is for failure to meet size requirements.In response to a public comment, paragraph (a) has been amended to clarifythat concerns owned by Indian tribes, which are not joint ventures, arerequired to certify as small businesses in compliance with andSection; 124.112.Paragraph (d) has also been reworded slightly to make clear that in theevent that SBA does not accept a concern's size certification, the concernmay pursue review of its size status through the formal size determinationprocess. As worded in the proposed rule, the language could have been interpretedto permit only an appeal to OHA and not an initial review at SBA's regionaloffice. In addition, another commenter asked SBA to define the time atwhich a Participant would be required to certify size. SBA made no changesto this rule as a result of the comment because part 121 of this titlealready addresses this question. In accordance with SBA's size rules, aParticipant is required to certify to its small business status at thetime of submission of its initial offer which includes price. Changes insize subsequent to that certification will not affect the Participant'seligibility for that contract, unless the change is caused by acquisitionof the firm.Section 124.103 addresses ownership requirements for 8(a) program entryand for continued 8(a) program eligibility. Any ownership interest in an8(a) concern which is held by a disadvantaged individual upon whom eligibilityis based must be unconditionally held. This requirement was mandated bythe Reform Act Technical Amendments, Public Law 101-37, which was enactedon June 15, 1989 subsequent to the publication date of the proposed rule.In order to conform the regulations to the new statutory requirement, SBAhas amended paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) to specify that unconditional ownershipis required.A number of commenters objected to a proposed provision requiring an owner(s)upon whom 8(a) eligibility is based to have been a 51 percent owner(s)for at least two years prior to applying for 8(a) certification. This restrictionwas viewed as overly burdensome. SBA has adopted this comment and has deletedthe two year ownership rule from the prefatory language of andSection; 124.103.A few commenters objected to proposed paragraph (b) which required disadvantagedindividuals to hold 51 percent of the combined total of all classes ofstock. The commenters expressed the view that this would overly restrictthe 8(a) concern's access to capital through preferred stock offerings,etc. The commenters recommended that SBA return to its former regulationwhich only required that such individuals hold 51 percent of voting stock.The proposed requirement resulted from a General Counsel's opinion whichfound that such ownership was necessary to meet the 51 percent ownershiprequirement of section 8(a) of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. 637(a)).While disadvantaged ownership of 51 percent of the voting stock would satisfythe control requirement, it would not satisfy the separate requirementof 51 percent disadvantaged ownership. Therefore, the requirement of 51percent ownership of the aggregate of all classes of stock remains unchangedin this final rule.One commenter noted that SBA's treatment of options held by Small BusinessInvestment Companies (SBICs) and Minority Enterprise Small Business InvestmentCompanies (MESBICs) should be included in andSection; 124.103, which addressesownership of 8(a) concerns, and not, as proposed in andSection; 124.317,which relates to performance of contracts by the original 8(a) concernawardee. SBA has adopted this comment and added the paragraph to andSection;124.103(d).A number of commenters found the restrictions on ownership to be too severeand expressed the view that they would overly limit the ability of a smalland disadvantaged firm to secure necessary long-term financing. SBA consideredthis comment and has amended paragraphs (f), (g), (h), and (i) of andSection;124.103 so that the restrictions do not apply to ownership interests ofless than 10 percent. In addition, equity interests held by SBICs, includingMESBICs, or other financial institutions which are licensed by Federal,State or local government are not restricted under paragraph (g). SBA hasalso added the word ``equity'' before ownership interest in paragraphs(f), (g), and (h) to clarify that the restrictions apply to stock ownershipor equity in a concern, but do not prohibit other concerns or individuals,whether or not disadvantaged, from making loans to 8(a) concerns. Whilesuch loans are generally encouraged, there may be instances where theywould not be permitted during a concern's 8(a) program participation. Forexample, for purposes of size eligibility, SBA may still find affiliationbetween the lender and the 8(a) concern. In addition, certain loan arrangementscould result in negative control of an 8(a) concern and would be prohibitedfor that reason under andSection; 124.104(d)(5).Paragraph (i) of andSection; 124.103 addresses changes in 8(a) ownership.Where such changes result from the death or incapacity of an individualupon whom eligibility is based, SBA will not require prior approval ofthe change of ownership. For changes of ownership resulting from such circumstances,SBA will allow the concern reasonable period of time to replace the disadvantagedindividual. However, any changes of ownership must be approved by SBA.Proposed paragraph (j) contained exceptions to the restrictions containedin paragraphs (g), (h), and (i) for ownership interests of less than 5percent. It also set forth procedures for obtaining approval of a publicoffering. To the extent that exceptions will be permitted to the ownershiprestrictions, they are set forth separately in individual paragraphs. Therefore,they have been deleted from paragraph (j). The remainder of proposed paragraph(j) is adopted without change.Section 124.104 addresses requirements of, and restrictions on, the controland management of 8(a) Program applicants and participants. SBA has reorderedthe paragraphs to state first, in paragraphs (a) and (b) (proposed paragraph(c) and (d)), the control and management requirements. Paragraphs (c) and(d) (proposed paragraphs (a) and (b)) set forth the restrictions on controland management of an 8(a) concern by nondisadvantaged individuals, theirspouses or immediate family members. This final rule permits any such individualto be an officer, director, or up to a 10 percent owner, stockholder, orpartner of another concern in the same or similar line of business andmay hold individually up to a 10 percent interest in one or more other8(a) concerns. This represents a change from the proposed rule which exemptedfrom the restrictions nondisadvantaged owners, stockholders and partnerswith up to 5 percent ownership interests.In addition, this final rule does not restrict MESBICs, SBICs and otherfinancial institutions which are licensed by Federal, state or local governmentto holding 10 percent interests. However, by statute, no nondisadvantagedindividual or entity is permitted to hold more than 49 percent of any 8(a)concern.One commenter urged SBA to permit MESBICs to acquire temporary controlin instances where it is necessary to protect the MESBICs' investments.SBA rejected this suggestion because it conflicts with the statutory requirementthat the disadvantaged individual(s) control the 8(a) concern.A number of commenters objected to the prefatory language of andSection;124.104 which required the disadvantaged individual(s) who control the8(a) applicant or participant to have managerial and technical experienceand competency directly related to the primary industry of the concern.The commenters expressed the view that good managers do not need to personallypossess all the technical experience and competency to operate a successfulbusiness. SBA has considered this comment and has amended the rule to requirethat the disadvantaged individual(s) possess either managerial or technicalexperience and competency.Several commenters opposed SBA's proposed paragraph (e) which requireddisadvantaged individuals to control the Board of Directors either in actualnumbers or through weighted voting. The commenters' believed that suchrestriction would prevent an 8(a) concern from assembling a varied andexperienced Board of Directors. This requirement was included to complywith the statutory requirement of control by disadvantaged individuals.However, SBA has amended paragraph (e) to make clear that non-voting orhonorary Board members are permitted.Paragraph (c)(3) of andSection; 124.104 has been amended to clarify thatexcessive compensation of any nondisadvantaged individual, spouse or immediatefamily member in any form, including stock dividends, is prohibited. Inaddition, compensation will be deemed excessive if it exceeds the compensationto be received by any of the individuals who control and manage the day-to-dayoperations of the 8(a) concern. As proposed, andSection; 124.104 prohibitednondisadvantaged former employers of the disadvantaged owner(s) from participatingin an 8(a) concern as partners, stockholders, officers or directors. Severalcommenters objected to this restriction as overly broad. The final rulehas been amended in paragraph (c)(4) to permit such participation by formeremployers if the relationship is in the best interests of the concern andif the former employer does not have actual control of, or the power to,control the 8(a) applicant or participant.Finally, andSection; 124.104(a) has been amended to require, for those industrieswhich require professional licensing (i.e., public accountancy, professionalengineering, etc.), that either the applicant concern or one or more individualsemployed by the applicant concern hold the requisite license. This representsa relaxation from the proposed rule which required the individual uponwhom 8(a) eligibility is based to hold the requisite license. SBA proposedthe more restrictive requirement as a means to guard against nondisadvantagedindividuals controlling an 8(a) concern. Upon reconsideration, SBA concludedthat the other requirements of andSection; 124.104 relating to control ofan 8(a) concern are adequate to guard against a nondisadvantaged individualcontrolling the firm by virtue of holding a professional license. SBA hasamended the rule accordingly.Section 124.105 addresses the regulatory requirements of social disadvantage.In the proposed regulation SBA made only three substantive amendments tothe existing andSection; 124.105. First, it proposed to specifically statethat social disadvantage would be ``presumed'' for members of certain namedgroups. In addition, it proposed to include in the regulations a definitionof ``Subcontinent Asian Americans.'' Finally, it proposed to amend theexisting regulatory definition of ``Asian Pacific Americans'' and the existingpolicy definition of ``Subcontinent Asian Americans'' to include individualswith origins in countries which has not previously been included. SBA specificallyrequested comments on the proposed definitional charges.SBA received approximately ten comments on the proposed changes to thissection. Of these, approximately seven commented that the proposed changesshould not be adopted because the SBA had failed to provide any justificationfor the changes, and because adding additional groups would serve to dilutethe program. Three commenters concurred with the broadening of the definitions,and one of these also provided a detailed explanation of the geographicalboundaries of the Subcontinent Asian and Asian Pacific areas. This commenternoted that SBA had omitted from its definition of ``Asian Pacific American,''individuals with origins from Hong Kong, and Macao; and from its definitionof ``Subcontinent Asian Americans,'' individuals from Sikkim and the MaldivesIslands. SBA has adopted the additional locations suggested with the exceptionfo Sikkim. Sikkim has not been included since it is a state within India,and individuals with origins from India are already included among thosepresumed to be socially disadvantaged. In addition, SBA has also notedthat it inadvertently omitted Fiji, Kiribati, Tuvalu, Nauru, Indonesiaand Tonga from its listing of countries whose people are regarded as AsianPacific American.SBA has concluded that since it was the agency that had previously definedthe two groups, either in regulations or policy documents, it is appropriatethat these definitions be amended to include other countries of originwhose people share similar culture, heritage and physical characteristicswith people from those countries that were previously included. The finalrules will therefore adopt the definitions of ``Asian Pacific American''and ``Subcontinent Asian American'' as proposed with the inclusion of theadditional listed locations.One commenter noted that SBA had failed to clearly indicate that tribalentities are regarded as socially disadvantaged. The final regulationshave also been amended to reflect that comment.In andSection; 124.106 SBA proposed to establish criteria for determiningeconomic disadvantage for purposes of 8(a) program entry and for participationin other programs which require SBA to determine social and economic disadvantageas a condition of eligibility.SBA received many comments on this section. A number of the commentersrecommended that objective criteria be established for measuring economicdisadvantage. In addition, some commenters recommended that separate criteriabe established for 8(a) program entry, continuing 8(a) program participationand participation in other Federal programs which require SBA to determinesocial and economic disadvantage as a condition of program eligibility.Comments on both this section and andSection; 124.6 indicated that it wouldbe unfair to enforce civil and criminal penalties for misrepresentationsof economic disadvantage without clearly defining the criteria for determiningsuch disadvantage.In response to these comments, SBA has significantly revised andSection;124.106. Section 124.106(a) now provides that an individual with a networth of less than $250,000 will be regarded as economically disadvantagedfor purposes of 8(a) program entry. Section 102.106(b) now provides thatan individual with a net worth of less than $750,000 will be regarded aseconomically disadvantaged for purposes of participation in programs, otherthan 8(a), which require SBA to determine social and economic disadvantageas a condition of eligibility.After discussions with the Congressional Small Business Committees, the$250,000 threshold figure was selected as an appropriate ceiling for determinationsof economic disadvantage for purposes of 8(a) program entry. The $750,000threshold for determining economic disadvantage for purposes of participationin other Federal programs was selected to provide for a concern's businessdevelopment. In both cases, the individual's net worth will be computedexcluding the equity in his or her personal residence and his or her ownershipinterest in the applicant or Participant business concern. SBA has alsoamended andSection; 124.111 to provide threshold figures for determiningcontinuing economic disadvantage for 8(a) Program Participants.SBA received a number of comments objecting to the proposed requirementthat the net worth of an individual claiming economic disadvantage includethe assets and liabilities of the individual and his or her spouse, ifmarried. In response to these comments, SBA has amended the section toinclude new paragraphs (a)(2)(i)(A)(<T3>1</T3>) and (a)(2)(i)(A)(<T3>2</T3>).The cited paragraphs now provide that, for purposes of program entry only,SBA will require separate financial statements from an individual claimingdisadvantaged status and from his or her spouse, if any. However, the financialcondition of the spouse will not be considered except to the extent thata non-applicant spouse has received assets from the applicant spouse withintwo years of the date of program application. Any assets transferred withintwo years will be presumed to be the property of the applicant spouse forpurposes of determining that individual's personal net worth unless thecouple is subject to a legal separation. In addition, SBA will not requirefinancial statements from the non-applicant spouse if the couple is subjectto a legal separation. SBA has also amended this section to indicate thespecial requirements governing the disclosure of assets and liabilitiesin community property states. These provisions are not applicable to concerns where both spouses areindividuals upon whom eligibility is based. In those cases, SBA will considerthe net worth of each spouse individually for purposes of both programentry and for continued participation in the 8(a) program. SBA has also amended paragraph (a)(2)(ii) to simplify the business financialcondition criterion. SBA will continue to evaluate a concern's financialcondition based on a comparison of its condition to other concerns in thesame industry. However, SBA has amended the list of factors which it willgenerally consider in determining a concern's financial condition to add``working capital,'' and to delete ``return on assets,'' ``return on sales,''``ratio of current assets to current liability (current ratio),'' ``ratioof the concern's sales to the compensation of its officers,'' ``ratio ofthe concern's sales to its working capital,'' and ``ratio of the concern'sdebt to its net worth.''Finally, SBA has amended paragraph (a)(2)(i)(C) to reflect that SBA willonly evaluate the personal economic disadvantage of an Alaska Native whois claiming disadvantaged status for the purpose of qualifying an individuallyowned concern. In accordance with the provisions of the Alaska Native ClaimsSettlement Act, as amended, concerns which are majority owned by AlaskaNative Corporations are also determined to be controlled by disadvantagedAlaska Natives. Therefore, SBA will not examine the economic disadvantageof an individual manager, officer or director of such a concern. Section 124.107 sets forth criteria for determining whether an applicantconcern has potential for success in the 8(a) program. SBA has amendedandSection;124.107 to incorporate existing progam policy regarding determinationsof potential for success, and has included an absolute requirement thatan applicant concern demonstrate that it has been in business for two yearsprior to the date of its 8(a) program application. In addition, SBA hasprovided language to implement section 7(j)(11) of the Small Business Act,as amended by Public Law 100-656, which authorized SBA to deny programadmission on the basis of lack of contract support only if the Governmentdoes not procure the types of products or if the purchase of such productsor services is not in sufficient quantities to support the applicant concern's8(a) program business development.A number of comments objected to the ``two year rule,'' and a few foundthe exemptions to the rule to be too narrow. Another commenter noted thatthe former 8(a) Program rules permitted too many exceptions to 8(a) programeligibility requirements, and recommended that the requirements of theprogram be less discretionary. It is SBA's conclusion that the businessdevelopment goals of the program necessitate a determination of reasonablepotential for success as one criterion of 8(a) program eligibility. SBA'sexperience has led it to conclude that a concern's potential for successcan generally be assumed if the concern has been in business for two years,has a demonstrated track record and is financially sound. Therefore, SBAhas deleted the provisions permitting exceptions to the two year in businessrequirement. This change is further supported by the fact that a concern'sProgram Term now begins on the date of its Program certification ratherthan on the date of award of the concern's first 8(a) contract. Therefore,firms which have been in business for at at least two years will have maximumopportunity for business development. SBA has also deleted paragraph (d) from this section. Proposed paragraph(d) would have permitted SBA to decline to process applications if theagency lacked the resources in a particular district or region to servethe 8(a) concern. While this would have only been invoked in extraordinarycircumstances, SBA has decided, that should the need arise, it will relyon the increase in, or realignment of, Agency resources to correct forany lack of resources in a particular district or regional office ratherthan suspend processing of applications.Section 124.108 sets forth additional 8(a) program eligibility requirements.Paragraph (c) of this section implements the provisions of section 7(j)(11)of the Small Business Act, as amended by Public Law 100-656, by permittingan individual or a business concern to use his/her or its eligibility onlyone time to qualify a concern for 8(a) program participation. An individualor concern is deemed to have used his/her or its eligibility effectiveupon the date of the concern's approval for program participation. In thisfinal rule SBA has clarified this restriction does not apply to concernsowned by Indian tribes or Alaska Native Corporations. The provisions relatingto such concerns and their managers are set forth in andSection;124.112.This separate rule for tribally-owned concerns conforms to section 8(a)(4)(B)of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. 636(a)(4)(B)) which requires thatsuch managers be members of the tribe, but does not require that they besocially and economically disadvantaged. Similarly, the rule regardingconcerns owned by Alsaka Native Corporations (ANCs) conforms to the AlaskaNative Claims Settlement Act, as amended. That Act mandates that for purposesof participation in federal programs, a concern which is majority ownedby an ANC shall be deemed and controlled by the ANC.In addition, SBA received a comment relating to this paragraph which objectedto the imposition of a limitation on reapplication of a disadvantaged individualwho had previously used his or her eligibility to qualify an 8(a) Participant.The commenter stated that very good reasons may exist for an individualto leave participant concern, for example, to assume an appointed position.SBA has made no change to the rule as a result of this comment becausethe limitation is statutorily mandated.Section 124.109 describes types of businesses which are ineligible forthe 8(a) program. SBA received a comment opposing paragraph (a) which makespackagers ineligible for 8(a) program participation. The commenter expressedthat a packager would normally have more invested in its business thana dealer, which is permitted 8(a) participation. Therefore, a packagershould also be eligible. SBA considered this comment but has not alteredthe regulation because packagers do not meet Walsh-Healey standards andare therefore ineligible to receive Federal contracts. Since the firmscannot receive Federal contracts, they have no prospects for business developmentthrough the 8(a) program. SBA also received a few comments opposing paragraph (b) of andSection;124.109which makes franchises ineligible for 8(a) program participation. The commentersexpressed the view that all businesses are subject to some degree of controlby external forces and that franchise agreements are not predicated onabusive control. SBA considered this comment but has decided to retainthe prohibition because of concern that the franchisor-franchisee arrangement,by its nature, gives the franchisor more control over the management, dailybusiness operations and business development of the franchisee than isappropriate in light of the business development goals of the 8(a) programand the statutory requirement of control by disadvantaged individuals.Section 124.109(e) prohibits an 8(a) applicant or Program Participant fromestablishing its disadvantaged status by virtue of ownership by anotherdisadvantaged concern. One commenter questioned whether this restrictionapplies to DoD's Small Disadvantaged Business (SDB) program or SBA's 8(d)Subcontracting program. Because the provision is rooted in the Small BusinessAct requirement of 51 percent ownership by disadvantaged individuals, andboth the SDB program and 8(d) program use the 8(a) program definitionsof social and economic disadvantage, this requirement applies also to theSDB program and the 8(d) program. The regulation has been amended accordingly.In contrast to some other ownership requirements set forth in andSection;124.103,becasue this requirement is required by statute, SBA has provided no exceptions.Section 124.110 reflects the Program Term mandated by section 7(j) of theSmall Business Act, as amended by Public Law 100-656. SBA received somecomments which supported the fixed nine year term and one which opposedit. Since the term is set by statute, SBA has no authority to change itin these regulations.SBA proposed to add to the regulations a new andSection;124.111 to implementsection 8(a) of the Small Business Act, as amended by Public Law 100-656,which requires each Program Participant to make certain annual submissionsto SBA. The statute also requires SBA to examine each Participant on thebasis of these annual submissions, or on information received from othersources, to determine whether the Participant and its disadvantaged ownerscontinue to meet all 8(a) program eligibility standards, including thestandards established for determining economic disadvantage.SBA received many comments pertaining to andSection;124.111. Most commentersobjected to the vagueness of the standards for continued program eligibilityand urged SBA to make them more specific. In the commenters' view, it wouldbe unfair to require an individual to certify to his or her economic disadvantagewithout defining clearly the term. It would be particularly unfair in lightof the penalties to be imposed for false representation as set forth inandSection;124.6.In response to these comments, SBA has added two new threshold personalnet worth figures for determining continuing economic disadvantage forindividuals claiming disadvantaged status for 8(a) program participation.For firms in the developmental stage (years 1-4) of program participation,an individual whose personal net worth exceeds $500,000 will not be consideredeconomically disadvantaged. For firms in the transitional stage (years5-9) of program participation, an individual whose personal net worth exceeds$750,000 will not be considered economically disadvantaged. To allow forthe Participant's business development SBA has established three progressivelyhigher thresholds for determining economic disadvantage throughout itsProgram Term: $250,000 for program entry and $500,000 and $750,000 as notedabove for continuing eligibility. For determining continuing economic disadvantage,personal net worth will be calculated in accordance with the provisionsof andSection;124.106(a)(2).Some comments objected to SBA's requirement that it examine a concern'scontinued eligibility for 8(a) Program Participation both on an annualbasis and whenever it receives information from any source that causesSBA to believe the Program Participant is no longer economically disadvantagedor no longer meets any of the other eligibility criteria for 8(a) programparticipation. These commenters recommended that SBA conduct reviews ofcontinued eligibility only once annually, and that the findings of suchreviews be conclusive evidence of eligibility for the next year. The SmallBusiness Act, as amended by Public Law 100-656, states that SBA ``shallconduct an evaluation of a Program Participant's eligibility for continuedparticipation in the Program whenever it received specific and credibleinformation alleging that such Program Participant no longer meets therequirements of Program eligibility.'' Because of this mandate, SBA hasnot adopted the suggested change.In andSection;124.112, SBA proposed to address 8(a) program eligibility requirementsfor concerns owned by Indian Tribes, including Alaska Native Corporations(ANCs). SBA received a number of substantive comments on this proposedsection from representatives of Indian Tribes and Alaska Native Corporations.In response to these comments SBA has made several amendments to andSection;124.112.Paragraph (a)(3)(iv) has been amended to reflect the special status accordedto ANCs by the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, as amended. In accordancewith that statute, ANCs are not required to provide the documentation requiredof other tribally-owned entities by paragraphs (b)(3) (i) and (ii). Neitherare ANCs subject to the provisions of paragraph (c)(1).SBA received several comments suggesting that the Agency presume economicdisadvantage for tribally owned concerns. SBA could not adopt these commentsbecause the Small Business Act, as amended by Public Law 99-272, expresslyrequires SBA to examine the economic disadvantage of a tribal owner ofan 8(a) applicant concern. In the proposed regulations, SBA did providethat once a tribe has established its economic disadvantage for purposesof qualifying a concern for 8(a) program participation, it would not needto reestablish such status to qualify other concerns, unless specificallyasked to do so. SBA has retained this provision in its final regulations.SBA has deleted paragraph (b)(2)(viii) of this section since directors,managers, and officers of tribally-owned concerns, including those ownedby ANCs are not required to establish individual economic disadvantage.(<T3>See </T3>andSection;124.112 (c) and (d).)SBA also received several comments on paragraph (c)(1) which requires thata tribally-owned concern be a legal business entity organized for profitand susceptible to suit. In response to these comments, SBA has amendedthis paragraph to more clearly indicate that SBA's requirement is thatthe Articles of Incorporation of a tribally-owned concern contain languagethat expressly waives sovereign immunity, or allows suit only for thosematters related to SBA's programs, including, but not limited to 8(a) programparticipation, SBA direct or guaranty loans, advance payments and contractperformance. Section 124.112(c)(3) has been amended to correct a typographical error.The corrected language now reads: ``For corporate entities, a tribe mustown at least 51 percent of the voting stock * * *'' This provision mirrorsthe intent of Congress that disadvantaged concerns be 51% owned by disadvantagedindividuals or tribes, or for those owned by Alaska Native Corporations,majority owned by the ANC. For the sake of administrative ease, SBA hasinterpreted ``majority'' ownership to mean 51%.SBA received several comments regarding its proposed requirement that atribal member who is a manager, officer or director of a tribally-ownedconcern use his or her personal status as disadvantaged in order to qualifythe concern for Program Participation. In response to these comments SBAre-examined both the Small Business Act, as amended by Public Law 99-272,and the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, as amended. SBA has concludedthat the statutory requirements of disadvantaged management and controlare met for a tribally-owned concern if such concern is controlled by oneor more members of an economically disadvantaged Indian Tribe. SBA hasalso concluded that the disadvantaged management and control requirementsare met for concerns owned by Alaska Native Corporations if the majorityof such concern is owned by an ANC. Therefore, for both tribally-ownedand ANC-owned concerns, the individual managers, directors and officersare not required to establish individual social and economic disadvantagein order to qualify the concerns for 8(a) Program Participation. They arenot, therefore, precluded from subsequently qualifying an individuallyowned concern for 8(a) Program Participation. Sections 124.112(c)(4)(i)and 124.112(d) have been amended to reflect these changes.One commenter suggested that SBA allow tribally-owned concerns to be managedby individuals who are not members of the tribe which owns the 8(a) applicantor participant concern. Other commenters have recommended that SBA allowmanagement of a tribally-owned concern to come from a mix of tribal members,Indians who are members of other tribes, and non-Indians. SBA has not adoptedthese comments because they are contrary to SBA's interpretation of therequirements of the Small Business Act, as amended by Public Law 99-272,which requires that tribally owned concerns, except those owned by ANCs,be managed by members of the economically disadvantaged Indian Tribe whichowns the company.Several comments indicated that ANC's should not be required to form separatecorporate entities. SBA has considered these comments, but has not adoptedthem. It is SBA's conclusion that the administrative requirements of 8(a)program participation require that each ANC-owned concern be a separateentity.SBA did not adopt comments indicating that the Agency should not requirea tribally-owned Participant to receive prior approval in order to includeTribal Council members on its Board of Directors. This was not adoptedbecause SBA has determined that it needs to be aware of any interrelationshipsbetween the tribe and the concern(s) which it owns. However, it is notanticipated that SBA will generally refuse to allow Tribal Council membersto serve as directors of tribally-owned 8(a) concerns, unless such dualroles will cause findings of affiliation due to common management, or willotherwise detract from the business development goals of the 8(a) program.Comments were also received on andSection; 124.112(c)(2) (ii) and (iii) whichproposed that, except for joint ventures expressly authorized by the SmallBusiness Act, as amended by Public Law 100-656, a tribally-owned ProgramParticipant must qualify as a small business pursuant to andSection; 121.4(g)(2)of this Title for each individual 8(a) contract award. It was suggestedthat SBA amend this section to allow 8(a) program eligibility for a jointventure of which a tribally-owned concern is a partner.SBA has not adopted this recommendation. The Small Business Act, as amendedby Public Law 100-656, provided for only two exemptions to SBA's size requirementsspecifically for award of section 8(a) contracts to tribally-owned concerns.Nothing in either the Act or the Conference Report allows SBA to exemptfrom its size regulations joint ventures of which a tribally-owned concernis a party for purposes of program entry.In new andSection; 124.113, SBA proposed to implement section 8(a)(15) ofthe Small Business Act, as amended by Public Law 100-656. In this section,SBA proposed that concerns owned by disadvantaged Native Hawaiian Organizationswould be eligible for participation in the 8(a) program and other Federalprograms which require SBA to determine social and economic disadvantageas a condition of eligibility. No comments were received on this section.However, SBA has amended andSection; 124.113 to comport with the languageof the statute by adding the words ``economically disadvantaged'' to providethat concerns owned by economically disadvantaged Native Hawaiian Organizationsare eligible for participation in the 8(a) program and other cited programs.In andSection; 124.201, SBA proposed to provide general information regardingthe processing of 8(a) applications. Paragraph (a) of this section providedauthority to the AA/MSBandamp;COD to decline to process an 8(a) applicationif SBA lacked appropriate resources to serve an additional Program Participant.Although SBA received no comments on this section, it did receive a numberof comments on andSection; 124.107(d) which contained a similar provision.In response to those comments SBA has deleted paragraph (a) in its entirety,and has deleted the paragraph designation for paragraph (b) of this section.To conform with changes which have been made to andSection; 124.107(a) andandSection; 124.107(b) of this part regarding determinations of potentialfor success, SBA has amended proposed paragraph (b) of this section tostate that it is the Agency's policy that any concern or individual onbehalf of such concern has the right to apply for 8(a) program participationwhether or not there is an appearance of eligibility. It should be noted,however, that concerns which have not been in business of two full yearsas defined by SBA will not be approved for 8(a) program participation.Proposed andSection; 124.202 provided information regarding the place offiling an 8(a) application. SBA received no comments on this section. However,to accommodate changes which have been made in SBA's organizational structure,the section has been amended to indicate the applications for 8(a) programparticipation will be filed in the field office serving the territory wherethe concern's principal place of business is located. These offices, generallydistrict offices, except in SBA's Boston region, will also provide potentialapplicants with information regarding the program and with the requiredapplication forms. The section also states that applications for ProgramParticipation will be processed by the appropriate regional office of theDivision of Program Certification and Eligibility.Section 124.203 states that concerns approved for Program Participationwill be serviced in the field office serving the territory in which theconcern's principal place of business is located. No comments were receivedin this section, and no changes have been made to it.In andSection; 124.204, SBA proposed to provide information regarding theuse of representatives in connection with the 8(a) program applicationprocess. No comments were received on this section. However, SBA has amendedandSection; 124.204 to more clearly indicate that applicant representativesare subject to the prohibitions against contingency fees set forth in andSection;124.7 of this part.Proposed andSection; 124.205 provided general information regarding the formsand attachments required for making application to the 8(a) program. Nocomments were received on this section, and no changes have been made toit.Sections 124.206 through 124.211 implement section 8(a)(9) of the SmallBusiness Act, as amended by section 409 of the Reform Act. These sectionsdescribe the rights of an applicant concern or Program Participant to seekfurther Agency review of certain initial Agency decisions. The agency reviewmay include an administrative appeal to an Administrative Law Judge. TheReform Act authorizes an appeal of an initial Agency decision if such decisionrelates to program graduation, program termination, a denial of a requestfor a waiver of the restriction against the sale of an 8(a) concern pursuantto andSection; 124.317 or denial of program admission based solely on oneor more of the following eligibility criteria: social disadvantage, economicdisadvantage, ownership or control.SBA received very few comments on these sections. One commenter requestedthat SBA allow the Participant 180 days to respond to SBA's Notice of Intentto Graduate or Terminate (andSection;andSection; 124.208 and 124.209). SBAconsidered the comment but made no change to these sections, which, aswritten, allow two 45 day periods to respond to SBA's Notice of Intentto Graduate or Terminate. The Small Business Act requires SBA to provide8(a) program benefits only to such firms which meet the continuing programeligibility requirements. If a firm has met the objectives of its businessplan or ceases to meet the continued program eligibility requirements,it should be promptly graduated or terminated from the program. SBA believesthat the 45 day response periods are adequate to protect the rights ofthe concern while also adhering to the statutory mandate that 8(a) Participantsmeet all Program eligibility requirements.One commenter requested SBA to clarify that a graduated 8(a) concern isobligated to complete previously awarded 8(a) subcontracts, including priceoptions. SBA has included a reference to priced options in andSection; 124.108(d).One commenter urged SBA not to consider ligitimate temporary absences ofthe disadvantaged owner(s) as grounds for termination of the program. InandSection; 124.209, SBA is granted discretion to terminate a concern's ProgramParticipation for any of the listed causes. SBA is not required to do so.It is unlikely that SBA would base program termination on temporary incapacityof a disadvantaged principal due to illness or accident. Among other reasons,this is unlikely to occur because the time involved in terminating a concernfrom the program is likely to exceed the period of illness. Therefore,SBA has made no change to andSection; 124.209.Another Federal agency also commented on andSection; 124.209 and asked thatSBA notify the contracting agencies when termination or suspension procedureshave been initiated. SBA does not notify contracting agencies of proposedsuspensions or proposed terminations because to do so would deny the 8(a)concern the due process rights which the Small Business Act accords them.One commenter recommended that andSection; 124.210 relating to the appealsprocess permit the Agency to submit an affidavit to explain documentaryevidence. This would be used to supplement the written record. SBA hasconsidered this recommendation, but has not adopted it. The Reform Actmandated an arbitrary and capricious standard of review for 8(a) appeals,which in turn limits the evidence reviewed to that in the written record,unless a showing is made of bad faith or improper behavior on the partof the initial decisionmaker.One commenter suggested that SBA clarify andSection; 124.210(h)(3)(ii), whichstates that the burden of proof remains with the concern following theconcern's preliminary showing of the initial decisionmaker's bad faithor improper behavior. SBA has made no change to the regulations, but offersthe following explanation to clarify the intent of this provision. Undernormal circumstances, neither SBA nor the 8(a) concern may introduce evidencebeyond the written record in an 8(a) appeal. If, after the concern makesa preliminary showing of bad faith or improper behavior and the Agencyhas had an opportunity to rebut such showing, the Administrative Law Judgehearing the case will determine whether a substantial showing has beenmade. If so, the concern may engage in discovery and may introduce otherevidence to show that the Agency arrived at the initial decision improperly.The Agency may engage in discovery and may introduce evidence to rebutsuch additional evidence offered by the concern. However, the burden ofproof remains with the 8(a) concern to demonstrate that the decision wasmade in bad faith or as a result of improper behavior and was, therefore,arbitrary and capricious.SBA received one comment on andSection; 124.211 which addresses the suspensionof program assistance to 8(a) Participant concerns. The commenter was notclear why the decision whether to permit a hearing relating to a suspensionmay be based on advice from the Department of Labor or the Department ofJustice, since a hearing would not necessarily be prejudicial to the otheragency's case. While this is true, it is government procedure to rely onadvice from those named Departments so that their cases are not inadvertentlyprejudiced by an SBA hearing on a suspension.SBA has revised andSection; 124.211 to provide that actions to suspend aconcern's program participation can be commenced at any time after theissuance of an Initial Letter of Termination. This change has been madeto continue SBA's authority to protect the Government's interest by suspendinga concern's Program Participation prior to its termination from the 8(a)Program.Sections 124.301 through 124.320 address the provision of various formsof assistance to 8(a) Program Participants, such as financial, technical,managerial assistance and contract support, to promote the business developmentof such concerns.Section 124.301 addresses the submission of business plans and the requiredcontents of such plans. Section 301(a) sets forth general submission requirements.A number of commenters expressed the view that the 30-day time limit setforth in the proposed rule for the development and submission of a businessplan was too short. SBA agrees with this comment and has amended the ruleto provide that business plans must be submitted to SBA promptly aftercertification. The new language conforms to section 205 of the Reform Act.Another commenter recommended that a deadline be placed in the regulationsfor SBA review of the business plan. SBA has carefully considered thiscomment and has decided not to adopt it because of the differences in lengthand complexity of the various business plans requiring review. Generaltime limitations will be placed in SBA's Standard Operating Procedures(SOP), however. In addition, SBA will consider requests to perform expeditedreviews of business plans where receipt of an 8(a) contract is contingentupon approval of the business plan.SBA has also amended this paragraph to provide that a Participant willnot be eligible for program benefits until the SBA approves its businessplan. The proposed regulation provided that the Participant would not beeligible for 8(a) contracts until approval of its business plan and didnot address other program benefits. This amendment was made in responseto the comment that SBA cannot determine appropriate program benefits fora Participant without an approved business plan.Section 301(b) sets forth the requirement that Standard Industrial Classification(SIC) codes for the nine year Program Term be set forth in the businessplan. Numerous commenters were opposed to this requirement, reasoning thatit would be too difficult to project necessary SIC codes nine years inadvance. The SIC code designation requirement is intended to be an estimateor projection of the industry areas in which the concern intends to concentrate.8(a) concerns are not expected to make absolute determinations concerningthe SIC codes under which they will operate for the next nine years. Infact, specific provision is made in andSection; 124.302(c) for amendmentsand additions to the SIC codes set forth in the business plan. In addition,annual reviews of business plans are intended to permit 8(a) concerns toamend their business plans in accordance with the changing structure andneeds of the concern. As part of the annual review process, 8(a) concernshave the opportunity to change the SIC codes in their business plans. Thelanguage of this section has been modified to clarify SBA's intent andto correct the misimpression that the SIC code requirement is inflexible.Section 124.301(c) sets forth the required contents of the business plan.A few commenters objected to these requirements as too onerous. These requirementsare mandated by section 205 of the Reform Act and, therefore, may not bealtered. Section 124.302 sets forth the procedures for review and modification ofthe business plan. The majority of comments on this section focused onparagraph (c) which provides the conditions under which SBA will permitan 8(a) concern to change the SIC codes in its business plan or to addnew SIC codes. Most concerns expressed the view that SBA would apply thissection strictly to preclude concerns from expanding their businesses andventuring into new areas. This is not SBA's intent. If a concern is ableto demonstrate that it is able to perform under a new or different SICcode, that the new SIC code represents a logical business progression,and other applicable criteria (i.e., Walsh-Healey Act, non-manufacturerrule * * * ) are met, the concern will be permitted to amend its businessplan to change or add a new SIC code. <T3>See</T3> preamble concerning andSection; 124.301(b). One commenter expressed concern regarding the requirement in the proposedrule that the requested SIC code be related to the primary SIC code ofthe concern. The commenter felt this requirement would be interpreted toprohibit concerns from adding SIC codes in two-digit SIC code industriesother than the two-digit SIC code industry for the concern's primary industry.This was not SBA's intent. To avoid this misimpression, SBA has deletedthis requirement. The requirement that the new SIC code represent a logicalbusiness progression for the firm adequately addresses SBA's concern thatthe business limit its expansion to areas related to its primary area ofendeavor. This paragraph has also been amended to delete the designation of the RegionalAdministrator or his/her designee as the deciding official on SIC coderequests. The final regulation provides that SBA will approve SIC codechanges/additions. The reason for this change is that the SBA officialauthorized to approve these requests will vary from region to region dependingon how the 8(a) program is managed in a particular region. In most regions8(a) contracting is handled by the district office, and the appropriateDistrict Director shall be responsible for approving SIC code changes.In those regions were 8(a) contracting is handled by the regional office,the appropriate ARA/MSBandamp;COD shall approve such requests. Finally, paragraph(c) of andSection; 124.302 has been amended as a result of the comments toadd a requirement that SBA make a decision on a request for a SIC codechange within 45 days from the date the request is received. The time limitationis designed to minimize delay in processing requests so as to maximizethe business development potential of 8(a) concerns. Paragraph (d) of andSection; 123.302 requires a transition management planto be submitted in the first year of a Participant's participation in thetransitional stage of the Program Term. A few commenters asked when currentProgram Participants are expected to submit transition management plansif they are in the transitional stage on the effective date of these regulations.Such participants should submit these plans as soon as possible after theeffective date of these regulations. Section 303 sets forth the stages of Program Participation. General ProgramParticipation is divided into two stages_a developmental stage and a transitionalstage. For concerns entering the 8(a) program after November 15, 1988,the developmental stage is four years and the transitional stage is fiveyears. One commenter asked for clarification concerning the length of timein each stage for concerns already in the program. The regulation has beenamended to clarify the method of calculation for these Program Participants.For those concerns with five or fewer years in the program as of August15, 1989, the program year they are in on August 15, 1989 shall be consideredthe first year in the transitional stage. These concerns are subject tothe modified business activity targets established in andSection; 124.312(c)(5).For concerns with more than five years remaining in the program as of August15, 1989, the stages of Program Participation shall be determined so thatthe Participant will have five years in the transitional stage. The remainingtime in the program shall be considered to be time in the developmentalstage. For instance, if a concern had six and one half years remainingin the program as of August 15, 1989, the concern would have one and onehalf years remaining in the developmental stage and five years in the transitionalstage. The time in the developmental stage will naturally precede the timein the transitional stage. These concerns are subject to the full businessactivity targets set forth in andSection; 124.312(c)(4). Section 124.303 also set forth the various forms of assistance availableto concerns in the developmental and transitional stages. One commenterexpressed the view that teaming arrangements should be permitted at thedevelopmental as well as transitional stage of program participation. SBAis unable to adopt this comment because section 301 of the Reform Act providesfor teaming arrangements only during the transitional stage. Another commenter requested clarification concerning whether SBA wouldbe responsible for providing the training assistance available in the transitionalstage. SBA will be responsible for arranging for such training assistance,either through the BOS or through its 7(j), Small Business DevelopmentCenter (SBDC), or Service Corps of Retired Executives (SCORE) programs,or through referrals to other programs. Section 124.304 sets forth the statutory exemption from the Walsh-HealeyAct. One commenter suggested that the final rule clarify that these exemptionsshall apply only to requirements received on or after the effective dateof these regulations. SBA agrees with this comment and has adopted it.Section 124.305(f) of the final rule concerning Miller Act exemptions hasalso been amended to include this clarification. Section 124.305 sets forth the statutory exemption from the requirementin the Miller Act that payment and performance bonds be obtained on constructioncontracts. SBA has made four substantive amendments to this section basedon public comment. First, paragraph (c)(6) of the proposed rule (paragraph(b)(3) of the final rule) required Program Participants requesting exemptionsto demonstrate that they had been denied bonds from three sureties, oneof which was required to be a corporate surety. There were two major commentspertaining to this requirement. The first requested clarification concerninghow a concern would ``demonstrate'' denial. The second expressed the viewthat obtaining three denials was overly burdensome for Program Participants.As a result of these comments, SBA has amended this paragraph to providethat a concern must obtain two denials from sureties, one of which mustbe from a corporate surety and one of which must be from an individualsurety, and that the concern is to demonstrate such denial by submittingwritten denials from the sureties to SBA.The second change made to this section as a result of comments concernsandSection; 124.305(d), which provides for the protection of third parties.The commenters pointed out that the statute provides for direct disbursementof contract proceeds to subcontractors as an option for protecting suppliers,but that SBA's regulations did not contain this option. SBA agrees withthis comment and has added to the regulation a provision listing directdisbursement as an option procuring agencies can utilize to protect suppliers.The third change to this section also is to paragraph (d)(4). This paragraphprovides, among other things, that suppliers must be notified in writingof the existence of a Miller Act exemption and that the 8(a) concern mustobtain written acknowledgement of such notification from its suppliers.This paragraph has been amended to provide that in all instances SBA musthave in its possession all required acknowledgments prior to the paymentof invoices. The proposed rule required that SBA should possess such acknowledgmentsbefore invoices are paid ``where practicable.'' The effect of this changeis to provide further protection to suppliers of materials and labor.The fourth substantive change is the addition of the requirements of paragraph(d)(4) concerning notifications to and acknowledgments from suppliers tothe list of requirements which must be contained in special contract clauses.SBA has also added proposed paragraph (c)(6) of andSection; 124.305 to andSection;124.305 as paragraph (b)(3) because it believes that the requirement thata firm prove that it cannot obtain a bond is more appropriately placedin the paragraph concerning conditions for obtaining a waiver than in theparagraph on limitations to the waiver.Another commenter expressed the view that there should be a blanket exemptionfrom the Miller Act for all 8(a) concerns involved in the constructionindustry. SBA is unable to adopt this comment because the Reform Act providesfor an exemption from the Miller Act only where an 8(a) concern is unableto obtain a bond. Moreover, the purpose of the exemption is to enable responsible8(a) concerns to perform contracts where they cannot persuade a suretyto provide them a bond. The purpose is not to enable the concern to avoidpaying for ``high risk'' bonding as the comment suggests.One commenter suggested that bonds should not be waived below the $1.25million surety bond guarantee ceiling. Under SBA's Surety Bond Guaranteeprogram, SBA agrees to guarantee sureties where a surety company is unwillingto provide a surety bond to a small business without such guarantee. SBAhas not adopted this comment because, under certain circumstances, a suretymay not be willing to provide a bond to an 8(a) concern even if SBA agreesto guarantee the bond. In such case SBA may want to provide an exemptionto the bonding requirement of the Miller Act if it determines that the8(a) concern is capable of performing the requirement.A number of other commenters were opposed to SBA's unwillingness to assumeresponsibility for payment of subcontractors when an 8(a) contractor failsto reimburse them. Congress has not appropriated funds for this purposeand, therefore, SBA is unable to assume this responsibility. Moreover,the Reform Act provides that SBA and the procuring agency should take stepsto protect subcontractors by establishing a special bank account or bydirect disbursement procedures.A few commenters requested that the $3,000,000 ceiling for the exemptionsbe lowered. Inasmuch as the $3,000,000 ceiling is statutory, SBA cannotadopt this comment. It is the intent of Congress that SBA consider allrequests under the ceiling.One commenter suggested that SBA automatically reject a request for a bondwaiver where the 8(a) concern requesting the waiver has defaulted on aprior contract; or, at a minimum, that SBA require such concern to meeta higher standard before it may obtain a waiver. SBA has considered thiscomment, but has not adopted it. There are many reasons why a concern mightdefault on a contract. If such concern corrects the problem which causedthe default or if the cause of the default would not pertain to the contractfor which the waiver is requested, such concern should not be penalizedfor the default. However, SBA will carefully consider a prior default andthe circumstances which caused the default in determining whether a concernis capable of performing a subsequent contract for purposes of determiningwhether a waiver is appropriate. Moreover, the regulation does providethat SBA will not grant an exemption where a concern has defaulted on aprior contract for which it received an exemption. <T3>See</T3> andSection; 124.305(c)(5).A few commenters opposed the provision in andSection; 124.305(d)(1)(iii)which authorizes SBA to delegate to a third party its authority to approvedisbursements from the special bank account established to protect thirdparties. SBA has considered and rejected this comment. The authority todelegate this authority is necessary due to SBA's limited personnel resources.SBA will exercise great care in approving qualified and responsible personsto approve disbursements from the special bank account.For clarification, SBA has specified in andSection; 124.305(d)(2) that the8(a) concern receiving the bond waiver notify suppliers of material andlabor in writing of the exemption.A number of commenters asked whether SBA would grant a bond waiver overthe objection of the procuring agency offering the requirement. If a procuringagency objects to a decision by SBA to grant a waiver, the agency can withdrawthe requirement, in which case SBA may appeal the withdrawal, or the procuringagency may agree to offer the requirement to another 8(a) concern.Section 124.306 sets forth both the standards and procedures for obtainingfinancial assistance from SBA for skills training. Paragraph (a) of andSection;124.306 in the proposed rule provided that payment would be made to thetraining providers pursuant to appropriate agreement. That paragraph hasbeen amended as a result of amendments to the Reform Act by the TechnicalCorrections Act, Public Law 101-37. Section 8 of the Technical CorrectionsAct amended the Reform Act to permit SBA to make payments either to thetraining providers or as reimbursement to the 8(a) concern or the employeeof the 8(a) concern receiving the training. The final rule has been amendedto reflect this amendment to the Reform Act.One commenter objected to the limitations in paragraph (b)(5) of andSection;124.306 on the types of institutions eligible to provide training underthis section. SBA is unable to relax such limitations as they are requiredby section 301 of the Reform Act.Paragraph (b) has been amended to include as paragraph (b)(12) the requirementthat appropriate written employment contracts must be executed and submittedto SBA in accordance with paragraph (f) of andSection; 124.306.Paragraph (d) of andSection; 124.306 has been amended to substitute the word``request'' for the word ``proposal'' to avoid any confusion that the word``proposal'' might cause, and to add a sentence clarifying that SBA mayrequest additional information before the request is processed.Section 124.307 sets forth the general standards for acceptance of contractsfor the 8(a) program. One commenter requested that paragraph (d) of thissection be amended to provide that approval of an 8(a) contract will becontingent upon a determination by the procuring agency as well as by SBAthat the concern is capable of performing the contract. SBA has rejectedthis comment inasmuch as it is SBA's responsibility to certify its owncapability to perform the contract as the prime contractor. Such certificationis based on a determination by SBA that the 8(a) concern to which it willsubcontract the requirement is capable of performing the requirement. Thiscertification requirement remains unchanged from SBA's former regulations.If the procuring agency questions an 8(a) concern's capacity or capabilityto perform a particular requirement, it may express its concerns to SBA.However, the final authority to determine the capability of the 8(a) concernremains with SBA.One commenter requested that SBA add a provision to this section prohibitingSBA from accepting for the 8(a) program any previously competed contractthat is now an umbrella contract. SBA has not adopted this comment becauseunder many circumstances, it would be appropriate to accept such an umbrellacontract for the 8(a) program. The circumstances under which SBA will refuseto accept a procurement for the 8(a) program are set forth in andSection;124.309 of the rule. SBA will generally make such a refusal where acceptancewould have an adverse impact on other small business programs or on anindividual small business. If acceptance of the umbrella contract wouldresult in any of the consequences listed in andSection; 124.309, SBA wouldrefuse to accept it. For instance, SBA would refuse to accept the requirementif the umbrella contract was substantially the same as the prior contractwith minimal added requirements and a small business concern would be adverselyaffected by acceptance of the contract for the 8(a) program.Section 124.308 sets forth the procedures for obtaining and accepting procurementsfor the 8(a) program. Paragraph (b) of this section provides, among otherthings, that if SBA disagrees with the SIC code assigned to the requirementby the procuring agency, SBA may request that the procuring Agency assigna different SIC code to the requirement. A few of the procuring agenciescommented that a sentence should be added to this provision to clarifythat the procuring agency shall make the final decision with regard tothe SIC code assigned to the requirement. SBA has not adopted this commentbecause SBA retains the right to refuse the requirement if the procuringagency chooses an incorrect SIC code for the requirement. SBA has therefore,amended this paragraph to provide that if SBA is unable to accept the procuringagency's SIC code designation for the requirement, the AA/MSBandamp;COD mayfile a SIC code appeal to the Office of Hearings and Appeals of the SBAor may refuse to accept the requirement for the 8(a) program. SBA willonly take such actions when a SIC code is clearly incorrect, however. Solong as the SIC code assigned to the requirement by the procuring agencycontracting officer is reasonable, it will be accepted by SBA.Paragraph (b) has been further amended to provide that SBA may accept arequirement for competition even if it is below the applicable competitivethreshold if it receives a request to do so from the procuring agency.One commenter correctly pointed out that SBA had inadvertently omittedthis option from the proposed rule.Paragraph (b) has also been subdivided for clarity.Paragraph (c) of andSection; 124.308 has been amended to reflect the proposedamendment to the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR) on competitive 8(a)procurements. That proposed rule was published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on June 28, 1989, 54 FR 27310. SBA has made minorlanguage changes so that the language in this paragraph is virtually identicalto that used in andSection; 19.804-2(a) of the proposed FAR amendment. Inaddition, SBA has redesignated paragraph (c)(14) of the proposed rule asparagraph (c)(17) and has added new paragraphs (a)(14), (a)(15) and (a)(16)to comport with the proposed FAR amendment. Paragraph (a)(14) providesthat the procuring agency will identify in the offering letter all 8(a)concerns which have expressed an interest in being considered for the acquisition.Paragraph (a)(15) provides that, if the requirement is a national buy,the procuring agency will identify all SBA district or regional officeswhich have asked for the acquisition for the 8(a) program. Paragraph (a)(16)provides that the offering letter shall contain a request that the acquisitionbe competitive, if appropriate, and the estimated contract value is underthe applicable threshold. These additions represent either current policywhich was not clear in SBA's proposed rule, or items contained in the ReformAct.SBA has also added a new paragraph (h) to the final rule to clarify currentpolicy and to comport with andSection; 19.804-4 of the proposed FAR amendment.New Paragraph (h) provides that in order for repetitive acquisitions tobe awarded through the 8(a) program, there must be separate offers andacceptances. This clarifies the general rule that every new contract mustbe separately accepted for the 8(a) program, even if such contract is fora repeat requirement.Paragraph (d) of andSection; 124.308 provides procedures for SBA acceptanceof a requirement for the 8(a) program. A few commenters requested thattime frames be established so that procuring agencies and contractors willknow when to expect decisions with regard to SBA's acceptance of nationalbuys and designations of specific participants to perform. SBA has rejectedthis comment because generally procuring agencies provide time frames inwhich they need decisions made for particular procurements. Moreover, generaltime frames will be placed in SBA's Standard Operating Procedures (SOP).Another commenter suggested that SBA make a detailed analysis of its portfoliowithin the 15-day time frame for acceptance, to include analyses of thebusiness plans of all eligible Participants. Unfortunately, SBA does nothave the resources to perform such extensive research within such a shorttime frame. Paragraph (e) of andSection; 124.308 sets forth the requirements and proceduresfor acceptance of sole source requirements when the procuring agency nominatesa particular Program Participant for award. One commenter requested thatan exception be made to the requirement that an 8(a) concern not be awardeda sole source contract if the concern has exceeded its support level whenaward of that contract would assist the concern in meeting its 8(a) programobjectives. It is SBA's policy that 8(a) concerns must stay within theirsupport levels. There are a number of reasons for setting support levels,including the encouragement of logical and well-planned development ofthe concern, reduced reliance on 8(a) contracts, and fair distributionof sole source contracts. If an 8(a) concern believes that its supportlevel is too low, it may request that its support level be raised. If SBAgranted exceptions to support level requirements to permit 8(a) concernsto be awarded additional sole source contracts, it would render such supportlevels meaningless. Another commenter requested that the regulation permit the procuring agencyto withdraw the requirement or appeal if SBA refuses to award the contractto the nominated concern. The procuring agency always has the option ofwithdrawing the requirement. Therefore, it is unnecessary to include thatoption in this regulation. There is no appeal process for issues of Participantselection. Paragraph (g) of andSection; 124.308 provides that procuring agencies maynot request formal technical evaluations for sole source contracts. Onecommenter objected to formal technical evaluations in all cases, reasoningthat these evaluations discriminate against smaller concerns which cannotafford costly proposal efforts. One of the purposes of the introductionof competition into the 8(a) program is to educate 8(a) concerns in thecompetitive process and to provide them with experience in following theprocedures they will have to follow once they leave the 8(a) program. Formaltechnical evaluations are an integral part of unrestricted procurementsof certain services. Therefore, to prohibit their use in 8(a) competitiveprocurements would artificially ease competitions for these procurements.The Conference Report to the Reform Act, H.R. Rep. No. 1070, 100th Cong.,2d Sess. 64 (1988) specifically provides that competitions should be representativeof competition which is the normal practice in the relevant industries.In order to protect the smaller or newer Participants in the program, SBAhas prohibited formal technical evaluations for sole source awards.Section 124.309 sets forth the conditions under which SBA will refuse toaccept a requirement for the 8(a) program where to do so would adverselyaffect the Small Business or Small Disadvantaged Business (SDB) set-asideprograms or a particular small business. One commenter requested that thissection be deleted as discriminatory to 8(a) concerns. This policy is wellestablished and is set forth in SBA's former regulations. Congress intendedthat the various programs developed for assistance to small firms and smalldisadvantaged firms function cooperatively and harmoniously. It is thereforenecessary to have regulations in place which permit such cooperative functioningand prevent unnecessary and counter-productive competition between programs.The intent of this section is merely to preclude 8(a) awards where a procurementhas already been committed to another small business program. SBA has amended the language in paragraph (c) to clarify that in determiningwhether adverse impact exists, SBA will consider all relevant factors.In light of this clarification, paragraph (c)(2) of the proposed rule hasbeen deleted as unnecessary. A few commenters opposed paragraph (d) of andSection; 124.309, which providesthat under certain specified circumstances, SBA will release a requirementfrom the 8(a) program so that it can be competed. One commenter requestedthat the word ``released'' be changed to ``rejected'' since every new contract(even if it is a repeat requirement) must be separately accepted for the8(a) program. SBA agrees with this comment and has substituted the word``rejected'' for ``released'' everywhere it appears.Another commenter requested that specific criteria be provided for rejectionof a requirement. SBA has decided not to include specific criteria in theregulation because of the differences in the types of requirements offeredto the 8(a) program, differing circumstances, and lack of experience inthis area. After ABA develops clear policy guidelines for implementationof this paragraph, it will consider promulgating such guidelines and criteriaas regulations.Finally, one commenter suggested that the procuring agency have input intothe decision to reject a requirement so that it can be competed. SBA agreeswith this comment and has adopted it.Section 124.310 provides that SBA must approve subcontracting arrangementsunder 8(a) contracts. One commenter asked whether this requirement is retroactiveto contracts awarded prior to the effective date of the regulations. Thisrequirement is not new and therefore retroactivity is not an issue. Therequirement reflects long-standing SBA policy and is included in the FARregulations under the section on required special clauses. (48 CFR 52.219-12(b)(3).)A number of the commenters opposed the requirement generally, arguing thatit needlessly injects SBA into the legitimate decisions of 8(a) concerns.Because the 8(a) program is a business development program, SBA has a legitimateinterest in being informed of and involved in Participants' decisions.Moreover, this approval process is necessary in order to prevent frontsand to prohibit excessive control and/or benefits to non-8(a) concerns.Finally, SBA must examine the subcontracting arrangements of 8(a) concernsto insure that the legislatively mandated subcontracting percentage limitationsare met. <T3>See</T3> section 921 of Public Law 99-661 and andSection; 124.314 ofthese regulations.It should also be noted that SBA is not required to affirmatively approveeach subcontract and will generally accept the 8(a) concern's subcontractingarrangements if the requirements of andSection; 124.314 are met. However,SBA must be informed of such arrangements and reserves the right to disapprovesubcontractors or subcontracting arrangements.Section 124.311 sets forth the statutory thresholds for competition withinthe 8(a) program and describes the procedures for conducting competitions.The introduction of competition into the 8(a) program over the thresholdamounts was mandated by section 303(b) of the Reform Act. A number of commentersexpressed the general view that competition cannot be effectively integratedinto the 8(a) program. The primary concern was that the delay involvedin conducting competitions would take away the primary motivations forprocuring agencies to set aside contracts for the 8(a) program_ease andspeed. SBA and the various procuring agencies which utilize the 8(a) programare aware of the danger that requirements could be lost to the 8(a) programas a result of the competitive requirements. In order to ensure that 8(a)activity is maintained at current levels or increased, SBA will use alldue diligence to expedite the competitive 8(a) process and will encouragecontracting agencies to do the same. Moreover, in revising the FederalAcquisition Regulation (FAR) to include standards and procedures for conductingcompetitions within the 8(a) program, Federal procuring agencies have takeninto consideration the danger of increased delay and have provided, wherepossible, for streamlined procedures for conducting 8(a) competitions.A number of commenters requested that the threshold amounts set forth inandSection; 124.311(a)(2) be raised and many presented precise formulas fordetermining when competition should be required. SBA is unable to adoptthese comments because the threshold amounts are mandated by statute. <T3>See</T3> section 303(b) of the Reform Act. The statute also mandatesthat option years be included in calculating the threshold amounts andthat the calculation be based on ``anticipated award price.'' Therefore,comments opposing these requirements could not be adopted.One commenter suggested that paragraph (a) be amended to provide that forpurposes of indefinite quantity/delivery contracts, the threshold amountsshould apply to the guaranteed minimum value of the contract. SBA agreeswith this comment and has amended the regulation accordingly.Section 124.311(b) sets forth the effective date of the threshold requirements.A number of commenters objected to the requirement that a proposal containingprice must be submitted to the procuring agency before October 1, 1989in order for a requirement to avoid the requirement that contracts overthe threshold requirements be competed. The commenters pointed out that8(a) concerns expend valuable resources both in terms of personnel timeand money to self-market and negotiate contracts with procuring agencies.The commenters requested SBA to revise the regulation to permit a requirementto be awarded as a sole source contract if it is accepted for the 8(a)program before October 1, 1989. SBA agrees with this comment and has amendedparagraph (b) to provide that the threshold requirements shall not applyto any 8(a) requirement that has been accepted for the 8(a) program priorto October 1, 1989.Paragraph (c) of andSection; 124.311 provides that SBA may award an 8(a)contract on a non-competitive basis to an 8(a) concern owned and controlledby an economically disadvantaged Indian tribe even if such contract exceedsthe competitive thresholds. A number of commenters recommended that SBAadd a provision to this paragraph specifying that it will not considera request to award a contract above the threshold amounts to an Indiantribe where the requirement has already been accepted for competition.The commenters reasoned that removal of a requirement from competitionwould prejudice prospective bidders who have expended valuable resourcesin preparing bids or proposals. SBA agrees with this view and has amendedthis paragraph to preclude SBA from awarding a requirement above the thresholdamounts on a sole source basis to a tribally-owned 8(a) concern once ithas been accepted for competition and prospective offerors have been notified.However, if a requirement is offered to the 8(a) program again (after theconcern which was awarded such contract pursuant to competition has completedperformance), the requirement must then be separately accepted for the8(a) program and could be offered to a tribally-owned concern.Paragraph (d) of andSection; 124.311 sets forth the circumstances under whichSBA will consider a request from a procuring agency that a requirementunder the applicable threshold amount be competed. A number of commentersexpressed the view that contracts under the threshold amounts should neverbe competed. SBA has not adopted this comment for the following reasons.First, section 303(b) of the Reform Act expressly authorizes SBA to permitcompetition under the threshold amounts. Second, the regulation authorizesSBA to permit competition under the threshold amounts only under limitedcircumstances, and examples of the circumstances where SBA will considergranting such permission are clearly specified in the regulations. SBAintends to utilize this authority infrequently. Finally, it is SBA's policyto prohibit technical evaluations on sole source contracts. Therefore,SBA must have the authority to approve sole source contracts under thethreshold amounts in order to permit agencies to perform technical evaluationson contracts under the threshold amounts. Another commenter suggested that paragraph (d) be amended to provide thatthe head of the procuring agency must make the request to SBA to competea contract under the applicable threshold. The statute does not specifythat the request must come from the head of the procuring agency and SBAsees no need to require such high-level involvement. SBA will defer tothe various procuring agencies with regard to the appropriate officialto make the request. Paragraph (e) of andSection; 124.311 provides that SBA may accept a requirementabove the applicable threshold on a sole source basis if there are nottwo eligible bidders in cases where SBA determines that there is one eligibleProgram Participant capable of performing the requirement at a fair price.One commenter suggested that this paragraph be amended to provide thatthe procuring agency rather than SBA will determine whether an 8(a) concernexists capable of performing the contract. SBA has always determined thecompetency of 8(a) concerns to perform sole source contracts and is inthe best position to do so. Therefore, SBA has not adopted this comment.Another commenter asked whether SBA would accept a requirement above theapplicable threshold on a sole source basis if it was a local buy and therewas only one eligible 8(a) concern in the district in which the procurementwould be performed. Under these circumstances, SBA would look first toother districts in the applicable region and then to adjacent regions inorder to determine whether two eligible offerors exist which are capableof performing the requirement at a fair price. SBA has amended paragraph(d) to clarify this policy. SBA has amended paragraph (e) to clarify how it will determine the absenceof two eligible bidders for local buys where the geographic boundariesfor competition are flexible. The added language provides that, for nationalbuys, SBA will determine that there are not two eligible bidders if thereare not two eligible bidders anywhere in the United States. For local buys,SBA will determine that there are not two eligible bidders if there arenot two eligible bidders located in the applicable region or adjacent regions.This clear threshold will preclude arbitrary decisions and requests tomanipulate the thresholds to benefit particular 8(a) concerns. Paragraph (f) of andSection; 124.311 sets forth the procedures for conductingcompetitions. Numerous commenters objected to the requirement in paragraph(f)(1) that SBA approve the competitive criteria utilized by a procuringagency to select a concern for award. The commenters reasoned that SBAdoes not have the technical expertise to evaluate competitive criteriaeffectively and that, in exercising approval authority over the procuringagency, SBA would be usurping such agency's legitimate role in the procurementprocess. SBA agrees with this comment and has removed the clause in paragraph(f)(1) providing that SBA must approve the competitive criteria. Many of the comments on this paragraph concerned issues that will be addressedin the amendments to the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR) implementingthe Reform Act. As previously noted, those regulations were published inproposed form on June 28, 1989 in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> for comment. (54 FR 27310.) The proposed rulecontains detailed procedures for conducting 8(a) competitions, includingsolicitation procedures and procedures for identifying potential offerors.Many of the comments also addressed issues which should more appropriatelybe made as comments on the proposed amendments to the FAR. For instance,a number of comments were received concerning when sealed bidding shouldbe used and when competitions should be conducted based solely on technicalcapability without regard to price. These determinations are the responsibilityof the procuring agencies rather than SBA. A number of commenters requested that SBA provide a list of eligible offerorsto procuring agencies for each competitive procurement. This would be impracticablefor purposes of national buys in view of the number of concerns in thenational portfolio. However, SBA is willing to provide procuring agencieswith such a list where the requirement is a local buy, provided that theprocuring agency returns the list with a copy of the solicitation whenit is made public. This will permit SBA to update or correct the list ofpotential bidders if necessary. Paragraph (f)(4) of andSection; 124.311 of the proposed rule provided that,in a negotiated procurement, the procuring agency would identify all offerorsto SBA for purposes of obtaining from SBA a determination of the eligibilityof each offeror. This paragraph has been amended in the final rule to conformto the proposed FAR rule. That rule provides that in a sealed bid procurement,the procuring agency would provide SBA with a list of ranked offerors andthat SBA would examine the eligibility of each concern on the list startingwith the lowest bidder until it finds an eligible concern. This procedureis slightly different from the procedure set forth in SBA's proposed rule.The FAR proposed rule also provides that, in a negotiated procurement,the procuring agency would identify all offerors in the competitive range.SBA's proposed rule provided that the procuring agency would provide SBAa list of all offerors. SBA's final rule has been amended to conform tothese provisions of the proposed FAR rule. Other technical changes havealso been made to the language in the final rule to replicate the proposedFAR rule. Paragraph (f)(5) of andSection; 124.311 provides that SBA will determinewhether any firm identified by the procuring agency is eligible for awardand specifies the factors SBA will examine in making such determination.One of the factors SBA will examine is whether the 8(a) concern has achievedits competitive business mix targets. A number of commenters expressedthe view that inability to achieve the competitive business targets shouldnot preclude the 8(a) concern from competing for contracts inasmuch asdenial of 8(a) contracts is only one possible remedy for failure to achievethe targets. SBA agrees with this view and has amended this paragraph toprovide that SBA will determine whether the 8(a) concern has achieved orhas made substantial and sustained efforts to achieve the competitive businessmix targets set forth in its business plan. A final sentence has been addedto provide that failure to achieve the competitive business activity targetswill not affect a concern's eligibility for an 8(a) competitive award ifSBA and the concern have agreed upon a remedial plan and such plan doesnot include denial of future 8(a) awards.Another commenter expressed the view that SBA should not consider supportlevels or achievement of business activity targets at all in determiningwhether an 8(a) concern is eligible for a competitive 8(a) award. SBA mustconsider these factors in order to insure that 8(a) contracts are equitablydistributed among Program Participants, and in order to insure that concernsdo not become unduly dependent on 8(a) contracts.One commenter suggested that concerns be approved for competition beforethe bidding process; i.e., that SBA perform eligibility reviews on allthe concerns in the 8(a) portfolio and submit to the procuring agency alist of all potential offerors eligible for an 8(a) competitive procurement.This comment was rejected as it would be an inappropriate use of SBA'stime and resources to determine the eligibility of every concern in theportfolio for the appropriate geographical boundaries where only a smallfraction of those concerns would ultimately bid on a particular procurement.A number of commenters asked whether SBA or the procuring agency wouldbe responsible for notifying 8(a) concerns that they are ineligible foraward. SBA will notify those firms determined to be ineligible.Another factor which SBA will examine in determining the eligibility ofan 8(a) concern for a competitive 8(a) award is whether the concern hasthe SIC code for the procurement in its business plan. A few commenterssuggested that the regulation be amended to provide that firms may competefor a procurement if they have the ``same or similar'' SIC code in theirbusiness plan as the SIC code for the procurement. SBA has rejected thiscomment because to permit a concern to compete for a contract where itdoes not have the SIC code for the contract in its business plan woulddefeat the purpose of requiring concerns to include all SIC codes underwhich they will operate in their business plans.A few commenters recommended that concerns certify as to eligibility toa particular competitive 8(a) award with penalties for false certifications.SBA has considered this comment but has not adopted it. If a concern self-certifiesand is awarded the contract and it is determined after performance hasbegun that the concern was ineligible for such contract, either the procuringagency would be harmed by having to terminate the contract and reawardit or, if the contract is not terminated, offerors which are eligible forthe contract would be harmed.In order to comport with andSection; 19.805-2(d) of the FAR proposed rule,SBA has amended paragraph (f)(5) to provide that SBA will make eligibilitydeterminations on competitive procurements within five working days ofreceipt of the list of offerors.Section 124.312 requires a firm to establish targets of non-8(a) businessactivity during its participation in the 8(a) program. During the developmentalstage of program participation (program years 1-4), a firm is requiredto make substantial and sustained efforts to meet the targeted dollar levelsof non-8(a) revenue set forth in its business plan. These targets may beset as a percentage of revenues or as a specified dollar level. Duringeach program year in the transitional stage of program participation (programyears 5-9), a fixed percentage of a Participant's total revenue is requiredto be derived from non-8(a) business. The section sets forth varying rangesof non-8(a) business revenues that a Participant is required to achieve,depending upon its year in the program.Section 124.312(c) identifies the non-8(a) business activity targets thatParticipants are required to meet during the transitional stage of ProgramParticipation. Participants approved for participation on or after November15, 1988, and Participants with more than five years remaining in the programas of August 15, 1989, are subject to the non-8(a) business activity targetsset forth in andSection; 124.312(c)(4). Participants with five years or lessremaining in the program as of August 15, 1989, are subject to modifiednon-8(a) business activity targets set forth in andSection; 124.312(c)(5).SBA received many comments concerning its proposed implementation of thenon-8(a) business activity targets. Generally, commenters felt that theproposed targets were too difficult to meet, particularly for current Participantsin the program, although several commenters did believe that the targetsshould be more ``challenging.'' SBA concurs that the proposed modifiedtargets could have been difficult to meet for some current Participantsand that more flexibility was needed in the final rule to avoid undulyburdening current Program Participants. In response to the comments, SBAhas reduced the percentages of required non-8(a) revenue applicable forfirms subject to the modified targets. As a result, a firm subject to themodified targets will be required to attain less non-8(a) revenue duringeach year in the transitional stage of program participation.Several commenters urged SBA to make the modified targets applicable tocurrent Participants with six years or less remaining in the program insteadof five years or less as set forth in the proposed rule. SBA consideredthis recommendation, but believes it to be contrary to section 303(a) ofthe Business Opportunity Development Reform Act of 1988 which authorizesSBA to ``establish modified targets for Program Participants that haveparticipated in the Program for a period of <T3>longer than four years</T3> on the effective date of this subparagraph.''(August 15, 1989) [Emphasis added]. If the modified targets were made applicableto firms with six years or less remaining in the program (instead of fiveyears), they could apply to firms which have been in the program for onlythree years. This would be contrary to the statutory authority.Several commenters also expressed confusion concerning the applicationof the modified targets. They wondered, for example, whether they wererequired to meet the target for year one or year two if they had four yearsremaining in the program on the effective date of this section (i.e., onOctober 1, 1989). The targets correspond to a firm's year in the transitionalstage, not its year in the program or the number of years remaining inthe program. As such, every firm subject to the modified targets must attainbetween 10-15% non-8(a) revenue (the target corresponding to year one inthe transitional stage) during its first program year after the effectivedate of this provision. The following example of the application of thisprovision is offered to further illustrate the Agency's intent.Example: Program Participant XYZ has 4 years remaining in the program asof August 15, 1989 (i.e., it graduates from the program on August 14, 1993).Because this firm has between 3 and 5 years remaining in the program, themodified non-8(a) business activity targets are applicable. During itsfirst full program year after the effective date of this provision (i.e.,August 15, 1989-August 14, 1990), the applicable non-8(a) business targetis 10-15%_the target corresponding to year one in the transitional stage.During the program year of August 15, 1990-August 14, 1991, the applicablenon-8(a) business target is 15-20%_the target corresponding to year twoin the transitional stage. The applicable non-8(a) business activity targetsfor the third and fourth program years would be 20-30% and 30-40% respectively.XYX would exit the program having a target of between 30-40% non-8(a) revenues.The modified target corresponding to the fifth year in the transitionalstage would never be applicable in this instance.SBA has not changed the non-8(a) business activity targets applicable tonewly admitted firms and firms with more than five years remaining in theprogram as of August 15, 1989. It is SBA's view that the targets establishedin the proposed rule are entirely consistent with the intent of the BusinessOpportunity Development Reform Act of 1988 and are not unrealistic to achieve.The 8(a) program is a program designed to aid in the development of businessconcerns owned and controlled by disadvantaged individuals. It is not intendedto be the sole support of such concerns. Firms are encouraged to developa business base outside the 8(a) program so that they can survive afterexisting the program. While several commenters felt that the proposed non-8(a)business activity targets were too high, these targets must be set at levelsthat will encourage a firm to prosper in the open marketplace after leavingthe 8(a) program.The Conference Report to the Business Opportunity Development Reform Actof 1988, H.R. Rep. No. 1070, 100th Cong., 2d Sess. 62-63 (1988), providesguidance to SBA for establishing non-8(a) business activity targets. Theconference report states that the targets established ``<T3>should generally</T3> require firms in the fifth and sixth years toshow 25% of revenues from sources other than 8(a) contracts, while in theseventh and eighth years such business revenues should <T3>move toward</T3> 50%,'' and, in the final year of program participation,``firms should <T3>strive to achieve</T3> at least three-fourths of their business revenuesfrom sources other than 8(a) contracts.'' [Emphasis added]. SBA has takenthese general parameters and has refined them in order to have realistic,attainable targets which firms are more likely to meet.Instead of grouping years 5 and 6 and years 7 and 8 together (i.e., havingthe same business activity targets), the final rule sets different businessactivity targets for each year in the transitional stage of program participation.SBA believes that a requirement of approximately 25 percent non-8(a) businessin year 6 followed by a requirement of approximately 50 percent non-8(a)business in year 7 would be unreasonable. A Participant that barely meetsthe target in year 6, and is thus not subject to remedial measures, couldhave difficulty in reaching the target in year 7. SBA believes that a moregradual progression away from 8(a) reliance is preferable. In addition,the final rule sets ranges of acceptable non-8(a) business revenues insteadof requiring a specific minimum level of non-8(a) business. SBA believesthat the attainment of non-8(a) business by Program Participants withina specified range is more realistic than minimum level requirements.A few commenters also suggested that the non-8(a) business activity targetsbe industry specific (i.e., that they vary based on the primary SIC Codeof the concern). SBA believes that such a system would be unworkable andsubject to charges of prejudicial treatment. In addition, there is no supportfor such a concept in the Business Development Opportunity Reform Act of1988 or its legislative history.Comment was also made that compliance with the non-8(a) business activitytargets should be based solely on new sales during the applicable programyear, rather than on total revenues. SBA disagrees. In determining supportlevels, options and modifications are counted in the program year in whichthey are exercised. SBA believes that they should be similarly countedin determining compliance to business mix targets. To disregard 8(a) optionsand modifications in determining business mix compliance would be to skewa firm's true reliance on the 8(a) program. The intent of the new legislationwas to require firms to become less dependent on the 8(a) program. Theonly way to do that is to count all revenues derived during the applicableprogram year in determining business mix compliance.Several commenters felt that competitive 8(a) awards should count positivelyfor a firm in determining business mix compliance, and not negatively (i.e.,that sole source 8(a) awards should be measured against all other revenuesinstead of adding competitive 8(a) awards to sole source awards and measuringthat figure against all other revenues). Another commenter believed thatthe regulations should not permit the Department of Defense Small DisadvantagedBusiness and other preference program contracts to count toward non-8(a)revenues. SBA believes that the statute and legislative history are clearconcerning both of these points. Section 303(a) of the Business DevelopmentOpportunity Reform Act of 1988 requires SBA to set business activity targetswhich reflect a reasonably consistent increase in ``contracts awarded otherthan pursuant to section 8(a)'' of the Small Business Act. In addition,the conference report states that ``the targets established by SBA shallbe for business outside of the program that firms must attain and doesnot include those awards that firms receive after competitions restrictedto the 8(a) program.'' H.R. Rep. No. 1070, 100th Cong., 2d Sess. 62 (1988).The statutory distinction is clear. All 8(a) revenue, whether awarded throughcompetition or as a sole source contract, is measured against all revenueobtained outside the 8(a) program, including SDB and other preference programcontracts.SBA also received many comments concerning the imposition of remedial measuresfor failure to meet the required non-8(a) business activity targets (andSection;124.312(c)(12)).Several commenters believed that the proposed remedial measures were penaltiesand recommended that SBA provide constructive assistance such as adviceon marketing and financial strategies instead of imposing such penalties.Commenters also recommended that 8(a) contract support should not be reducedwhere good faith efforts were made by an 8(a) concern to obtain non-8(a)contracts, but where the concern did not meet its required non-8(a) businessactivity target (e.g., a firm submitted 8 offers for non-8(a) competitivecontracts, but failed to receive an award). The proposed remedial measureswere not intended to be penalties unless no efforts were made to obtainnon-8(a) revenues or a firm repeatedly failed to come close to the applicablenon-8(a) business activity target.SBA has clarified the regulation to provide that the type of remedial measureto be used depends on the extent to which the Participant failed to obtain,and the effort expended in seeking, non-8(a) business. If a firm is closeto its targets, or demonstrates that it has made good faith efforts toobtain non-8(a) business, the remedial measures to be taken by SBA willgenerally be the provision of technical and/or managerial assistance_nota reduction in 8(a) support levels. For example, if a firm has submittedoffers for a variety of non-8(a) contracts, but fails to obtain any awards,the firm undoubtedly needs and should be required to obtain managerialand technical assistance. Reducing 8(a) support, however, might cripplethe firm's ability to continue to operate. It should be noted, however,that good faith efforts alone will not insulate a firm from reduced 8(a)support levels and/or termination from the program where the firm repeatedlymakes no improvement in obtaining non-8(a) revenues.The potential remedies can range from requiring a Participant to obtainmanagement and/or technical assistance where the Participant's non-8(a)business activity is very close to the required target, to reducing a Participant's8(a) support level or reducing or eliminating sole source 8(a) awards forParticipants which have had less success in meeting the required targets,to termination where a Participant makes no effort to obtain non-8(a) businessand is content to rely solely on the 8(a) program. The management and/ortechnical assistance called for in the regulations may be provided by SBAsponsored entities (e.g., through the 7(j) program, the Small BusinessDevelopment Center program, or SCORE and ACE counselors), local chambersof commerce, private and public sector consultants, educational institutions,and other entities as specified by SBA as part of the annual review process.A provision has also been added to the final rule that notifies ProgramParticipants that termination proceedings will be commenced where no effortsare made to obtain non-8(a) revenues.Comment was also made that SBA should not include the denial or restrictionof competitive 8(a) contracts as a remedial measure since this kind ofcompetition will strengthen the firm's chances of obtaining non-8(a) competitivecontracts. SBA has removed from the final rule the subparagraph that permittedrestricting the award of new competitive 8(a) contracts (proposed andSection;124.312(c)(12)(iii)).This proposed subparagraph also authorized restricting the award of newsole source 8(a) contracts. Although that subparagraph has been eliminatedfrom the final rule, restricting the award of new sole source 8(a) contractsmay be imposed under andSection;124.312(c)(12)(iv) (proposed andSection;124.312(c)(12)(ii)).Several commenters objected to the provision of proposed andSection; 124.312(b)(4)which prohibited a firm in the developmental stage of Program Participationfrom receiving 8(a) contract support (whether it is awarded as a sole sourcecontract or through competition) in excess of 125 percent of the 8(a) supportlevel established in its approved business plan. The commenters arguedthat this provision ignored the nature of business cycles. SBA disagreeswith the commenters concerning this provision. SBA encourages firms toplan for business cycles and authorizes changes (increases) in approvedsupport levels throughout a firm's life in the program to account for suchcycles. Specifically, the regulations authorize increases in approved supportlevels twice a year if such increases can be justified (i.e., once, atthe time of the annual review, and again at the halfway mark of the specificprogram year). The Participant's support level can be increased at themid-year point of a Participant's program year, but not solely to enablethe firm to receive an additional 8(a) contract that it has identified.In the past, SBA may have approved requests for increases in 8(a) supportlevels without regard for whether or not the firm could increase its non-8(a)business simultaneously.This brought about two results. First, it gave little meaning to a firm'sapproved 8(a) support level. A firm could seek 8(a) contracts in excessof its approved 8(a) support level, knowing that SBA might increase thesupport level if requested. Second, it encouraged a reliance on the 8(a)program. It was possible that a concern could request, and receive, anincrease in its 8(a) support level that resulted in the entire capacityof the business being devoted to the performance of 8(a) contracts. Thiswould have made it difficult for a firm to make the transition into thecompetitive marketplace upon leaving the program.The final rule permits a Participant to request, and receive, an increasein its approved 8(a) support level, but only if it can demonstrate thatit has increased its capacity and capability to the point that its currentlyapproved 8(a) support level is inappropriate. In addition, the increasedcapacity and capability must be to the point that any approved increasein 8(a) support would not commit the entire increased capacity of the concern(i.e., after increasing its 8(a) support level, the Participant would stillbe able to perform additional non-8(a) contracts).In measuring whether a Participant has reached its approved 8(a) supportlevel during any program year, the regulations (andSection; 124.312(b)(6)for firms in the developmental stage and andSection; 124.312(c)(9) for firmsin the transitional stage) state that the dollar value of the base yearof all contracts awarded during that program year (excluding options onsuch contracts which would be exercisable in one or more subsequent programyears) will be added to the dollar value of all options and other modificationsaffecting price that are exercised during that program year. Options andmodifications are counted in the program year during which they are exercised.If an option or modification were exercised in the same program year inwhich the base year of an 8(a) contract was awarded, then both the baseyear and option/modification would be counted in that program year. If,however, an option or modification is exercised in a subsequent programyear, only the base year of the 8(a) contract would be counted in determining8(a) support received. In such a case, the dollar value of the option ormodification would be counted in the program year in which the option/modificationwas exercised.Several commenters felt that the measurement of support levels should bebased on revenues instead of on the value of contracts awarded during theyear. They reasoned that this change was particularly needed in the caseof indefinite quantity contracts where a ceiling dollar amount might neverby reached. In such a case, if a ceiling dollar figure is counted towarda firm's support level and the procuring agency's needs under the contractdo not come close to that figure, the 8(a) firm could be penalized (i.e.,it might not have been eligible for other 8(a) contracts because it hadreached its approved support level). SBA agrees that the application ofthis provision in the indefinite quantity contract context should be clarified.In this regard, the final rule now specifies that in the case of an indefinitequantity contract having a guaranteed minimum, only the guaranteed minimumdollar amount is counted against a concern's approved 8(a) support level.SBA does not, however, believe that the support level measurement shouldbe changed from contract value to revenues. If such a change were made,adherence to a firm's approved support level could not be determined untilafter the program year ended. In which case, it would be too late to restrict8(a) awards because the firm would have exceeded its approved support level.Restrictions in the subsequent program year would not be supportable becausethe firm would have a newly established approved support level for eachyear.Section 124.313 repeats the provision of SBA's previously existing regulationsthat SBA will certify its own competence to perform the 8(a) requirement.This certification, required by law as a condition of 8(a) contract awardfor both sole source and competitive 8(a) contracts, should not be confusedwith the entirely distinct Certificate of Competency (COC) available underthe Small Business Act and part 125 of this Title. The COC program doesnot apply to 8(a) contracts. One commenter questioned whether an 8(a) firmcould appeal SBA's refusal to certify its competency on behalf of a specificconcern. The regulations call for no such appeal process. Practically,however, the firm's views concerning this issue will be heard. In a solesource 8(a) contract, the firm will generally be involved in negotiationswith the procuring agency. If the procuring agency is not satisfied thatthe concern has the capacity or capability to perform the requirement,it will so notify SBA. SBA will discuss the matter with the firm and theprocuring agency to determine whether the firm can perform the contract.The firm's, as well as the agency's, views will be considered in this regard.If SBA concurs with the procuring agency, the procuring agency will beauthorized to negotiate with another 8(a) firm. If SBA determines thatthe firm can perform, but the procuring agency still disagrees, SBA canappeal that decision to the head of the procuring agency.Section 124.314 requires the selected 8(a) concern in either a sole sourceor competitive 8(a) award to perform a certain percentage of the requirementwith its own work force. The percentages for service and supply contractsare taken directly from section 8(a)(14)(A) of the Small Business Act,15 U.S.C. 637(a)(14)(A), as amended by Public Law 99-661. In addition,section 8(a)(14)(C) of the Small Business Act requires SBA to establishperformance of work requirements for general and specialty construction.This rule requires an 8(a) contractor to perform at least 15 percent ofthe cost of the contract, not including the cost of materials, with itsown employees for a general construction contract, and at least 25% ofthe cost of the contract, not including the cost of materials, with itsown employees for a specialty construction contract. These are the samepercentage of work requirements that the 8(a) regulations have historicallyrequired for general and specialty trade construction contracts. The ruleclarifies that work done by an 8(a) concern's subsidiary, even if whollyowned, does not count in determining whether the applicable performanceof requirement is being fulfilled. While a few commenters objected to theinclusion of this clarification in the regulations, SBA did not adopt thesecomments in as much as this provision is based on an opinion of SBA's Officeof General Counsel and represents the Agency's past practice regardingsubsidiaries.One commenter also suggested that there be a separate lower performanceof work requirement for architect and engineering services. Such a requirementwould be contrary to section 8(a)(14)(A) of the Small Business Act, asamended by Public Law 99-661. That section applies to all services, excludingconstruction. Architect and engineering services are not excluded fromthat requirement.Section 124.315 defines what constitutes ``fair market price'' for 8(a)contract purposes. This section is taken almost verbatim from section 303(e)of the Business Opportunity Development Reform Act of 1988. SBA receivedlittle comment on this section and it is unchanged from the proposed regulations.Section 124.316 authorizes SBA to delegate, by the use of special clausesin the price and subcontract, the responsibility for administering an 8(a)subcontract to the procuring agency. The proposed rule excluded certainactions from those that could be delegated to the procuring agency by SBA.Procuring agencies felt that they should have administration functionswith respect to the exercise of options and modifications. SBA agrees withrespect to options and has deleted the reference to options within theprovisions of actions that SBA will not delegate to procuring agencies.SBA also agrees that the exercise of modifications within the scope ofthe contract is within the authority of the procuring agency contractingofficer. However, modifications outside the scope of the contract are,in effect, new contracts which need SBA's concurrence. SBA has seen manyinstances where a modification clearly outside the scope of the originalcontract has been exercised by the procuring agency (without any SBA involvementand many times without notice to SBA) to permit an 8(a) firm which hasexited the program to perform work it would otherwise not have been eligibleto perform.SBA has deleted modifications from the list of actions which SBA will notdelegate to procuring agencies. SBA believes that andSection;124.318, dealingwith the exercise of modifications beyond the scope of the original 8(a)contract, is sufficient to ensure SBA's involvement and concurrence insuch actions. SBA also believes that its second concern with regard tomodifications, that many times SBA does not receive copies of modificationsof 8(a) contracts, will be remedied by an addition requiring such noticein the FAR.Although decisions to terminate a contract are to be made by the procuringagency contracting officer, SBA should be involved in the process becauseit can often prevent a default from occurring by providing technical and/ormanagerial assistance to the performing 8(a) concern. SBA believes thatsuch involvement is ensured by the provisions of andSection;124.319 and,thus, has deleted terminations from this section. Comments were made thatSBA's concurrence should be required before novations can be entered andwith regard to all matters pertaining to advance payments. SBA concurs,and has left these two actions as actions that cannot be delegated to procuringagencies.Section 124.317 provides for termination of a contract for convenienceif the disadvantaged owner(s) of the 8(a) concern performing the contracttransfer(s) ownership of the concern. This section is taken directly fromsection 407 of the Business Opportunity Development Reform Act of 1988and implements the requirement that a contract be performed by the 8(a)firm that initially received the contract award. The SBA Administratoris authorized to waive this requirement under certain specified conditions.Several commenters questioned who could request a waiver to be grantedby the SBA Administrator. The final rule clarifies that either the 8(a)Participant which was awarded the 8(a) contract or the procuring agencymay request a waiver. Generally, this request must be made prior to therelinquishment of ownership and control by the original 8(a) awardee unless,pursuant to andSection;124.317(d), the head of the procuring agency certifiesthat termination of the contract would severely impair the attainment ofthe agency's program objectives or missions. In such case, a request fora waiver by the procuring agency may be considered subsequent to the changein ownership and control. The decision to grant a waiver is still statutorilyvested solely in the SBA Administrator. In addition, where the change inownership and control is due to the death or incapacity of an individual(s)upon whom eligibility is based, the request for a waiver may be made assoon as possible after the occurrence of such event pursuant to andSection;124.317(c).SBA also wishes to clarify that waivers may be requested and granted, for``changes in ownership and control'' or for ``performance'' of specificcontracts. A waiver for a change of ownership, if granted, applies to all8(a) contracts being performed by the concern (i.e., such a waiver authorizesan 8(a) concern to continue performance on all of its 8(a) contracts.)A waiver relating to the performance of a speciic contract is just that.The Participant is authorized to continue performance on the 8(a) contractfor which the waiver was granted. If a waiver for a change in ownershipis not granted, the 8(a) concern must obtain a waiver of performance foreach 8(a) contract it seeks to perform after the change of ownership andcontrol occurs.Several commenters noted that this provision was not limited in its applicationto contracts entered into on or after October 1, 1989 as set forth in theBusiness Opportunity Development Reform Act of 1988. SBA has clarifiedthe final rule to so limit the application of this provision. As such,this provision does not apply to previously awarded 8(a) contracts or tocontracts which may yet be awarded prior to October 1, 1989. A few commentersalso believed that there should be discretion in whether to terminate an8(a) contract for convenience where there is a change in ownership andcontrol. The statute does not give such flexibility, and, therefore, SBAhas not adopted this comment. Conversely, several commenters felt thatthe termination should be for default instead of convenience (so that reprocurementcosts, etc., would not be borne by the Government) where the concern wasno longer owned and controlled by disadvantaged individuals. In such instances,termination for convenience is statutorily required and cannot be changedby SBA in these regulations. Section 124.318 incorporates into the regulations opinions of the SBA'sGeneral Counsel concerning the exercise of options and modifications. Specifically,this section treats the exercise of an unpriced option or a modificationbeyond the scope of the initial 8(a) as a new contracting action. As such,if a concern has exited the 8(a) program or is other than small under thesize standard corresponding to the SIC code for the requirement, the optionor modification cannot be exercised. If, however, the concern were stilla Program Participant and still a small business under the size standardcorresponding to the SIC code for the requirement, negotiations concerningthe modification or pricing the option could be entered into and, if afair and reasonable price is negotiated, the option or modification couldbe exercised. Alternatively, a priced option or a modification within thescope of the initial 8(a) contract award could be exercised whether ornot the concern that received the award has exited the 8(a) program andwhether the concern has grown large under the size standard correspondingto the SIC code for the requirement. One commenter noted that a modificationbeyond the scope of the initial 8(a) award should not be exercised evenif the concern were still a Program Participant and still a small businessunder the size standard corresponding to the SIC code for the requirementwhere the value of the modification exceeds the applicable threshold amountset forth in andSection; 124.311. SBA concurs. As long as such a modificationis considered a new contracting action, if it exceeds the applicable thresholdamount, it can only be accepted by SBA for competition among eligible 8(a)concerns. Although not commented on, the same rationale applies to unpricedoptions. Consequently, the final rule has been amended to specify thatan unpriced option or modification beyond the scope of the contract cannotbe exercised in any case where the anticipated value of the option or modificationexceeds the threshold amount for the concern wishing to exercise it. SBAmay only accept such requirement for competition among eligible 8(a) concerns.Section 124.319 sets forth the procedures for terminations of 8(a) contractsfor both default and convenience. These provisions, with one exception,are identical to those previously contained in andSection; 124.302(d). Theonly exception is that, as noted above in andSection; 124.317, a terminationfor convenience must be initiated whenever the disadvantaged owner(s) ofan 8(a) concern transfer(s) ownership of the concern to any other partyand the SBA Administrator does not grant a waiver pursuant to the exceptionsset forth in andSection; 124.317. Aside from a few comments relating to theprovision relating to contract transfers, this section was not commentedon. Section 124.320 addresses disputes and appeals. Paragraph (a) speaks tocontract disputes generally. Disputes arising between an 8(a) subcontractorand a procuring agency contracting officer will generally be decided unilaterallyby the procuring agency contracting officer. Disputes arising out of mattersrelating to advance payments or business development expense funds willbe decided unilaterally by SBA's contracting offices. For disputes arisingout of construction contracts where SBA has waived bonding pursuant toandSection; 124.305, the proposed rule specified that the contracting officerdeciding the dispute will be that as agreed between SBA and the procuringagency. Comment was received objecting to this provision. Commenters feltthat the procuring agency contracting officer should always be the officialdeciding disputes concerning performance. SBA agrees with that comment.The proposed rule intended that the procuring agency contracting officerdecide such disputes. The proposal was also intended to permit the SBAcontracting officer to decide disputes concerning the disbursement of fundsfrom the special bank account established to protect suppliers of the 8(a)concern. That clarification has been made in this final rule. Participantshave the right to appeal contracting officer decisions under the ContractDisputes Act of 1978. Paragraph (b) describes the conditions and procedures for appeal by SBAto the head of a procuring agency. This paragraph clarifies that SBA isauthorized to appeal both the decision not to set aside a requirement forthe 8(a) program and the terms and conditions of a contract already setaside for the program. No specific comments were received concerning thisparagraph and it remains unchanged in the final rule.  Section 124.321 sets forth the requirements by which a Program Participantmay enter joint venture agreements to perform 8(a) contracts. Several commentersobjected to the requirement that SBA's size regulations apply to the jointventure entity. While the 8(a) program is designed to develop small businessesowned and controlled by disadvantaged individuals, it must be rememberedthat 8(a) subcontracts must be awarded to small business entities. If an8(a) concern is not small, either in its own right or because of affiliation,it cannot receive an 8(a) award. If an 8(a) concern wishes to be involvedwith a large concern in an 8(a) contracting matter, to gain experiencein a certain area or for another reason, it can subcontract a portion ofthe performance of the 8(a) contract (in accordance with the percentagesset forth in andSection; 124.413) to the large concern. It cannot, however,joint venture with that concern. Failure to comply with the requirementsof this section with respect to performance and/or control of the jointventure project may subject the firm to Program termination proceedings.In response to comments, SBA has also added a new paragraph in the finalrule concerning required performance of work percentages by the 8(a) partyto the joint venture. Section 124.321(f) requires the 8(a) partner(s) toan eligible 8(a) joint venture to perform the applicable percentages ofwork required by andSection; 124.314. For example, in a professional servicescontract, at least 50% of the cost of contract performance incurred forlabor must be expended for employees of the 8(a) partner(s) to the jointventure. Performance by the other joint venturer(s) does not satisfy thisrequirement. To permit performance by other joint venturers to count towardthe performance of work requirements imposed by andSection; 124.314 wouldbe to permit circumvention of the subcontracting limitations through thejoint venture mechanism.Section 124.401 addresses advance payments. The requirements set forthin this section are substantively the same as those formerly used by SBAin authorizing and administering advance payments. The former regulationhas been reworded where necessary for clarity. In addition, several provisionswhich previously appeared only in SBA's Standard Operating Procedures orpolicy guidelines have been added to the regulations. This section alsoincorporates the provisions formerly appearing in andSection; 124.403 concerningletters of credit. Again, the substance of the regulation dealing withletters of credit has not been changed, but it has been incorporated intothe advance payment section for ease of use, understanding and clarity.Several commenters recommended that advance payments be authorized onlyin connection with sole source 8(a) awards and not for competitive 8(a)awards, noting that firms lacking financial capacity would otherwise submitoffers in response to a competitive 8(a) solicitation with an expectationof obtaining financing through advance payments. The commenters believedthat such a practice would lead to unfair advantages in an 8(a) competition.SBA agrees and has inserted a new andSection; 124.401(a)(3) which limitsadvance payments to sole source 8(a) contracts.SBA has also clarified that options are not included when determining theamount of advance payments that may be authorized (see andSection; 124.401(a)(4)).While SBA has never directly authorized advance payments in excess of thevalue of the base contract, we are aware that a few such advance paymentshave been made. There have been several cases where advance payments havebeen given in excess of the base contract, in anticipation of options tothe contract, only to have the procuring agency not exercise the options.In such a situation, SBA is left in the precarious position of seekingrepayment in excess of the value of the entire contract. The rule has beenamended to prevent this situation from arising.Section 124.402 addresses Business Development Expense (BDE). This sectiongoverns those Program Participants that are performing contracts for whichBDE was given prior to the expiration of the BDE program. As previouslynoted, the newly authorized loan program set forth in andSection; 122.57of this title is intended to replace BDE. The granting of BDE is no longerauthorized after June 1, 1989, the effective date of the statutory provisionauthorizing the loan program. No comments were received concerning thesubstance of these provisions.Section 124.403 (proposed andSection; 124.501), Development assistance program,and andSection; 124.404 (proposed andSection; 124.502), Small Business andCapital Ownership Development Program are identical to andSection;andSection;124.501 and 124.502 of the former regulations, respectively. No commentswere received concerning these sections and, except for typographical corrections,they have not been changed in this final rule.Section 124.501 (proposed andSection; 124.601) sets forth those reportingrequirements not set forth in other sections. This section states requirementswhich are mandated by the reform legislation. Only a few comments werereceived from the public concerning this section. These comments recommendedchanges which were contrary to the statutory mandates and, thus, have notbeen adopted.<ITAG tagnum="85">Compliance With Executive Orders 12291 and 12612, the Regulatory FlexibilityAct (5 U.S.C. 601, et seq.), and the Paperwork Reduction Act (44 U.S.C.Ch 35)</ITAG>For purposes of Executive Order 12291 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act,this rule is a major rule which is likely to have a significant economiceffect on a substantial number of small entities. As discussed in the initialregulatory flexibility analysis contained in the proposed rule (54 FR 12071),this rule is necessary to implement the Business Opportunity DevelopmentReform Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-656) and to implement changes in Agencypolicy relating to the 8(a) program. A summary of the public comments onthe proposed rule and SBA's actions as a result of such comments is setforth in the preceding section of this preamble. SBA submits that thereare no alternatives, which were not highlighted in the summary of the publiccomments, which could implement the policies and legal requirements addressedby this rule in a more cost effective manner or in a manner which wouldhave less economic effect on small businesses.The potential costs and benefits of the rule as well as the net benefitof the rule are unchanged from those set forth in the preamble to the proposedrule (54 FR 12070-12071). Projected annual purchases through the 8(a) Programas revised by implementation of the Reform Act are estimated at approximately$4 billion. The cost of implementing this rule is estimated to be approximately$11 million, to be used primarily to establish and implement new rulesand guidelines and to purchase new equipment and to hire and/or train personnel.The net benefits of the rule realized by program participants through theirgreater access to and ownership of productive capital as a result of 8(a)program participation. In addition, the national defense production basewill be strengthened by assisting 8(a) participants which perform defensecontracts to develop into stronger, better established and more competitivebusinesses.In the preamble to the proposed rule, SBA noted 5 sections of the proposedrule which contained new or changed paperwork requirements. The paperworkrequirements have been made a part of this final rule and relate to thefollowing: business plan (andSection; 124.301), annual reviews and continuingprogram eligibility (andSection;andSection; 124.111 and 124.302), reportingand verification of 8(a) and non-8(a) business activity (andSection; 124.312)and capability statements (andSection; 124.501, proposed as andSection; 124.601).Prior to use in the 8(a) Program, these requirements will be submittedto the Office of Management and Budget for approval under the PaperworkReduction Act.Finally, SBA certifies that this rule does not require a Federalism Assessmentunder Executive Order 12612.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 13 CFR Part 124</ITAG>Government procurement, Minority business, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Technical assistance.Accordingly, pursuant to the authority set forth in sections 7(j) and 8(a)of the Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. 636(j) and 637(a), SBA hereby revisessubpart A, part 124 of title 13 of the Code of Federal Regulations to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 124_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for part 124 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 15 U.S.C. 634(b)(6), 636(j), 637(a), 637(d) and Pub.L. 99-661, sec. 1207, Pub. L. 100-656, and Pub. L. 101-37.</ITAG>2. Subpart A of part 124 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart A_Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.1 Scope of regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.2 Associate Administrator for Minority Small Business and CapitalOwnership Development.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.3 Division of Program Certification and Eligibility.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.4 Commission on Minority Business Development.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.5 Violations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.6 Penalties for misrepresentations and false statements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.7 Restrictions on fees for applicant and Participant representatives.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.100 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.101 The 8(a) program: General eligibility.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.102 Small business concern.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.103 Ownership requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.104 Control and management.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.105 Social disadvantage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.106 Economic disadvantage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.107 Potential for success.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.108 Additional 8(a) program eligibility requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.109 Ineligible businesses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.110 Program term.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.111 Continued 8(a) program eligibility.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.112 Concerns owned by Indian tribes, including Alaska Native Corporations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.113 Concerns owned by Native Hawaiian Organizations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.201 8(a) Program application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.202 Place of filing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.203 Servicing office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.204 Applicant representatives.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.205 Forms and documents required.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.206 Approval and decline of applications for 8(a) program admission.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.207 8(a) Program exist.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.208 Program graduation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.209 Program termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.210 Appeals to SBA's Office of Hearings and Appeals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.211 Suspension of program assistance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.300 Business development.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.301 Development of business plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.302 Review and modification of business plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.303 Stages of 8(a) program participation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.304 Statutory exemption from the Walsh-Healey Act.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.305 Statutory exemption from Miller Act bonds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.306 Financial assistance for skills training.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.307 Contractual assistance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.308 Procedures for obtaining and accepting procurements for the8(a) program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.309 Barriers to acceptance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.310 Approval of lower tier subcontractors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.311 8(a) competition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.312 Competitive business mix.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.313 Certification of SBA's competency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.314 Performance of work by the 8(a) concern.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.315 Fair market price for 8(a) awards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.316 Contract administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.317 Performance of contracts by original 8(a) concern.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.318 Exercise of options and modifications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.319 Contract termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.320 Disputes and appeals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.321 Joint venture agreements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.401 Advance payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.402 Business development expense.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.403 Development Assistance Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.404 Small Business and Capital Ownership Development Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">124.501 Miscellaneous reporting requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Scope of regulations.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> (1) These regulations implement sections 8(a) and 7(j)of the Small Business Act, as amended by the Business Opportunity DevelopmentReform Act of 1988, and Business Opportunity Development Reform Act TechnicalCorrections Act, (15 U.S.C. 637(a) and 636(j), as amended by Pub. L. 100-656and Pub. L. 101-37.). Sections 8(a) and 7(j) of the Small Business Actestablish the Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership DevelopmentProgram or 8(a) Program. The 8(a) Program is intended to be used exclusivelyfor business development purposes to help small businesses owned and controlledby socially and economically disadvantaged individuals, economically disadvantagedIndian tribes, including Alaska Native Corporations, and economically NativeHawaiian Organizations to compete on an equal basis in the mainstream ofthe American economy.(2)(i) Except as set forth in paragraphs (a)(2) (ii) and (iii) of thissection and andSection; 124.311(b) of this title, these regulations applyto all business concerns applying for or participating in the 8(a) programas of the effective date of the regulations. As noted, portions of theseregulations also apply to other Federal programs for which social and economicdisadvantaged status is a requirement of program eligibility. Such programsinclude, among others, the Small Disadvantaged Business (SDB) Set-asideand Bid Preference Programs authorized by section 1207(a) of Public Law99-661, and the Minority Small Business Subcontracting Program authorizedby section 8(d) of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. 637(d)).(ii) Applications in process as of the effective date of these regulations,including applications that have been declined but have not received finaldeterminations on requests for reconsideration, will not be subject tothe new provisions of andSection; 124.107(a) regarding length of time inbusiness or the new provisions of andSection; 124.109(b) which make franchisesineligible for 8(a) program participation. Such applicants will be subjectto Agency policy requirements regarding potential for success and ineligiblebusinesses which were in effect on the date of application.(iii) Procedures described in andSection; 124.210 relating to appeal of SBA'sdecline of an application are effective as to applications which are declined,after reconsideration, by the Associate Administrator for Minority SmallBusiness and Capital Ownership Development on or after the effective dateof these regulations. Procedures described in andSection;andSection; 124.208,124.209, 124.211, relating to Program graduation, Program termination andProgram suspension shall apply to concerns which SBA seeks to graduate,terminate or suspend but to which, as of the effective date of these regulations,an Order to Show Cause has not been issued pursuant to 13 CFR 124.110(k),124.112 and 124.113 of SBA's rules which were in effect on July 31, 1989.Proceedings relating to any concern to which SBA has issued an Order toShow Cause prior to the effective date of these regulations shall be governedby 13 CFR part 124 and part 134 as it existed on the date of the issuanceof the Order to Show Cause.(b) <T3>The 8(a) and 7(j) programs.</T3> (1) Section 8(a) authorizes SBA toenter into all types of contracts, including, but not limited to, contractsfor supplies, services, construction, research and development with otherGovernment departments and agencies and to subcontract the performanceof these contracts to small business concerns owned and controlled by sociallyand economically disadvantaged individuals, Indian tribes or Hawaiian NativeOrganizations.(2) Section 7(j) authorizes SBA to provide financial assistance to publicor private organizations to pay all or part of the cost of projects designedto provide technical or management assistance to individuals or small businessconcerns eligible for assistance under sections 7(i), 7(j)(10), and 8(a)of the Small Business Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Associate Administrator for Minority Small Business and Capital OwnershipDevelopment.</ITAG>The Associate Administrator for Minority Small Business and Capital OwnershipDevelopment (AA/MSBandamp;COD), who shall be an employee in the competitiveservice or in the Senior Executive Service, and a career appointee, isresponsible for the formulation and execution of the policies and programsunder sections 7(j) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act. The AA/MSBandamp;CODoperates under the ultimate supervision of, and is generally responsibleto, the Administrator of SBA.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Division of Program Certification and Eligibility.</ITAG>The Division of Program Certification and Eligibility (Division) withinthe Office of Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development(MSBandamp;COD) shall be responsible for handling all matters relating to8(a) program eligibility, termination and graduation from 8(a) programparticipation, and certifications of disadvantaged status for purposesof any program or activity conducted under the authority of section 8(d)of the Small Business Act or any Federal law that references such section.The Division, headed by a Director who shall report directly to the AA/MSBandamp;COD,shall have field offices within some or all of the Agency's regional offices.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Commission on Minority Business Development.</ITAG>A Commission on Minority Business Development (Commission) shall be establishedpursuant to section 505 of the Business Opportunity Development ReformAct of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-656). This Commission is authorized to reviewall Federal programs designed to promote the development of minority-ownedbusinesses in order to ascertain whether the congressionally describedgoals and purposes of such programs are being realized.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Violations.</ITAG>Willful violation by an applicant for admission to the section 8(a) programor an applicant for participation in the section 7(j) program or any ofSBA's regulations governing these or its other programs may result in theapplicant's denial of admission to the program. The nature and severityof any such violation will be considered by the AA/MSBandamp;COD in makinga determination on the admission of an applicant to the program.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Penalties for misrepresentations and false statements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Section 16 of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. 645)sets forth penalties for false statements and misrepresentations.(b) <T3>Misrepresentation of small business or small disadvantaged businessstatus. </T3>The Business Opportunity Development Reform Act of 1988 (Pub.L. 100-656) increased the penalties for intentional misrepresentation ofsmall business status or small disadvantaged business status. Generally,section 16(d) of the Small Business Act provides that any person or entitythat intentionally misrepresents the status of any concern or person asa ``small business concern'' or ``small business concern owned and controlledby socially and economically disadvantaged individuals'' in order to obtainfor him/herself or another any of the contracting opportunities set forthin paragraph (b)(1) of this section will be subject to the penalties setforth in paragraph (b)(2) of this section. The following contracting opportunitiesare subject to penalties for misrepresentation described in this section:(1)(i) A prime contract to be awarded pursuant to section 9 (Small BusinessInnovation Research Program authority) or section 15 (various small businessset-aside authorities) of the Small Business Act;(ii) A subcontract to be awarded pursuant to section 8(a) of the SmallBusiness Act;(iii) A subcontract that is to be included as part or all of a goal containedin a subcontracting plan required pursuant to section 8(d) of the SmallBusiness Act; or(iv) A prime or subcontract to be awarded as a result, or in furtherance,of any other provision of Federal law that specifically references section8(d) of the Small Business Act for a definition of program eligibility.(2) The following penalties apply for violations of this section:(i) A fine of not more than $500,000 or by imprisonment for not more than10 years, or both;(ii) The administrative remedies prescribed by the Program Fraud CivilRemedies Act of 1986 (31 U.S.C. 3801-3812) and implementing regulationsin part 142 of this chapter;(iii) Suspension and debarment as specified in 13 CFR part 145 of subpart9.4 of the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR) (48 CFR subpart 9.4), orany successor regulation, on the basis that such misrepresentation indicatesa lack of business integrity that seriously and directly affects the presentresponsibility of a person or entity to transact business wtih the Federalgovernment; and(iv) Ineligibility for participation in any program or activity conductedunder the authority of the Small Business Act or the Small Business InvestmentAct of 1958 (15 U.S.C. 661, <T3>et seq.</T3>) for a period not to exceed 3 years.(c) <T3>Misrepresentation concerning compliance with competitive mix targets.</T3>Section 16(f) of the Small Business Act, as amended by Public Law100-656, imposes the penalties set forth in paragraph (b)(2) of this sectionon any person or entity that falsely certifies past compliance with therequirements of section 7(j)(10)(I) of the Small Business Act which dealswith competitive business mix and attainment of business activity targets(<T3>see </T3>section 124.312).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Restrictions on fees for applicant and Participant representatives.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The compensation received by any agent or representativeof an 8(a) applicant or Program Participant for assisting the applicantin obtaining 8(a) certification or for assisting the Program Participantin obtaining 8(a) contracts must be reasonable in light of the service(s)performed by the agent or representative.(b) <T3>Contingent fees. </T3>(1) The fee charged by any agent or representativeof an 8(a) applicant for assisting the applicant in obtaining 8(a) certificationcannot be contingent upon the applicant/Participant receiving 8(a) certification.(2) Payment of a contingent fee for assisting a Program Participant inobtaining any 8(a) contract is generally prohibited as contrary to publicpolicy, but is permitted if the payment is made by a Program Participantto a ``bona fide employee'' or a ``bona fide agency,'' as defined by theFAR, 48 CFR subpart 3.4, and section 124.100.(c) <T3>Fees as a percentage of contract award. </T3>A Program Participantis prohibited from agreeing to pay or paying a fee to any agent or representativefor assistance in obtaining a specific 8(a) contract award, if such feeis based on a percentage of the contract award, either in terms of totalvalue of the award, profit, or otherwise.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.100 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><T3>Alaska Native </T3>means a citizen of the United States who is a personof one-fourth degree or more Alaskan Indian (including Tsimshian Indiansnot enrolled in the Metlaktla Indian Community), Eskimo, or Aleut blood,or a combination thereof. The term includes, in the absence of proof ofa minimum blood quantum, any citizen who is regarded as an Alaska Nativeby a Native village or Native group and whose father or mother is regardedas an Alaska Native.<T3>Alaska Native Corporation </T3>means any Regional Corporation, VillageCorporation, Urban Corporation, or Group Corporation organized under thelaws of the State of Alaska in accordance with the Alaska Native ClaimsSettlement Act, as amended (43 U.S.C. 1601, <T3>et seq.</T3>)<T3>Application</T3> or<T3> 8(a) application</T3> means all forms and attachments required bySBA to be completed by an applicant for the 8(a) program for the purposeof establishing program eligibility.<T3>Bona fide agency</T3> means an established commercial or selling agency,maintained by a contractor (or subcontractor where SBA is the contractor)for the purpose of securing business that neither exerts nor proposes toexert improper influence to solicit or obtain government contracts norholds itself out as being able to obtain any government contract or contractsthrough improper influence.<T3>Bona fide employee,</T3> means a person, who is employed by a contractor(or subcontractor where SBA is the contractor) and subject to the contractor's,(or where SBA is the contractor, the subcontractor's) supervision; controlas to time, place, and manner of performance; and who neither exerts norproposes to exert improper influence to solicit or obtain government contractsnor holds himself/herself out as being able to obtain any government contractor contracts through improper influence.<T3>Business Opportunity Specialist (BOS)</T3> means the SBA field officeemployee responsible for providing business development assistance to ProgramParticipants pursuant to sections 7(j) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act(15 U.S.C. 636(j) 637(a)).<T3>Business plan</T3> means the business plan documents as submitted bythe 8(a) concern and approved in writing by SBA which include the objectives,goals, and business projections of an 8(a) concern, and all written amendmentsor modifications which have also been approved in writing by SBA.<T3>Certification of SBA's competency</T3> means a certification by SBA,based on its assessment of an 8(a) concern's competency to perform, thatSBA is competent to perform the requirements as stated in the contract.The assessment does not require a special investigation or the issuanceof a Certificate of Competency (COC) as provided for elsewhere in theseregulations under the authority of section 8(b)(7) (A), (B) and (C) ofthe Small Business Act.<T3>Concern</T3> is defined in part 121 of this title.<T3>Days</T3> means calendar days unless otherwise specified.<T3>Descendant of an Alaska Native</T3> means a lineal descendant of anAlaska Native, or of an individual who would have been an Alaska Nativeif such individual were alive on December 18, 1971, or an adoptee of anAlaska Native, or of a descendant of an Alaska Native whose adoption occurredprior to his or her majority (age 18 in the State of Alaska), and is recognizedat law or in equity.<T3>Disadvantaged individual</T3> means an individual who SBA has determinedto be socially and economically disadvantaged in connection with a concern'sapplication for or participation in the 8(a) program.<T3>Fixed Program Participation Term</T3> means that ultimate time periodduring which a concern may have participated in the 8(a) program underPublic Law 96-481, (April 21, 1982).<T3>Graduation </T3>means completion of 8(a) Program Participation pursuantto andSection; 124.208 prior to expiration of the Program Term because ofsubstantial achievement of the targets, objectives and goals containedin the Participant's business plan.<T3>Immediate family member </T3>means father, mother, husband, wife, son,daughter, brother, sister, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law,brother-in-law, sister-in-law, step-father, step-mother, step-son, step-daughter,step-brother, step-sister, half-brother and half-sister.<T3>Indian tribe </T3>means any Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organizedgroup or community of Indians, including any Alaska Native Corporation,as defined in this section, which is recognized as eligible for the specialprograms and services provided by the United States to Indians becauseof their status as Indians, or is recognized as such by the State in whichsuch tribe, band, nation, group, or community resides. <T3>See, </T3>definition of ``tribally-owned concern.''<T3>Joint venture agreement </T3>means an agreement between an eligible8(a) concern and another small business concern, whether or not an 8(a)participant, solely for the purpose of performing a specific 8(a) contract.<T3>See </T3>andSection; 124.321(h) for joint venture agreements with tribally-owned8(a) concerns.<T3>Local buy item </T3>means a supply, service (nonprofessional/professional)or product purchased to meet the specific needs of one user in one location.Examples include the purchase of services, such as custodial, trash hauling,ADP support, auditing and training as well as construction work to be performedin one location and single user manufactured items.<T3>Manufacturer </T3>means a concern which owns, operates, or maintainsa factory or establishment that produces on the premises the materials,supplies, articles, or equipment described in the business plan. In orderto qualify as a manufacturer, a concern must be able to show that it isan established manufacturer of particular goods or goods of general characterwhich may be sought by the Government, or, if it is newly entering intosuch manufacturing activity, that it has made all necessary prior arrangementsfor space, equipment, and personnel to perform manufacturing operations.A new firm which has made such definite commitments in order to enter amanufacturing business which will later qualify it for the 8(a) program,shall not be barred from 8(a) approval because it has not yet done anymanufacturing; however, this interpretation is not intended to qualifya firm whose arrangements to use space, equipment, or personnel are contingentupon 8(a) approval. This definition is based upon the Walsh-Healey PublicContracts Act, 41 U.S.C. 35-45.<T3>National buy item </T3>means an item or service purchased to meet theneeds of a system where supply control, inventory management, and procurementresponsibility have been assigned to a central procuring activity to supportthe needs of one or more users of the item in two or more locations. Examplesinclude military clothing purchased by the Defense Personnel Support Centerof the Department of Defense, paint or hand tools purchased by the FederalSupply Service of the General Services Administration, medical suppliespurchased by the Veterans Administration, or studies, evaluations, consultingservices or similar services purchased by the headquarters office of aDepartment or agency for use in two or more commands or field offices.<T3>Native Hawaiian </T3>means any individual whose ancestors were nativesprior to 1778, of the area which now comprises the State of Hawaii.<T3>Native Hawaiian Organization </T3>means any community service organizationserving Native Hawaiians in the State of Hawaii which(1) Is a not-for-profit organization chartered by the State of Hawaii,(2) Is controlled by Native Hawaiians, and(3) Whose business activities will principally benefit such Native Hawaiians.<T3>Negative control </T3>is defined in part 121 of this title.<T3>Nondisadvantaged individual </T3>means any individual who does notclaim disadvantaged status, does not qualify as disadvantaged, or uponwhose disadvantaged status applicant concern does not rely in qualifyingfor 8(a) program participation. An individual who has used his/her disadvantagedstatus in previously qualifying a concern for 8(a) program participationis considered a nondisadvantaged individual for all other 8(a) programpurposes.<T3>Non-8(a) business activity target </T3>means the amount of non-8(a)revenue forecasted in a Participant's approved business plan during eachyear of its participation in the 8(a) program. During the developmentalstage of program participation, these targets are goals of non-8(a) businessthat a Participant must strive to achieve and may be either a percentageof total revenues or a specified dollar figure. During the transitionalstage of program participation these targets must be expressed as a percentageof total revenues, as set forth in andSection; 124.312(c), that a Participantis required to achieve in each year in the transitional stage.<T3>Open requirement </T3>means a requirement submitted to SBA by a procuringagency for possible 8(a) award without a particular 8(a) concern beingidentified as a candidate for the award. Open requirements can be for localbuy items or national buy items.<T3>Operational control </T3>means actual or constructive authority toestablish long and short term goals for the concern, and to manage theconcern's day-to-day operations.<T3>Personal net worth </T3>means the net value of the assets of an individualremaining after total liabilities are deducted. <T3>See </T3>andSection; 124.106.<T3>Primary industry classification </T3>means the four digit StandardIndustrial Classification (SIC) code designation which best describes theprimary of industry the 8(a) applicant or Participant as defined in part121 of this title.<T3>Principal place of business </T3>means the location at which the businessrecords of the applicant concern are maintained and the location at whichthe individual who manages the concern's day-to-day operations spends themajority of his/her working hours.<T3>Program Participant (Participant </T3>or <T3>8(a) Participant) </T3>means a small business concern participatingin the Small Business and Capital Ownership Development Program establishedby sections 7(j) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act (15 U.S.C. 636(j) and637(a)).<T3>Program suspension </T3>means the temporary cessation of all 8(a) programassistance pursuant to andSection; 124.211 of these regulations.<T3>Program year </T3>means a 12-month period of an 8(a) Participant'sProgram Participation. The first program year begins on the date that theconcern is certified to participate in the 8(a) program and ends one yearlater. Each subsequent program year begins on the Participant's anniversaryof program certification and runs for one 12-month period.<T3>Regular dealer </T3>means regular dealer as defined by the Walsh-HealeyPublic Contracts Act, 41 U.S.C. 35-45, and Department of Labor regulationsfound at 41 CFR 50-201.101, 50-206.53, and 50-206.54.<T3>Requirement </T3>means a contract opportunity from a Federal procuringagency to acquire articles, equipment, supplies, services, materials orconstruction work.<T3>Same or similar line of business </T3>means all business activitieswithin the same two-digit ``Major Group'' of the Standard Industrial Classification(SIC) System (set forth in the SIC Manual), as the primary industry classificationof the applicant concern.<T3>Self-marketing </T3>of a requirement occurs when an 8(a) firm identifiesa requirement that has not been committed to the 8(a) program and, throughits marketing efforts causes the procuring agency to offer that specificrequirement to the 8(a) program on its behalf. A firm which identifiesand markets a requirement which is subsequently offered to the 8(a) programas an open requirement or on behalf of another 8(a) Participant has not``self-marketed'' the requirement within the meaning of these regulations.<T3>Termination </T3>means the permanent cessation of 8(a) Program Participationprior to the expiration of the concern's Program Term for good cause pursuantto andSection; 124.209.<T3>Tribally-owned concern </T3>means any concern at least 51 percent ownedby an Indian tribe as defined in this section.<T3>Unconditional ownership </T3>means ownership that is not subject toconditions precedent, conditions subsequent, executory agreements, votingtrusts, shareholder agreements or other similar arrangements which serveto allow the primary benefits of Program Participation to accrue to entitiesor individuals other than upon whom 8(a) program eligibility is based.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">The 8(a) program: General eligibility.</ITAG>(a) In order to be eligible to participate in the 8(a) program, an applicantconcern and an individual upon whom 8(a) eligibility is based must meetall of the eligibility criteria set forth in andSection; 124.102 throughandSection; 124.109 hereunder. An applicant concern owned and controlledby an Indian tribe must meet the requirements set forth in andSection; 124.112and in andSection;andSection; 124.102 through 124.109 as applicable. An applicantconcern owned and controlled by a Native Hawaiian Organization must meetthe requirements set forth in andSection; 124.113 and in andSection;andSection;124.102 through 124.109, as applicable. All determinations by the AA/MSBandamp;CODmade pursuant to andSection;andSection; 124.102, 124.103, 124.104, 124.105,124.106, and 124.107 shall be in writing, setting forth the findings basedon relevant facts and in accordance with law and regulations, upon whichthe determination is based. An applicant concern which is declined 8(a)program admission may request a reconsideration of such decline, as setforth in andSection; 124.206. If the application is declined on reconsiderationbased solely on a negative finding of social disadvantage, economic disadvantage,ownership or control, such decline may be appealed by an unsuccessful applicantto the Office of Hearings and Appeals. If no reconsideration is sought,or if after reconsideration, the application is declined based in wholeor in part on a ground other than a negative finding of social disadvantage,economic disadvantage, ownership or control, the written decline of theAA/MSBandamp;COD is final and not subject to appeal. Appeal procedures fora decline of program admission by the AA/MSBandamp;COD and grounds for whichsuch an appeal may be brought are set forth in andSection; 124.210 and Part134 of this Title. The written decision of the Office of Hearings and Appealsshall be the final Agency decision. A concern which has been declined for8(a) program admission may reapply for program admission 12 months afterthe date of the final Agency decision to decline.(b) In order to continue its participation in the 8(a) program, a concerncertified for Program Participation on or after the effective date of theseregulations must continue to meet all eligibility requirements describedin andSection; 124.102 through andSection; 124.109, andSection; 124.111(a), andandSection; 124.112 or andSection; 124.113, if applicable. In order to continueits participation in the 8(a) program, a concern certified for programparticipation prior to the effective date of these regulations must complywith the requirements of andSection;andSection; 124.102 through 124.109, 124.11(a)and 124.112, if applicable, which have been previously required by regulation,policy or procedure. Within 12 months of the effective date of these regulations,such concerns must also come into compliance with the requirements of paragraph(a) of this section which have not been previously required by regulation,policy or procedure. Failure to do so may lead to termination or graduationpursuant to andSection;andSection; 124.208 and 124.209.(c)(1) It is SBA's intent to process applications for participation ina fair and consistent manner and to ensure that 8(a) program participationis limited to eligible individuals and concerns. Toward that end, SBA invitesthe participation of the public in preventing fraud and assuring the integrityof the 8(a) program.(2) The AA/MSBandamp;COD shall cause to be reviewed any determination thatan individual, applicant concern or Participant is eligible to participatein the 8(a) program whenever a member of the public submits credible evidencethat(i) Such determination was based on fraudulent information;(ii) SBA did not follow the requirements of these regulations in renderingthe determination; or(iii) The individual or concern has undergone one or more changes whichhave rendered it ineligible for 8(a) Program Participation.(3) The AA/MSBandamp;COD shall determine whether the facts developed duringany such review warrant further action. The member of the public whoseinformation gave rise to the review shall be advised of SBA's findings,consistent with laws protecting confidentiality.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.102</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Small business concern.</ITAG>(a) In order to be approved for participation in the 8(a) program, an applicantconcern must qualify as a small business concern as defined in part 121of this title, and, if a tribally-owned concern, as additionally definedin andSection; 124.112. The particular size standard to be applied will bebased on the primary industry classification of the applicant concern.A concern owned by a Native Hawaiian Organization must also qualify asa small business concern, but the circumstance of ownership by the NativeHawaiian Organization shall not, by itself, cause affiliation with theNative Hawaiian Organization.(b) If the AA/MSBandamp;COD is unable to determine that an applicant concernqualifies as a small business, the AA/MSBandamp;COD may deny the concern'sapplication for 8(a) program admission or may request a formal size determinationfrom the appropriate regional office. If the application is so denied,the small business concern may request a formal size determination fromthe appropriate regional office pursuant to part 121 of this title. Sizedeterminations by an SBA regional office may be appealed to SBA's Officeof Hearings and Appeals pursuant to part 121 of this title.(c) In order to continue to participate in the 8(a) program, a ProgramParticipant must qualify pursuant to the provisions of part 121 of thistitle as a small business under one or more of the SIC Codes containedin the concern's approved business plan.(d) Except for contracts awarded to joint ventures controlled by eligibleIndian tribes, under andSection;124.321, a Program Participant must certifythat it is a small business pursuant to part 121 of this title for thepurpose of performing each contract awarded under the authority of section8(a). SBA, in turn, will undertake to verify such certifications. In theevent that the SBA does not verify a certification, the Program Participantmay request a formal size determination from the appropriate SBA regionaloffice. Formal size determinations will be conducted in accordance withpart 121 of this title.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;124.103</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ownership requirements.</ITAG>Except for concerns owned by Indian tribes, Alaska Native Corporationsor Native Hawaiian Organizations, in order to be eligible to participatein the 8(a) program, an applicant concern must be one which is at least51 percent unconditionally owned by an individual(s) who is a citizen ofthe United States (specifically excluding permanent resident alien(s))and who is determined by SBA to be socially and economically disadvantaged.<T3>See </T3>andSection;124.100 for definition of unconditional ownership.Special ownership requirements for concerns owned by Indian tribes andAlaska Native Corporations are set forth in andSection;124.112. Ownershiprequirements for Native Hawaiian Organizations are set forth in andSection;124.113.(a) In the case of an applicant concern which is a partnership, 51 percentof the partnership interest must be unconditionally owned by an individual(s)determined by SBA to be socially and economically disadvantaged. Such unconditionalownership must be reflected in the concern's partnership agreement.(b) In the case of an applicant concern which is a corporation, 51 percentof each class of voting stock and 51 percent of the aggregate of all outstandingshares of stock must be unconditionally owned by an individual(s) determinedby SBA to be socially and economically disadvantaged.(c) SBA will not find unconditional ownership if socially and economicallydisadvantaged individual(s) asserts ownership of a concern on the basisof unexercised stock options or other arrangements.(d) When determining ownership for purposes of 8(a) program eligibility,SBA will consider options to purchase stock held by nondisadvantaged individualsor entities, or to rights to convert non-voting stock or debentures heldby nondisadvantaged individuals or entities into voting stock, to havebeen exercised. However, any potential ownership interests (such as optionsor warrants) held by investment companies licensed under the Small BusinessInvestment Act of 1958 shall not be treated as ownership interests untilexercised.(e)(1) The individual(s) upon whom eligibility is based must receive atleast 51 percent of the annual distribution of dividends paid on the votingstock of a corporate applicant concern;(2) In the event that the stock is sold, the individual(s) upon whom eligibilityis based must be entitled to receive 100 percent of the value of each shareof stock in his/her possession; and(3) In the event of dissolution of the corporation, the individual(s) uponwhom eligibility is based must be entitled to receive at least 51 percentof the retained earnings of the concern and 100 percent of the value ofeach share of stock in his/her possession.(f) One 8(a) concern may not hold more than a 10 percent equity ownershipinterest in any other 8(a) concern.(g) Except for partners or shareholders which are financial institutionslicensed or chartered by Federal, state or local government, includinginvestment companies which are licensed under the Small Business InvestmentAct of 1958, an individual, whether or not disadvantaged, or entity, who/whichis a partner, stockholder, officer and/or director in an 8(a) concern isprohibited from simultaneously holding an equity ownership interest exceeding10 percent in another 8(a) concern. In no case shall an ownership interestin an 8(a) concern held by any such financial institution exceed 49 percent.(h) a non-8(a) concern in the same or similar line of business is prohibitedfrom having an equity ownership interest in an 8(a) concern which exceeds10 percent.(i) An 8(a) business concern may continue participation in the programsubsequent to a change in its 8(a) ownership, provided that SBA gave priorwritten approval to such change. Where the change in 8(a) ownership representsless than a 10 percent interest in the concern or results from the deathor incapacity due to serious, long-term illness or injury of a disadvantagedprincipal, prior approval is not required; however, the concern shall notifySBA as soon as possible. Continued participation of the 8(a) concern undernew disadvantaged ownership requires SBA's determination that all individualand business eligibility requirements of these regulations are met by theconcern and the new owners.(j) A Program Participant's request for SBA's approval for the issuanceof a public offering will be treated as a request for a change of ownership.Such request will cause SBA to examine the concern's continued need foraccess to the business development resources of the 8(a) program.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;124.104</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Control and management.</ITAG>Except for concerns owned by Indian tribes. Alaska Native Corporations(ANCs) and Native Hawaiian Organizations as defined in andSection;124.100,an applicant concern's management and daily business operations must becontrolled by an owner(s) of the applicant concern who has (have) beendetermined to be socially and economically disadvantaged. (<T3>See </T3>andSection;124.112 for the requirements for tribally-owned entitiesand those owned by ANCs and andSection;124.113 for requirements for concernsowned by Native Hawaiian Organizations.) In order for a disadvantaged individualto be found to control the concern, that individual must have managerialor technical experience and competency directly related to the primaryindustry in which the applicant concern is seeking 8(a) certification.(a)(1) An applicant concern must be managed on a full-time basis by oneor more individuals who have been found by SBA to be socially and economicallydisadvantaged, and such person(s) must possess requisite management ortechnical capabilities as determined by SBA. In addition, for those industriesrequiring professional licensing (i.e., public accountancy, law, professionalengineering, etc.), SBA must determine that the applicant concern or individualsemployed by the applicant concern hold(s) the requisite license(s).(2) At least one socially and economically disadvantaged full-time mangermust hold the position of President or Chief Executive Officer. This precludesoutside employment or any other business interest by the individual whichconflicts with the management of the firm or hinders it in achieving theobjectives of its business development plan. Any disadvantaged person uponwhom 8(a) eligibility is based, who is engaged in the management and dailybusiness operations of the 8(a) concern and who wishes to engage in outsideemployment must notify SBA of the nature and anticipated duration of theoutside employment and obtain the written approval of SBA, prior to engagingin such employment. SBA will review such notification for compliance withthe requirement of day-to-day management and control of the 8(a) cencern.(b) The socially and economically disadvantaged individual(s) upon whomeligibility is based shall control the Board of Directors of an applicantor 8(a) concern, either in actual numbers of voting directors or throughweighted voting (e.g., in a concern having a two-person Board of Directorswhere one individual on the Board is disadvantaged and one is not, thedisadvantaged vote must be weighted_worth more than one vote_in order forthe concern to be eligible for 8(a) participation.) This does not precludethe appointment of non-voting or honorary Directors so as to allow thefirm to have a varied and experienced Board of Directors. All arrangementsregarding the structure and voting rights of the Board must comply withapplicable state law.(c) Individuals who are not socially and economically disadvantaged maybe involved in the management of an applicant concern, and may be stockholders,partners, officers, and/or directors of such concern. Such individual(s),their spouses or immediate family members who reside in the individual'shousehold may not however:(1) Exercise actual control or have the power to control the applicantor 8(a) concern.(2) Be an officer or director or more than a 10% owner, stockholder, orpartner of another firm in the same or similar line of business as theapplicant or 8(a) concern.  (3) Receive excessive compensation from the applicant or 8(a) concern asdirectors, officers or employees. Individual compensation from the concernin any form, including dividends, which is paid to a nondisadvantaged owner,his/her spouse or immediate family member residing in the same householdwill be deemed excessive if it exceeds the compensation to be receivedby the Chief Executive Officer or, if no Chief Executive Officer, the President;provided that, with the written consent of the AA/MSBandamp;COD or designee,the Chief Executive Officer or President may elect to take a lower salarythan such a nondisadvantaged individual if it is demonstrated to be inthe best interest of the applicant or 8(a) concern.  (4) Be former employers of the disadvantaged owner(s) of the applicantor 8(a) concern, unless it is determined by the AA/MSBandamp;COD that thecontemplated relationship between the former employer and the disadvantagedindividual or applicant concern does not give the former actual controlor the potential to control the applicant or 8(a) concern and such relationshipis in the best interests of the 8(a) firm.  (5) Have an equity ownership interest of more than 10 percent in another8(a) concern.  (d) Nondisadvantaged individuals or entities may be found to control orhave the power to control in any of the following circumstances, whichare illustrative only and not all inclusive:  (1) Nondisadvantaged individuals control the voting Board of Directorsof the 8(a) concern, either directly through majority voting membership,or indirectly, if the by-laws allow nondisadvantaged individuals to blockany action proposed by the disadvantaged individuals through negative control.For example, an equal number of disadvantaged and nondisadvantaged votingdirectors could create negative control.  (2) A nondisadvantaged individual, as an officer or member of the Boardof Directors of the 8(a) concern, or through stock ownership, has the powerto control day-to-day direction of the business affairs of the concern. (3) The nondisadvantaged individual or entity provides critical financialor bonding support or licenses to the 8(a) concern which directly or indirectlyallows the nondisadvantaged individual to gain control or direction ofthe 8(a) concern.  (4) A nondisadvantaged individual or entity exercises voting control ofthe Participant through a nominee(s).  (5) A nondisadvantaged individual or entity controls the corporation orthe individual disadvantaged owners through loan arrangements.  (6) Other contractual relationships exist with nondisadvantaged individualsor entities, the terms of which would create control over the disadvantagedconcern.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;124.105  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Social disadvantage.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Socially disadvantaged individuals are those who havebeen subjected to racial or ethnic prejudice or cultural bias because oftheir identities as members of groups without regard to their individualqualities. The social disadvantage must stem from circumstances beyondtheir control. For social disadvantage relating to Indian tribes and AlaskaNative Corporations, <T3>see</T3> andSection;124.112(a).  (b) <T3>Members of designated groups. </T3>(1) In the absence of evidence tothe contrary, the following individuals are presumed to be socially disadvantaged:Black Americans; Hispanic Americans; Native Americans (American Indians,Eskimos, Aleuts, or Native Hawaiians); Asian Pacific Americans (personswith origins from Burma, Thailand, Malaysia, Indonesia, Singapore, Brunei,Japan, China, Taiwan, Laos, Cambodia (Kampuchea), Vietnam, Korea, The Philippines,U.S. Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands (Republic of Palau), Republicof the Marshall Islands, Federated States of Micronesia, the Commonwealthof the Northern Mariana Islands, Guam, Samoa, Macao, Hong Kong, Fiji, Tonga,Kiribati, Tuvalu, or Nauru); Subcontinent Asian Americans (persons withorigins from India, Pakistan, Bangladesh, Sri Lanka, Bhutan, the MaldivesIslands or Nepal); and members of other groups designated from time totime by SBA according to procedures set forth at paragraph (d) of thissection.  (2) An individual seeking socially disadvantaged status as a member ofa designated group may be required to demonstrate that he/she holds himself/herselfout and is identified as a member of a designated group if SBA has reasonto question such individual's status as a group member.  (c) <T3>Individuals not members of designated groups. </T3>(1) An individualwho is not a member of one of the above-named groups must establish his/herindividual social disadvantage on the basis of clear and convincing evidence.A clear and convincing case of social disadvantage must include the followingelements:  (i) The individual's social disadvantage must stem from his or her color,ethnic origin, gender, physical handicap, long-term residence in an environmentisolated from the mainstream of American society, or other similar causenot common to small business persons who are not socially disadvantaged. (ii) The individual must demonstrate that he or she has personally sufferedsocial disadvantage, not merely claim membership in a non-designated groupwhich could be considered socially disadvantaged.  (iii) The individual's social disadvantage must be rooted in treatmentwhich he or she has experienced in American society, not in other countries. (iv) The individual's social disadvantage must be chronic and substantial,not fleeting or insignificant.      (v) The individual's social disadvantage must have negatively impactedon his or her entry into and/or advancement in the business world. SBAwill entertain any relevant evidence in assessing this element of an applicant'scase. SBA will particularly consider and place emphasis on the followingexperiences of the individual, where relevant:(A) <T3>Education.</T3> SBA shall consider, as evidence of an individual'ssocial disadvantage, denial of equal access to institutions of higher education;exclusion from social and professional association with students and teachers;denial of educational honors; social patterns or pressures which have discouragedthe individual from pursuing a professional or business education; andother similar factors.(B) <T3>Employment.</T3> SBA shall consider, as evidence of an individual'ssocial disadvantage, discrimination in hiring; discrimination in promotionsand other aspects of professional advancement; discrimination in pay andfringe benefits; discrimination in other terms and conditions of employment;retaliatory behavior by an employer; social patterns or pressures whichhave channelled the individual into nonprofessional or non-business fields;and other similar factors.(C) <T3>Business history.</T3> SBA shall consider, as evidence of an individual'ssocial disadvantage, unequal access to credit or capital; acquisition ofcredit or capital under unfavorable circumstances; discrimination in receipt(award and/or bid) of government contracts; discrimination by potentialclients; exclusion from business or professional organizations; and othersimilar factors which have impeded the individual's business development.(d) <T3>Socially disadvantaged group inclusion</T3>_(1) <T3>General.</T3> Upon an adequate preliminary showing to SBA by representativesof an identifiable group that the group has suffered chronic racial orethnic prejudice or cultural bias, and upon the request of the representativesof the group that SBA do so, SBA shall publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a notice of its receipt of a request that itconsider a group not specifically named in paragraph (b)(1) of this sectionto have members which are socially disadvantaged because of their identificationas members of the group for the purpose of eligibility for the 8(a) program.The notice shall adequately identify the group making the request, andif a hearing is requested on the matter and such request is granted, thetime, date and location at which such hearing is to be held. All informationsubmitted to support a request should be addressed to the AA/MSBandamp;COD.(2) <T3>Standards to be applied.</T3> In determining whether a group has madean adequate preliminary showing that it has suffered chronic racial orethnic prejudice or cultural bias for the purposes of this regulation,SBA shall determine: (i) Whether the group has suffered the effects of prejudice, bias, or discriminatorypractices;(ii) Whether such conditions have resulted in economic deprivation forthe group of the type which Congress has found exists for the groups namedin the Small Business Act; and(iii) Whether such conditions have produced impediments in the businessworld for members of the group over which they have no control and whichare not common to all small business owners. If it is demonstrated to SBAby a particular group that it satisfies the above criteria, SBA will publishthe notice described in paragraph (d)(1) of this section.(3) <T3>Procedure.</T3> Once a notice is published under paragraph (d)(1) ofthis section, SBA shall adduce further information on the record of theproceeding which tends to support or refute the group's request. Such informationmay be submitted by any member of the public, including Government representativesand any member of the private sector. Information may be submitted in writtenform, or orally at such hearings as SBA may hold on the matter.(4) <T3>Decision.</T3> Once SBA has published a notice under paragraph (d)(1)of this section, it shall afford a period of not more than thirty (30)days for public comment concerning the petition for socially disadvantagedgroup status. If appropriate, SBA may hold hearings within such commentperiod. Thereafter, SBA shall consider all information received and shallrender its final decision within 60 days of the close of the comment period.Such decisions shall be published as a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Concurrent with the notice, SBA shall advisethe petitioners of its final decision in writing. If appropriate, SBA shallamend this regulation accordingly.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.106</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Economic disadvantage.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Economic disadvantage for the 8(a) program.</T3> (1)(i) For purposesof the 8(a) program, economically disadvantaged individuals are sociallydisadvantaged individuals whose ability to compete in the free enterprisesystem has been impaired due to diminished capital and credit opportunitiesas compared to others in the same or similar line of business who are notsocially disadvantaged, and such diminished opportunities have precludedor are likely to preclude such individuals from successfully competingin the open market. In determining economic disadvantage for purposes of8(a) program eligibility, SBA shall compare the applicant concern's businessand financial profile with profiles of businesses in the same or similarline of business which are not owned and controlled by socially and economicallydisadvantaged individuals.(ii) This program is not intended to assist concerns owned and controlledby socially disadvantaged individuals who have accumulated substantialwealth, who have unlimited growth potential or who have not experiencedor have overcome impediments to obtaining access to financing, marketsand resources.(iii) For economic disadvantage as it relates to tribally-owned concerns,<T3>see</T3> andSection; 124.112(b)(2).(2) <T3>Factors to be considered.</T3> In determining the degree of diminishedcredit and capital opportunities of a socially disadvantaged individual,SBA will consider factors relating both to the applicant concern and tothe individual(s) claiming disadvantaged status. Factors fall into threegeneral categories: The personal financial condition of the individual(s)claiming disadvantaged status, including that individual's access to creditand capital; the financial condition of the applicant concern; and theapplicant concern's access to credit, capital and markets.(i) <T3>Personal financial condition of the individuals claiming disadvantagedstatus.</T3> This criterion is designed to assess the relative degree ofeconomic disadvantage of the individual, as well as the individual's potentialto capitalize or otherwise provide financial support for the business.The specific factors to be considered include, but are not limited to:the individual's personal income for at least the past two years; totalfair market value of all assets; and the individual's personal net worth.Subject to the exclusions set forth in paragraph (a)(2)(i)(B) of this section,an individual whose personal net worth exceeds $250,000 will not be consideredeconomically disadvantaged for purposes of 8(a) program entry. For personalnet worth thresholds relating to continued 8(a) program eligibility, <T3>see </T3>andSection; 124.111(a).(A)(<T3>1</T3>) Except as provided in paragraph (a)(2)(i)(A)(<T3>2</T3>) of this section, when married, an individual upon whom eligibilityis based shall submit a financial statement relating to his/her personalfinances and a separate financial statement relating to his/her spouse'spersonal finances. A married applicant individual residing in any of thecommunity property states or territories of the United States (e.g., Arizona,California, Idaho, Louisiana, Nevada, New Mexico, Puerto Rico Texas, Washingtonand Wisconsin) must clearly identify on his or her financial statementthose assets which are his or her separate property and those which arecommunity property. The spouse of such married applicant must similarlyidentify on his or her financial statement those assets which are his orher separate property and those which are community property. A one-halfinterest in the assets identified as community property (and income derivedfrom such assets) will be attributed to the applicant individual for purposesof determining economic disadvantage. Assets or a community property interestin assets, which applicant spouse has transferred to a non-applicant spousewithin 2 years of the date of application to the 8(a) program will be presumedto be the property of the applicant spouse for purposes of determininghis/her personal net worth. However, such presumption shall not apply toany applicant spouse who is subject to a legal separation recognized bya court of competent jurisdiction. A financial statement of a spouse ofan applicant is not required if the individual and his/her spouse are subjectto a legal separation recognized by a court of competent jurisdiction.However, an applicant individual must include on his or her statement allcommunity property in which he or she has an interest.(<T3>2</T3>) Except for concerns where both spouses are individuals uponwhom eligibility is based, the requirement of paragraph (a)(2)(i)(A)(<T3>1</T3>) of this section, relating to the separate financial statements,applies only to determinations of economic disadvantage for purposes of8(a) program entry. For a concern where both spouses are individuals uponwhom program eligibility is based, the personal net worth of each spouseindividually will be considered for program certification and for continuedprogram eligibility.(B) Whenever SBA calculates the personal net worth of an individual claimingdisadvantaged status for purposes of the 8(a) program, SBA shall excludethe individual's ownership interest in the applicant or participating 8(a)concern and the equity in his/her primary personal residence (including,for 8(a) Program certification, the equity of both spouses, if married),but shall not exclude any portion of such equity in his/her primary residencewhich is attributable to excessive withdrawals from the applicant or participating8(a) concern.(C) Whenever SBA calculates the personal net worth of an individual claimingto be an Alaska Native, as defined in andSection; 124.100, for purposes ofqualifying an individually owned 8(a) applicant concern, SBA shall includeassets and income from sources other than an Alaska Native Corporation,as defined in andSection; 124.100, and shall exclude from such calculationany of the following which the individual receives from any Alaska NativeCorporation:(<T3>1</T3>) Cash (including cash dividends on stock received from a NativeCorporation) to the extent that it does not, in the aggregate, exceed $2,000per individual per annum;(<T3>2</T3>) Stock (including stock issued or distributed by a Native Corporationas a dividend or distribution on stock);(<T3>3</T3>) A partnership interest;(<T3>4</T3>) Land or an interest in land (including land or an interestin land received from a Native Corporation as a dividend or distributionon stock); and(<T3>5</T3>) An interest in a settlement trust.(ii) <T3>Business financial condition.</T3> This criterion will be used to providea financial picture of a firm at a specific point in time in comparisonto other concerns in the same or similar line of business which are notowned and controlled by socially and economically disadvantaged individuals.In evaluating a concern's financial condition, SBA's consideration willinclude, but not be limited to, the following factors: business assets,revenues, pre-tax profit, working capital and net worth of the concern,including the value of the investments in the concern held by the individualclaiming disadvantaged status.(iii) <T3>Access to credit and capital.</T3> This criterion will be used to evalutethe ability of the applicant concern to obtain the external support necessaryto operate a competitive business enterprise. In making the evaluation,SBA shall consider the concern's access to credit and capital, including,but not limited to, the following factors: Access to long-term financing;access to working capital financing; equipment trade credit; access toraw materials and/or supplier trade credit; and bonding capability.(b) <T3>Economic disadvantage for the 8(d) Subcontracting Program, Small DisadvantagedBusiness Set-Asides, Small Disadvantaged Business Evaluation Preferencesand for any other Federal procurement programs requiring SBA's determinationof disadvantaged status.</T3> (1) For purposes of the section 8(d) SubcontractingProgram and other programs requiring SBA's determination of disadvantagedstatus, economically disadvantaged individuals are socially disadvantagedindividuals whose ability to compete in the free enterprise system hasbeen impaired due to diminished capital and credit opportunities, as comparedto others in the same or similar line of business and whose diminishedopportunities have precluded or are likely to preclude such individualsfrom successfully competing in the open market. In determining economicdisadvantage for the section 8(d) Subcontracting program, Small DisadvantagedBusiness set-asides and Small Disadvantaged Business Evaluation preferences,SBA will consider the factors set forth in paragraph (a) of this sectionbut will apply standards to each factor that are less restrictive thanthose applied when determining economic disadvantage for purposes of the8(a) program. This approach corresponds to the Congressional intent thatpartial or complete achievement of a concern's 8(a) program business developmentgoals should not necessarily preclude its participation in other Federalprocurement programs for concerns owned and controlled by socially andeconomically disadvantaged individuals.(2) An individual whose personal net worth exceeds $750,000 as calculatedpursuant to paragraph (a)(2)(i) of this section, will not be consideredeconomically disadvantaged for purposes of section 8(d) of the Small BusinessAct (15 U.S.C. 637(d)) or any Federal procurement program which uses section8(d) for its definition of economic disadvantage.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.107</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Potential for success.</ITAG>SBA will approve a concern for Program Participation only when it findsthat the applicant concern has been in business in its primary industryclassification for two full years, and possesses the potential for success.(a) An applicant concern must demonstrate that it has been in businessin the primary industry classification in which it seeks 8(a) certificationfor two full years prior to the date of its 8(a) application by submittingincome tax returns showing revenues for each of the two previous years.(b) In determining whether a concern has the potential for success, SBAwill look at a number of factors including, but not limited to, the technicaland managerial experience and competency of the individual(s) upon whomeligibility is based, the financial capacity of the applicant concern andthe concern's record of performance on previous Federal and private sectorcontracts in the primary industry in which the concern is seeking 8(a)certification. SBA will examine each of these factors to determine whetherthe otherwise eligibile applicant concern has the potential to successfullyperform subcontracts awarded under the 8(a) program and to meet the businessdevelopment objectives and goals of the program.(c) An applicant concern shall not be denied admission into the programdue solely to a determination that specific contract opportunities areunavailable to assist in the development of the concern unless:(1) The Government has not previously procured and is unlikely to procurethe types of products or services offered by the concern; or(2) The purchase of such products or services by the Federal Governmentwill not be in quantities sufficient to support the developmental needsof the applicant and other Program Participants providing the same or similaritems or services.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.108</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional 8(a) program eligibility requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Individual character review.</T3> If, during the processing of an application,adverse information is obtained from the 8(a) program applicant or a crediblesource regarding possible criminal conduct by an applicant concern or anyof its principals, no further action will be taken on the application untilSBA's Inspector General has evaluated that information and has advisedthe AA/MSBandamp;COD of his or her findings. The AA/MSBandamp;COD will considerthose findings when evaluating the application.(b) <T3>Standards of conduct.</T3> The SBA Standards of Conduct regulations,13 CFR part 105, <T3>et seq.,</T3> apply to eligibility questions involving SBA employeesand their relatives. In particular, <T3>see</T3> andSection;andSection; 105.404 and 105.506 of this title prohibitingcertain SBA employees and former employees from, among other things, holdingan ownership interest in an 8(a) concern.(c) <T3>Eligibility limitations.</T3> (1) Except for concerns owned by Indiantribes or Alaska Native Corporations, once a concern or disadvantaged individualupon whom eligibility was based has participated in the 8(a) program andthe concern has exited the program by termination, graduation, voluntarywithdrawal or expiration of its program term, neither the concern nor anyindividual whose personal disadvantaged status was required to qualifythe concern for 8(a) Program Participation shall be eligible to reapplyfor Program Participation. <T3>See</T3> andSection; 124.112 regarding eligibility limitations for Indiantribes, including Alaska Native Corporations.(2) An individual will be found to have used his or her eligibility forthe 8(a) Program if he or she has claimed disadvantaged status by completingthe appropriate SBA forms and SBA has approved the applicant concern'sentry into the 8(a) program.(3) Use of eligibility will take effect on the date of the concern's approvalinto the program.(4) After an 8(a) concern exits the program, a disadvantaged owner of thatconcern may hold an ownership interest in or be involved in the managementof another 8(a) concern, subject to the provisions of andSection; 124.104(c).In these instances, for purposes of 8(a) participation only, such an individualwill be deemed to be a non-disadvantaged owner of that concern and criteriarestricting non-disadvantaged individual participation shall apply. <T3>See</T3> andSection;andSection; 124.103 and 124.104.(5) Transfer of the ownership and control of an 8(a) Participant to oneor more other individuals does not terminate such concern's eligibilityfor the program provided that SBA determines the transferee(s) to be sociallyand economically disadvantaged. However, the 8(a) concern's Program Termas described in andSection; 124.110 is in no way affected by such transfer.(d) <T3>Manufacturers and regular dealers.</T3> (1) For purposes of programentry, each applicant concern whose primary industry classification isas a manufacturer or supplier of materials, supplies, articles and equipmentmust be determined to be a manufacturer or regular dealer as defined inthe Walsh-Healey Public Contracts Act Regulations found at 48 CFR part22, subpart 22.6.(2) Participants in the developmental stage of 8(a) Program Participationmay be eligible for two exemptions from the contingent agreement requirementsof the Walsh-Healey Public Contracts Act, <T3>see</T3>, andSection; 124.304(d). However, the availability of such exemptionsduring the Program Term in no way affects the requirement that an applicantconcern comply with the provisions of paragraph (d)(1) of this sectionfor purposes of program entry.(e) Multiple concerns in same household. Immediate family members livingin the same household may not each use their individual disadvantaged statusto qualify more than one business concern for 8(a) Program Participationif the concerns are in the same or similar line of business. When the concernsare in separate lines of business, each applicant must establish that theconcerns are separately owned, managed and controlled. (For size limitations<T3>see</T3> part 121 of this title.)<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.109</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ineligible businesses.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Brokers and packagers.</T3> Brokers and packagers are ineligible toparticipate in the 8(a) program. These types of businesses do not satisfythe definition of a manufacturer or regular dealer, as stated in andSection;124.100.(b) <T3>Franchises.</T3> Except for those admitted to the 8(a) program priorto the effective date of these regulations, franchisees are ineligibleto participate in the section 8(a) program.(c) <T3>Debarred or suspended person or concern.</T3> Pursuant to 48 CFR part9, subpart 9.4, or 13 CFR part 145, individuals or concerns who are debarred,suspended, voluntarily excluded from Federal programs, including the 8(a)program, or are found to be ineligible for Federal programs, includingthe 8(a) Program, by any agency of the Federal Government are ineligiblefor admission into the 8(a) program during the period of debarment, suspension,voluntary exclusion or status as ineligible. Prior to approval for admissionto the 8(a) program, the applicant must certify that both the applicantconcern and the disadvantaged individual(s) upon whom eligibility is basedare not at that time debarred, suspended, voluntarily excluded or otherwiseineligible.(d) <T3>Non-profit organizations.</T3> A non-profit organization does not meetthe general definition of a concern as set forth in part 121 and andSection;124.100 of these regulations and is, therefore, ineligible for 8(a) ProgramParticipation. Nothing in this paragraph affects the eligibility of a for-profitconcern owned and controlled by a Hawaiian Native Organization, Indiantribe, including an Alaska Native Corporation (<T3>see</T3> andSection;andSection; 124.112 and 124.113.)(e) <T3>Concerns owned by other disadvantaged concerns.</T3> A concern whichis owned in whole or in part by another business concern and relies onthe disadvantaged status of that concern to claim disadvantaged statusis ineligible for 8(a) Program Participation and for participation in theDefense Department's Small Disadvantaged Business program (Pub. L. 99-661,section 1207(a)) and the section 8(d) Subcontracting Program, (15 U.S.C.637(d)). These types of businesses do not meet the individual disadvantagedownership requirements of the Small Business Act and these regulationsas set forth in andSection; 124.103.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.110</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program term.</ITAG>(a) Each concern certified for program participation on or after November15, 1988, is subject to a Program Term of nine years from the date of suchcertification. The term will consist of two stages: the developmental stageand the transitional stage, which are described in andSection; 124.303. Nothingin this subsection shall be construed to limit SBA from initiating graduation,termination or suspension actions pursuant to andSection;andSection; 124.208,124.209 and 124.211 or to prohibit a Participant from voluntarily withdrawingfrom the program.(b) A concern is subject to a revised Program Term if the following conditionsare met:(1) The concern was a Program Participant as of September 1, 1988 or wasapproved for 8(a) Program Participation between September 1, 1988 and November15, 1988; and(2) The concern did not voluntarily withdraw from the 8(a) program andwas not graduated or terminated pursuant to andSection;andSection; 124.208and 124.209 between September 1, 1988 and November 15, 1988.(c) The revised Program Term shall be the greater of nine years from thedate of the Participant's first contract pursuant to section 8(a) or theParticipant's Fixed Program Participation Term (FPPT) expiration date,including any extension thereof, plus 18 months, whichever is greater.(d) Once a Program Term has been established or revised in accordance withthis section, SBA is statutorily prohibited from extending such term beyondthe specified expiration date.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.111</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Continued 8(a) program eligibility.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Standards.</T3> (1) Except as set forth in paragraph (a)(2) of thissection, in order for a concern to remain eligible for 8(a) program participation,it must continue to meet all eligibility criteria contained in andSection;124.101 through andSection; 124.109. Failure to do so may cause SBA to initiatea graduation or termination proceeding in accordance with andSection;andSection;124.208 and 124.209.(2)(i) For purposes of maintaining continued 8(a) program eligibility ofa Program Participant in the developmental stage of the 8(a) program, anindividual whose personal net worth exceeds $500,000 as calculated pursuantto andSection; 124.106(a)(2)(i), will not be considered economically disadvantaged.(<T3>See</T3>, andSection; 124.303 for discussion of the developmental stageof 8(a) Program Participation).(ii) For purposes of maintaining such eligibility of a Program Participantin the transitional stage of the 8(a) program, an individual whose personalnet worth exceeds $750,000, as calculated pursuant to andSection;124.106(a)(2)(i),will not be considered economically disadvantaged (<T3>See,</T3> andSection;124.303 for discussion of the developmental stageof 8(a) program participation).(b) <T3>Submissions supporting continued eligibility.</T3> As part of an annualreview, each Program Participant shall annually submit to the Divisionof Program Certification and Eligibility and to the servicing field officethe following:(1) A certification that it meets the 8(a) program eligibility requirementsas set forth in andSection;124.101 through andSection;124.109 and paragraph(a) of this section;(2) A personal financial statement for each disadvantaged owner;(3) A record of all payments, compensation, and distribution (includingloans, advances, salaries and dividends) made by the Participant to eachof its owners or to any person or entity affiliated with such owners; and(4) Such other information as SBA may deem necessary. For other requiredannual submissions, <T3>see</T3> andSection;124.501.(c) <T3>Economic disadvantage eligibility reviews.</T3> (1) Upon receipt ofspecific and credible information alleging that a Program Participant nolonger meets the requirements of economic disadvantage for continued programeligibility, SBA shall conduct a review of the concern's eligibility forcontinued participation in the Program.(2)(i) If, based on information received from the Participant or elsewhere,SBA has reason to believe that the Participant no longer meets the standardsof economic disadvantage as set forth in andSection;124.106 or paragraph(a) of this section, SBA shall conduct a review to determine whether theParticipant and its disadvantaged owners continue to meet such standards.(ii) Sufficient reasons for SBA to conclude that an 8(a) Participant isno longer economically disadvantaged may include, but are not limited to:demonstrated access of the concern and/or its owners to a substantial newsource of capital or loans, an unusually large amount of funds withdrawnfrom the concern by its owners, or personal net worth of the disadvantagedowner(s) which exceeds the threshold described in paragraph (a) of thissection, not including the owner's equity in the 8(a) concern and in his/herprimary personal residence.(3) If SBA determines, pursuant to paragraphs (c)(1) or (c)(2) of thissection, that a Program Participant and/or its disadvantaged owner(s) areno longer economically disadvantaged, SBA shall initiate a graduation ora termination proceeding under andSection;andSection;124.208 and 124.209.(4) If, based on information received from the Participant or elsewhere,SBA has reason to believe that an excessive amount of funds or other assetshas been withdrawn from the Participant for the personal benefit of thedisadvantaged owner(s) or that of any person or entity affiliated withsuch owner(s), SBA shall conduct a review to determine whether such withdrawalwas detrimental to the achievement of the targets, objectives and goalsof the Participant's business plan.(5) If SBA determines, pursuant to paragraph (c)(4) of this section, thatfunds or other assets have been withdrawn to the detriment of the achievementof the targets, objectives and goals of the Participant's business plan,SBA shall initiate a termination proceeding under andSection;124.209 or shallrequire an appropriate reinvestment of funds or other assets and such otheractions as SBA may deem necessary to counteract the detrimental withdrawalsas a condition of maintaining program eligibility.(d) <T3>Eligibility Reviews.</T3> If, on the basis of information submittedpursuant to paragraph (b) of this section or upon information receivedfrom any source, SBA has reason to believe the Program Participant no longermeets the eligibility criteria (other than economic disadvantage), SBAshall conduct a review of the Participant's 8(a) program eligibility. Ifas a result of such review, SBA determines such Participant may no longerbe eligible for program participation, SBA shall initiate termination proceedingsunder andSection;124.209.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.112</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Concerns owned by Indian tribes, including Alaska Native Corporations.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> (1) Small business concerns owned by Indian tribes areeligible for participation in the section 8(a) program, provided that certainconditions are met as described below. The term ``Indian tribe'' is definedin andSection; 124.100.(2) Small business concerns owned and controlled by Indian tribes are generallyconsidered socially and economically disadvantaged for purposes of participationin programs authorized by section 8(d) of the Small Business Act, section1207(a) of the Defense Authorization Act of 1987 and any other program,except the 8(a) program, which requires social and economic disadvantagedstatus as a condition of eligibility. If the disadvantaged status of atribally-owned concern is challenged under subpart B of this part, SBAwill evaluate the concern's disadvantaged status using the criteria setforth in this section.(3) Small business concerns owned and controlled by Alaska Native Corporations(ANCs) are eligible for participation in the 8(a) program, subject to thesame conditions as apply to tribally-owned concerns which are describedat paragraphs (b) through (e) of this section, with the following exceptionswhich apply solely to ANC-owned concerns:(i) In evaluating the economic disadvantage of the ANC, no considerationshall be given to assets or income derived from distributions of the AlaskaNative Fund established by the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, 43U.S.C. 1601, <T3>et seq.</T3> Such assets and income should be included and specificallyidentified on the ANC's financial statements.(ii) Alaska Natives and descendants of Natives must own a majority of boththe total equity of the ANC and the total voting powers to elect directorsof the ANC through their holdings of settlement common stock. Settlementcommon stock means stock of an ANC issued pursuant to 43 U.S.C. 1606(g)(1),which is subject to the rights and restrictions listed in 43 U.S.C. 1606(h)(1).(iii) Even though an ANC can be either for profit or non-profit, a smallbusiness concern owned and controlled by ANC must be for profit to be eligiblefor the 8(a) program. The concern will be deemed owned and controlled bythe ANC for purposes of program eligibility so as to satisfy paragraph(c)(3) of this section where the majority of stock or other ownership interestis held by the ANC and holders of its settlement common stock. Both a majorityof the total equity and total voting power must be so held.(iv) Paragraphs (b)(3) (i) and (ii) of this section are not generally applicableto an ANC, provided its status as an ANC is clearly shown in its articlesof incorporation and by-laws. Additionally, paragraph (c)(1) of this sectionis not applicable to the ANC-owned concern to the extent it requires anexpress waiver of sovereign immunity or a ``sue and be sued'' clause.(v) The Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act provides that a concern minority-ownedby an ANC shall be deemed to be both owned and controlled by such ANC.Therefore, an individual responsible for control and management of an ANC-owned8(a) applicant or Participant need not establish personal social and economicdisadvantage.(b) <T3>Tribal eligibility. </T3>In order to qualify a concern which it ownsand controls for participation in the 8(a) program, an Indian tribe itselfmust meet the conditions set forth in paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2) of thissection. Once an Indian tribe has so established its disadvantaged status,it need not reestablish such status in order to have other businesses thatit owns certified for 8(a) Program Participation, unless specifically requiredto do so by the AA/MSBandamp;COD or his/her designee. The AA/MSBandamp;COD,or designee, may require proof of tribal eligibility during the ProgramParticipation of any tribally-owned business or at any time during theprocessing of an 8(a) program application from a tribally-owned concern.However, nothing in this paragraph affects the requirement that each tribally-ownedconcern seeking to be certified for 8(a) Program Participation comply withthe provisions of paragraph (c) of this section.(1) <T3>Social disadvantage.</T3> An Indian tribe meeting the definition setforth in andSection; 124.100 shall be deemed socially disadvantaged.(2) <T3>Economic disadvantage.</T3> In order to be eligible to participatein the 8(a) Program the Indian tribe must demonstrate to SBA that the tribeitself is economically disadvantaged. This shall involve the considerationof available data showing the tribe's economic condition, including butnot limited to, the following information:(i) The number of tribal members.(ii) The present tribal unemployment rate.(iii) The per capita income of tribal members, excluding judgment awards.(iv) The percentage of the local Indian population below the poverty level.(v) The tribe's access to capital markets.(vi) The tribal assets as disclosed in a current tribal financial statement.The statement should list all assets including those which are encumberedor held in trust, but the status of those encumbered or trust assets shouldbe clearly delineated.(vii) A list of all wholly or partially owned tribal enterprises or affiliatesand the primary industry classification of each, as defined in andSection;124.100. The list must also specify the members of the tribe who manageor control such enterprises or serve as officers or directors.(3) <T3>Application process_forms and documents required. </T3>Except as providedin paragraph (a)(3)(iv) of this section, in order to establish tribal eligibilityto qualify for the 8(a) program, the Indian tribe must submit the formsand documents required of 8(a) applicants generally as well as the followingmaterial:(i) A copy of the tribe's governing document(s) such as its constitutionor business charter.(ii) Evidence of its recognition as a tribe eligible for the special programsand services provided by the United States or by its state of residence.(iii) Copies of its articles of incorporation and bylaws as filed withthe organizing or chartering authority, or similar documents needed toestablish and govern a non-corporate legal entity.(iv) Documents or materials needed to show the tribe's economically disadvantagedstatus as described in paragraph (b)(2) of this section.(c) <T3>Business eligibility.</T3> In order to be eligible to participate inthe 8(a) program, a concern which is owned by an eligible Indian tribemust meet the conditions set forth in paragraphs (c)(1) through (c)(6)of this section.(1) <T3>Legal business entity organized for profit and susceptible to suit.</T3>The applicant or participating concern must be a separate and distinctlegal entity organized or chartered by the tribe, or Federal or state authorities.Except as provided in paragraph (a)(3)(iv) of this section, the concern'sarticles of incorporation must contain express sovereign immunity waiverlanguage, or a ``sue and be sued'' clause which designates United StatesFederal Courts to be among the courts of competent jurisdiction for allmatters relating to SBA's programs including, but not limited to, 8(a)Program Participation, loans, advance payments and contract performance.Also, the concern must be organized for profit, and the tribe must possesseconomic development powers in the tribe's governing documents.(2) <T3>Size.</T3> (i) A tribally-owned applicant concern must qualify as asmall business concern as defined for purposes of Government procurementin part 121 of this title. The particular size standard to be applied shallbe based on the primary industry classification of the applicant concern.Ownership by the tribe will not, in and of itself, cause affiliation withthe tribe or with other entities owned by the tribe. However, affiliationwith other tribally-owned entities may be caused by circumstances otherthan common tribal ownership. (<T3>See</T3> part 121 of this title regarding affiliation.)(ii) Except as provided in paragraph (c)(2)(iii) of this section, a tribally-ownedProgram Participant must certify to SBA that it is a small business pursuantto the provisions of part 121 of this title for the purpose of performingeach individual contract which it is awarded.(iii) During its Program Term, a tribally-owned Program Participant may,for up to two 8(a) contracts, be a party to a joint venture which exceedsthe applicable size standard, if the joint venture is:(A) 51 percent or more owned and controlled by the tribally-owned Participant;(B) Is located on the tribe's reservation or land owned by such tribe;(C) Performs most of its activities on such reservation or tribally-ownedland; and(D) Employs members of the tribe for at least 50 percent of its total workforce.(3) <T3>Ownership.</T3> For corporate entities, a tribe must own at least 51percent of the voting stock and at least 51 percent of the aggregate ofall classes of stock. For non-corporate entities, a tribe must own at leasta 51 percent interest. No Indian tribe shall own more than one currentor former 8(a) Program Participant having the same primary industry classification.Tribally-owned Program Participants are subject to the provisions of paragraphs(g) and (h) of andSection; 124.103 relating to ownership by nondisadvantagedindividuals and non-8(a) concerns.(4) <T3>Control and management.</T3> (i) Except for concerns owned by ANCs,the management and daily business operations of a tribally-owned concernmust be controlled by an individual member(s) of the tribe, who does notmanage and control more than one other tribally-owned 8(a) Program Participant.In addition, such manager(s) must be found to possess the requisite managementof technical capabilities as determined by SBA. This paragraph does notpreclude management of a tribally-owned concern by committees, teams, orBoards controlled by such individuals.(ii) Members of the tribal council shall not participate in the daily managementor on the board of directors of any tribally-owned 8(a) concern withoutobtaining prior written approval for such participation from SBA.(iii) Except as permitted by paragraph (c)(4)(i) of this section, membersof the management team, business committee members, officers, and directorsare precluded from engaging in any outside employment or other businessinterests which conflict with the management of the concern or preventthe concern from achieving the objectives set forth in its business developmentplan. This is not intended to preclude participation in tribal or otheractivities which do not interfere with such individual's responsibilitiesin the operation of the applicant concern.(5) <T3>Location and economic benefit.</T3> The primary economic benefits fromthe concern must accrue to the tribe. A concern located on a designatedIndian reservation or on tribally-owned land will be presumed to providean economic benefit, such as employment, to the tribal community. SBA mayapprove a location not on tribally-owned land, if the applicant concerncan demonstrate that similar economic benefits will accrue to the tribalcommunity.(6) <T3>Other eligibility criteria.</T3> A tribally-owned concern must alsomeet the eligibility criteria set forth in andSection; 124.107 through 124.109.(d) <T3>Individual eligibility limitation</T3>._(1) <T3>Concerns owned by Indian tribes except those owned by Alaska NativeCorporations.</T3> The Small Business Act, as amended, provides that the8(a) requirements regarding management and daily business operations aremet if a tribally-owned concern is controlled by one or more members ofthe economically disadvantaged Indian tribe. The statute does not requirethat such individual be found by SBA to be personally socially and economicallydisadvantaged. Therefore, SBA does not deem an individual involved in themanagement or daily business operations of the tribally-owned concern tohave used his or her individual eligibility within the meaning of andSection;124.108(c).(2) <T3>Concerns owned by Alaska Native Corporations.</T3> The Alaska NativeClaims Settlement Act, as amended, provides that a concern which is majorityowned by an Alaska Native Corporation shall be deemed to be controlledand managed by minority individuals for purpose of participation in Federalprograms. Therefore, SBA will not examine the disadvantaged status of anindividual involved in the management of daily business operations of anAlaska Native Corporation-owned concern, and such individual will not bedeemed to have used his or her individual eligibility within the meaningof andSection; 124.108(c).(e) <T3>Existing Section 8(a) Firms.</T3> Tribally-owned concerns presentlyin the section 8(a) program must comply with the requirements of this sectionwithin 12 months from the effective date of these regulations. Failureto do so may result in the commencement of section 8(a) program terminationproceedings.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.113</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Concerns owned by Native Hawaiian Organizations.</ITAG>Concerns owned by economically disadvantaged Native Hawaiian Organizationsas defined in andSection; 124.100 are eligible for participation in the 8(a)program and other federal programs requiring SBA to determine social andeconomic disadvantage as a condition of eligibility. Such concerns mustmeet all eligibility criteria set forth in andSection;andSection; 124.102 through124.109 and andSection; 124.111(a) of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.201</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">8(a) Program application. </ITAG>It is SBA's policy that any concern or any individual on behalf of suchbusiness has the right to apply for 8(a) Program Participation whetheror not there is an appearance of eligibility. However, concerns which havenot been in business for two full years as described andSection; 124.107will not be approved for 8(a) Program Participation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.202</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Place of filing. </ITAG>An application for 8(a) program admission is to be filed in the SBA fieldoffice serving the territory in which the principal place of business,as defined in andSection; 124.100, is located. The field office will providean applicant concern with information regarding the 8(a) program, and withall required application forms. An 8(a) application will be processed bythe appropriate SBA regional office of the Division of Program Certificationand Eligibility. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.203</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Servicing office. </ITAG>Once approved, a Program Participant will be serviced in the field officeserving the territory in which the concern's principal place of business,as defined in andSection; 124.100, is located. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.204</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicant representatives. </ITAG>Subject to the limitations of andSection; 124.7, an applicant concern mayemploy at its option outside representatives in connection with an applicationfor 8(a) Program Participation. If the applicant chooses to employ outsiderepresentation such as an attorney, accountant, or others, the requirementsof part 103 of this title dealing with the appearance and compensationof persons appearing before SBA are applicable to the conduct of the representative.In addition, representation in proceedings before the Office of Hearingsand Appeals shall be limited as provided in andSection; 134.16 of this title.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Forms and documents required. </ITAG>Each 8(a) applicant concern must submit the forms and attachments theretorequired by SBA when making application for admission to the 8(a) program.Such forms and attachments will include, but are not limited to, financialstatements and Federal personal and business tax returns. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.206</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval and decline of applications for 8(a) program admission. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The AA/MSBandamp;COD is authorized to approve or declineapplications for admission to the 8(a) program. However, denials of programadmission based on his/her finding that the individual(s) claiming socialand economic disadvantage are not socially and/or economically disadvantagedand/or that such individual(s) does (do) not own and/or does (do) not controlthe applicant concern, may be appealed to SBA's Office of Hearings andAppeals (OHA). The Division of Program Certification and Eligibility (theDivision) will receive, review and evaluate all 8(a) applications. TheDivision will advise each program applicant within 15 days after the receiptof an application whether such application is complete and suitable forevaluation and, if not, what additional information or clarification isrequired to complete the application. SBA will process an application for8(a) Program Participation within 90 days of receipt by the Division ofa complete application package. Incomplete application packages will notbe processed. (b) <T3>Approval. </T3>If the AA/MSBandamp;COD finds that the applicant concernmeets all eligibility criteria, he/she shall issue an approval letter tothe concern. The date of the approval letter shall be the date of programcertification for purposes of determining the concern's Program Term pursuantto andSection; 124.110. A concern is not approved for participation in the8(a) program until an approval letter is sent by the AA/MSBandamp;COD tothe concern. Up until that event occurs, any new information which couldhave an adverse affect on the application may be considered by the AA/MSBandamp;COD.An applicant is not entitled to receive program benefits of any kind untila participation agreement is signed and SBA has approved the concern'sbusiness plan pursuant andSection; 124.301. (c) <T3>Decline. </T3>If the AA/MSBandamp;COD finds that an applicant concerndoes not meet all eligibility criteria, he/she will provide written notificationof this finding to the applicant in a letter of decline. The letter ofdecline shall set forth findings based on the facts and in accordance withlaw and regulations for every material issue relating to each eligibilityfactor with specific reasons for each finding. The letter of decline shallinform the applicant of its rights to request reconsideration of the AA/MSBandamp;COD'sdecision and/or to appeal such decision. (1) <T3>Reconsideration. </T3>Every applicant has the right to request thatthe AA/MSBandamp;COD reconsider his/her decline decision. Such request mustbe made in writing to the appropriate regional office of the Division bycertified mail, return receipt requested, within 45 days of the date ofservice of the decline letter. As part of the reconsideration request,the applicant should include any additional information and documentationpertinent to overcoming the reason(s) for the initial decline. If the concernrequests reconsideration, the AA/MSBandamp;COD will issue a written determinationon the reconsideration within 45 days of receipt of the request by theRegional Office of the Division which processed the original application.The Agency's eligibility analysis on reconsideration will consider alleligibility factors in light of all information then available to the Agency,and may approve the application, decline it for any of the same reasonscited in the initial decline or decline it for reasons not previously identified.If, on reconsideration, the AA/MSBandamp;COD finds that the applicant concernmeets all eligibility criteria, he/she shall issue an approval letter tothe concern. The date of the approval letter shall be the date of programcertification for purposes of determining the concern's Program Term pursuantto andSection; 124.110. If, on reconsideration, the AA/MSBandamp;COD determinesthat the concern does not meet all eligibility criteria, he/she will notifythe applicant of this decision by letter. Such letter shall set forth findingsbased on the facts and in accordance with law and regulations for everymaterial issue relating to each eligibility factor with specific reasonsfor each finding. If the concern is being declined solely for reasons notidentified in the initial decline, the concern will be advised that SBAwill treat the decline as an initial decline, and that the concern willbe afforded all rights which were available to it on its initial decline.(2) <T3>Appeal. </T3>An unsuccessful applicant will have the right to appealits decline to OHA if the application is denied based solely on a negativefinding of one or more of the following criteria: social disadvantage,economic disadvantage, ownership or control. The applicant, at its option,may bring such appeal either after the initial decline or after a declineon reconsideration. Petitions of appeal must conform to the requirementsof andSection; 124.210 and will be handled in accordance with the procedurescontained in andSection; 124.210 and part 134 of this title. (3) <T3>Final Agency Decision. </T3>If a declined applicant does not requestreconsideration of the decline or, if eligible under paragraph (c)(2) ofthis section, a declined applicant does not file an appeal with OHA within45 days of the date of service of the decline letter, the determinationof the AA/MSBandamp;COD will become the final Agency division. If the applicationis denied on reconsideration and the applicant does not appeal or havethe right to appeal the denial under paragraph (c)(2) of this section,the decision of the AA/MSBandamp;COD is the final Agency decision. If theapplicant is entitled under paragraph (c)(2) of this section to an appeal,and exercises that right, the decision of the Administrative Law Judgeshall be the final Agency decision.(4) <T3>Reapplication for Program Participation. </T3>A concern which has beendeclined for 8(a) program admission may reapply for admission to the program12 months after the date of the final Agency decision to decline. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.207</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">8(a) Program exit. </ITAG>A concern participating in the 8(a) program may leave the program by anyof the following means: (a) Voluntary withdrawal. (b) Expiration of the Program Term established pursuant to andSection; 124.110;(c) Graduation pursuant to the provisions of andSection; 124.208; (d) Termination pursuant to the provisions of andSection; 124.209. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.208 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program graduation. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>When an 8(a) concern is recognized as successfully completingthe 8(a) program by substantially achieving the targets, objectives andgoals set forth in its business plan prior to the expiration of its ProgramTerm, and has demonstrated the ability to compete in the marketplace withoutassistance under the 8(a) program, its participation within the programmay be determined by SBA to be completed and the firm may be graduatedfrom the program. (b) <T3>Graduation criteria. </T3>In determining whether a concern has substantiallyachieved the goals and objectives of its business plan and has attainedthe ability to compete in the marketplace without 8(a) program assistance,the following factors, among others, shall be considered by SBA. Positiveoverall financial trends, including but not limited to: (1) Profitability;(2) Sales, including improved ratio of non-8(a) sales to 8(a) sales; (3) Net worth, financial ratios, working capital, capitalization, accessto credit and capital; (4) Ability to obtain bonding; (5) A positive comparison of the 8(a) concern's business and financialprofile with profiles of non-8(a) businesses in the same area or similarbusiness category; and (6) Good management capacity and capability. (c) <T3>Graduation procedures</T3>_(1) <T3>Letter of notification. </T3>Upon determination by the SBA pursuantto paragraph (b) of this section that an 8(a) concern should be graduatedfrom the 8(a) program, SBA shall notify the Participant in writing of itsintent to graduate in a letter of notification. The letter of notificationshall set forth findings, based on the facts and in accordance with lawand regulations, for every material issue relating to the basis of theprogram graduation with specific reasons for each finding. The letter ofnotification shall also provide the Participant 45 days from the date ofservice of the letter to submit in writing information which would explainwhy the proposed basis of graduation is not warranted. (2) <T3>Second letter of notification. </T3>After the 45 day response periodhas elapsed, the Division shall consider the proposed graduation, includinginformation submitted by the Participant, if any. As appropriate, the Divisionshall notify the Participant that it will not recommend program graduationor that, despite the information that may have been provided, the basisfor graduation continues to exist. Where appropriate, the Division Directorshall further notify that he/she intends to recommend to the AA/MSBandamp;CODthat the Participant be graduated. In instances where graduation will berecommended, the Division Director shall further notify the Participantthat it will have a further 45 day period from the date of service of thesecond letter of notification to submit to SBA such further informationwhich would explain why the proposed graduation is not justified. (3) <T3>Recommendation of the Division. </T3>Following the second day responseperiod, the Division Director will consider the facts of the proposed graduation,including all information submitted by the Participant. If the DivisionDirector determines that graduation is not appropriate, he/she will sonotify the Participant within 15 days of the close of the response period.If the Division Director determines that graduation is appropriate, he/shewill recommend in writing to the AA/MSBandamp;COD, within 15 days of theclose of the response period, that the Participant be graduated. (4) <T3>Decision of the AA/MSBandamp;COD. </T3>Upon the recommendation of theDivision Director, the AA/MSBandamp;COD will consider the proposed graduationand the written record supporting it. If the AA/MSBandamp;COD determinesthat program graduation is warranted, he/she will issue a Notice of ProgramGraduation to the Participant. If not, he/she will so notify the Participant.(5) <T3>Notice requirements. </T3>A Notice of Program Graduation shall conformto the form, filing and service requirements of part 134 of this title,under which the appeal proceeding shall be conducted. The Notice of ProgramGraduation shall set forth findings, based on the facts and in accordancewith law and regulations, for every material issue relating to the basisof the program graduation with specific reasons for each finding. The Noticeof Program Graduation shall also advise the Program Participant that itmay avail itself of an opportunity for an appeal by filing a petition inaccordance with the provisions of andSection; 124.210 and part 134 of thistitle. (6) <T3>Appeal to Office of Hearings and Appeals. </T3>Procedures governingappeals of program graduation to the Office of Hearings and Appeals areset forth in andSection; 124.210 and part 134. (d) <T3>Post-graduation. </T3>After the effective date of a program graduationas provided for herein, an 8(a) concern is no longer eligible to receiveany 8(a) program assistance. However, such concern is obligated to completepreviously awarded 8(a) subcontracts, including any priced options whichmay be exercised. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.209 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program termination. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Participation of a 8(a) business concern in the 8(a)program may be terminated by SBA prior to the expiration of the concern'sProgram Term for good cause. Examples of good cause include, but are notlimited to, the following: (1) Failure by the concern to continue to maintain its eligibility forprogram participation. (2) Failure by the concern to maintain its status as a small business underthe Small Business Act, as amended, and the regulations promulgated thereunder.<T3>See </T3>andSection; 124.102. (3) Failure by the concern for any reason, including the death of an individualupon whom eligibility was based, to maintain ownership, full-time day-to-daymanagement, and control by the person(s) who has (have) been determinedto be socially and economically disadvantaged pursuant to these regulations.(4) Failure by the concern to obtain written approval from SBA for anychanges in ownership, management or control pursuant to andSection;andSection;124.103 and 124.104. (5) Failure by the concern to disclose to SBA the extent to which nondisadvantagedpersons or firms participate in the management of the section 8(a) businessconcern. (6) A demonstrated pattern of failing to make required submissions or responsesto the Administration in a timely manner, including:(i) Failure by the concern to provide SBA with required quarterly or annualfinancial statements within 90 days of the close of the reporting period,or required audited financial statements within 180 days of the close ofthe reporting period. Failure to provide SBA with requested tax returns,reports, or other available data within 30 days of the date of request.(ii) Failure by the concern to submit an updated business plan within 30days of receipt of request, without an extension of time which has beenapproved by SBA.(iii) Failure by the concern to provide documents or certifications ofcontinued eligibility or otherwise respond to requests for informationrelating to the section 8(a) program from SBA or other authorized governmentofficials within the time frames provided for in the requests.(7) Cessation of business operations by the concern.(8) Failure by the concern to achieve the goals cited in its original ormodified business plan as a result of repeated refusals to accept or utilizeSBA assistance.(9) Failure by the concern to pursue competitive and commercial businessin accordance with the business plan, or failure to make reasonable effortsto achieve competitive status.(10) Failure by the concern to engage in business practices that will promoteits competitiveness within a reasonable period of time as evidenced by,among other indicators, a pattern of inadequate performance or unjustifieddelinquent performance or terminations for default with respect to contractsawarded under the authority of section 8(a).(11) A pattern of inadequate performance of awarded section 8(a) procurementsubcontracts by the concern.(12) Failure by the concern to pay or repay significant financial obligationsowed to the Federal Government.(13) Failure by the concern to obtain and keep current any and all requiredpermits, licenses, and charters.(14) Diversion of funds or other assets from the section 8(a) businessconcern or excessive withdrawals from such concern for the personal benefitof its disadvantaged owners or any person or entity affiliated with suchowners which is detrimental to the achievement of the targets, objectives,and goals contained in such Program Participant's business plan.(15) Unauthorized use of business development expense funds and/or advancepayment funds and/or SBA direct, guaranty or immediate participation loanproceeds; or violation of an advance payment, business development expenseagreement, or loan agreement.(16) Failure by the concern to obtain prior SBA approval of any managementagreement, joint venture agreement or other agreement relative to the performanceof a section 8(a) subcontract. Violation of any requirement of a management,joint venture, or other agreement approved by SBA by either the section8(a) concern or one of the joint venturers.(17) Failure by the concern to obtain approval from SBA before subcontractingunder a section 8(a) subcontract, or failure by the concern to abide byany conditions imposed by SBA upon such approval.(18) Violation by the concern of a section 8(a) subcontract provision whichprohibits contingent fees and gratuities; or failure to disclose to SBAfees paid or to be paid, or costs incurred or committed to third parties,directly or indirectly, in the process of obtaining section 8(a) contractsor subcontracts, or violation of andSection; 124.7.(19) Knowing submission of false information to SBA, including false certificationof compliance with non-8(a) business activity targets under andSection; 124.312(c)(11),on behalf of a section 8(a) business concern by its principals, officers,or agents, or by its employees, where the principal(s) of the section 8(a)concern knows or should have known such submission to be false.(20) Debarment, suspension, voluntary exclusion, or ineligibility of theconcern or its principals pursuant to 13 CFR part 145, FAR subpart 9.4,48 CFR Ch.1, and 48 CFR Ch. 22, or any successor regulation.(21) Conviction of the concern the individual(s) upon whom 8(a) programeligibility, or the director, officer or manager of tribally-owned concern,including one owned by an Alaska Native Corporation, or concern owned bya Hawaiian organization is based for any offense indicating a lack of businessintegrity including, but not limited to:(i) Commission of a criminal offense as an incident to obtaining or attemptingto obtain a public or private contract, or subcontract thereunder, or inthe performance of such contract or subcontract;(ii) Violation of the Organized Crime Control Act of 1970 (Pub. L. 91-452;84 Stat. 922);(iii) Embezzlement, theft, forgery, bribery, falsification or destructionof records, receiving stolen property, or any other offense indicatinga lack of business integrity or business honesty which seriously and directlyaffects the question of present responsibility as a government contractor;(iv) Violation of any Federal antitrust statute;(v) Commission of any felony not specifically listed above; or(vi) Violation of section 16 of the Small Business Act, (15 U.S.C. 645).(22) Conviction of a nondisadvantaged owner, officer, or director the concernfor any offense described in paragraph (a)(21) of this section, providedthat one or more disadvantaged owners or officers of the concern abetted,conspired with or otherwise acquiesced in the owner's or officer's commissionof the offense.(23) Willful failure on behalf of an 8(a) business concern to comply withapplicable labor standards and obligations.(24) Violation of any terms and conditions of the 8(a) Program ParticipationAgreement.  (25) Willful violation by an 8(a) business concern, or any of its principals,of any rule or regulation of the Administration pertaining to materialissues.  (b) <T3>Termination procedures_</T3>(1) <T3>Letter of notification. </T3>When SBA determines that grounds existto terminate a concern's participation in the 8(a) program pursuant tothis section, SBA shall notify the Participant in writing of its intentto terminate in a letter of notification. The letter of notification shallset forth findings, based on the facts and in accordance with law and regulations,for every material issue relating to the grounds upon which such terminationwould be based with specific reasons for each finding. The letter of notificationshall provide the Participant 45 days from the date of service of the letterto submit in writing information which would eliminate the ground(s) fortermination or would explain why the proposed ground(s) should not justifytermination.  (2) <T3>Second letter of notification.</T3> After the 45 day response periodhas elapsed, the Division shall consider the proposed termination, includinginformation submitted by the Participant, if any. The Division shall notifythe Participant that the grounds for proposed termination have been eliminatedor that, despite the information that may have been provided, some or allof the grounds for termination continue to exist. Where appropriate, theDivision Director shall further notify the Participant that he/she intendsto recommend to the AA/MSBandamp;COD that the Participant be terminated fromthe program, and that, within 45 days of the date of service of the secondletter of notification, the Participant may submit to SBA such furtherinformation as would eliminate the ground(s) for termination or would explainwhy the proposed ground(s) should not justify termination.  (3) <T3>Recommendation of the Division.</T3> Following the second 45 day responseperiod, the Division Director will have 15 days to consider the facts ofthe proposed termination, including all information submitted by the Participantand to notify the Participant of his/her recommendation to the AA/MSBandamp;COD.If the grounds for proposed termination continue to exist, the DivisionDirector will recommend in writing to the AA/MSBandamp;COD that the Participantbe terminated.  (4) <T3>Decision of the AA/MSBandamp;COD. </T3>Upon the recommendation of theDivision Director, the AA/MSBandamp;COD will consider the proposed terminationand the written record supporting it. If the AA/MSBandamp;COD determinesthat a termination is warranted, he/she will issue a Notice of Terminationto the Participant. If not, he/she will so notify the Participant.  (5) <T3>Notice requirements.</T3> A Notice of Termination shall conform tothe form, filing and service requirements of Part 134 of this Title, underwhich the appeal proceeding shall be conducted. The Notice of Terminationshall set forth findings, based on the facts and in accordance with lawand regulations, for every material issue relating to the grounds uponwhich the termination is based. The Notice of Termination shall also advisethe Program Participant that it may avail itself of an opportunity foran appeal by filing a petition in accordance with the provisions of andSection;124.210 and part 134 of this title.  (6) <T3>Appeal to Office of Hearings and Appeals. </T3>Procedures governingappeals of program termination to the Office of Hearings and Appeals areset forth in andSection; 124.210 and part 134 of this title.  (c) <T3>Post-termination. </T3>After the effective date of a program termination,an 8(a) business concern is no longer eligible to receive any section 8(a)program assistance. However, such concern is obligated to complete previouslyawarded 8(a) subcontracts, including any priced options which may be exercised.(<T3>See</T3> andSection; 124.211 for Program Suspension).  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.210  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Appeals to SBA's Office of Hearings and Appeals.  </ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this section, an applicant concernor Program Participant shall be afforded the opportunity to appeal anyof the following Agency determinations:  (1) Denial of program admission based solely on a negative finding(s) ofsocial disadvantage, economic disadvantage, ownership or control pursuantto andSection; 124.206;  (2) Graduation pursuant to andSection; 124.208;  (3) Termination pursuant to andSection; 124.209; or,(4) Denial of a request to issue a waiver pursuant to andSection; 124.317.(b) The applicant or Participant concern may initiate such appeal by filinga petition in accordance with part 134 of this title with SBA's Officeof Hearings and Appeals (OHA) within 45 days of the date of service ofthe final Agency determination pursuant to paragraph (a) of this section.In addition to the requirements of andSection; 134.11(a), the petition shallstate, with specific reference to the determination and the record supportingsuch determination, the reasons why the determination is alleged to bearbitrary, capricious or contrary to law. Concurrent with its filing withOHA, the concern shall also serve the AA/MSBandamp;COD with a copy of thepetition, including all attachments.(c) Appeal proceedings brought under the authority of this section shallbe conducted by an Administrative Law Judge.(d) The Administrative Law Judge selected to preside over an appeal shalldecline to accept jurisdiction over any matter if:(1) The appeal does not, on its face, allege facts that, if proven to betrue, would warrant reversal or modification of the determination, includingappeals of proposed denials of 8(a) program admission which have been basedin whole or in part on grounds other than a negative finding of socialdisadvantage, economic disadvantage, ownership or control;(2) The appeal is untimely filed under andSection; 134.12 or is not otherwisefiled in accordance with the requirements of this section and the rulesof procedure set forth in part 134 of this title; or(3) The matter has been decided or is the subject of an adjudication beforea court of competent jurisdiction over such matters.(e) Once the Administrative Law Judge accepts jurisdiction over an appeal,subsequent initiation of an adjudication of the matter by a court of competentjurisdiction will not preclude the Administrative Law Judge from renderinga final decision on the matter.(f) Proceedings conducted under the authority of this section shall beconducted in accordance with the provisions of this section and part 134of this title.(g) Unless it is established that the convenience and necessity of theparties requires otherwise, in the sole discretion of the AdministrativeLaw Judge, any oral hearing conducted with respect to an appeal pursuantto paragraph (a) of this section shall be held in the Washington, DC area.(h)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (h)(3) of this section, any proceedingconducted under the authority of paragraph (a) of this section shall bedecided solely on a review of the written administrative record. The determinationby the AA/MSBandamp;COD or a designee for matters related to paragraphs (a)(1),(a)(2), and (a)(3) of this section, and the determination by the Administratorfor matters related to paragraph (a)(4) of this section, shall be sustainedunless such determination is found to be arbitrary, capricious, or contraryto law.(2) If the Administrative Law Judge determines that, due to the absencein the written administrative record of the reasons upon which the determinationin question was based, such administrative record is insufficiently completeto decide whether the determination is arbitrary and capricious or contraryto law, the case shall be remanded by the Administrative Law Judge to theAA/MSBandamp;COD for further consideration in accordance with the terms ofsuch remand. Such remand shall be for a period of no more than 10 workingdays. The ALJ shall retain jurisdiction of the matter during such periodas the matter is on remand.(3)(i) Neither the admission of evidence beyond the written administrativerecord, nor any form of discovery, will be permitted in proceedings underthis section unless it is first determined by the Administrative Law Judgethat the applicant concern or Participant, upon written submission, hasmade a substantial showing, based upon credible evidence, and not mereallegation, that the Agency determination in question may have resultedfrom bad faith or improper behavior. Prior to any such determination, theAgency shall be afforded an opportunity to respond in writing to the submissionof the applicant concern or Participant. Upon a determination by the AdministrativeLaw Judge that the applicant concern or Participant has made such a substantialshowing, the Administrative Law Judge may permit appropriate discovery,and accept relevant evidence beyond the written administrative record,which is specifically limited to the alleged bad faith or improper behaviorasserted by the applicant concern or Participant.(ii) A determination by the Administrative Law Judge that the requiredshowing set forth in paragraph (h)(3)(i) of this section has been madedoes not shift the burden of proof, which continues to rest with the applicantconcern or the Participant.(i) A decision rendered by the Administrative Law Judge under the authorityof this section shall be the final decision of the Administration and shallbe binding upon the parties and those within the employ of the Administration.(j) Such decision shall be rendered, insofar as practicable, within ninetydays after a petition for appeal is filed, and, in the event such 90-daytime limit has not been met, the Administrative Law Judge shall indicatethe reason therefor in the decision, when issued.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.211.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Suspension of program assistance.</ITAG>(a) At any time after the issuance of an initial letter of notificationof termination pursuant to andSection; 124.209(b)(1), the AA/MSB and CODmay suspend contract support and all other forms of 8(a) program assistanceto that concern for a period of time not to exceed the time necessary toresolve the issue of the concern's termination from the program under theprocedures set forth in andSection; 124.209 and in part 134 of this title.The institution of such a suspension will not occur in conjunction witheach proposed termination, but will only occur when SBA determines thatsuspension of the concern's program participation is needed to protectthe interests of the Government. For example, SBA will generally find thatit is in the best interests of the Government to suspend a Participantwhere the proposed termination is based on fraud or the submission of falsestatements or program ineligibility.(b) Immediately upon SBA's determination to suspend an 8(a) concern, SBAwill furnish that concern with a Notice of Suspension by certified mail,return receipt requested, to the last known address of the concern. Ifno receipt is returned within ten calendar days from the mailing of thenotice, notice will be presumed to have occurred as of that time. The Noticeof Suspension will provide the following information:(1) The reason(s) for the suspension;(2) A statement that the suspension will continue pending the completionof further investigation or final program termination proceeding or someother specified period of time;(3) Notice that awards of competitive and non-competitive section 8(a)subcontracts, including those which have been ``self-marketed'' by an 8(a)concern, will not be made during the pendency of the suspension unlessit is determined by the head of the relevant procuring agency or his/herauthorized representative to be in the best interest of the Governmentto do so, and SBA adopts that determination;(4) Notice that the concern is obligated to complete previously awardedsection 8(a) subcontracts;(5) Notice that the suspension is effective nationally throughout the SBA;(6) A statement that a request for a hearing on the suspension will beconsidered by an Administrative Law Judge in SBA's Office of Hearings andAppeals (OHA), and granted or denied as a matter of his/her discretion.(7) A statement that the firm's Program Term is suspended effective thedate of the suspension and that it will resume only if the concern's participationin the program is not terminated.(c) It is contemplated that in most cases a hearing on the issue of thesuspension will be afforded if the Participant requests one. However, nohearing shall be granted if the suspension is based upon advice from eitherthe Department of Justice or the Department of Labor that such a hearingwould prejudice substantial interests of the Government.(d) The applicant concern may appeal a Notice of Suspension by filing apetition in accordance with part 134 of this title with OHA within 30 daysof the date of service of a Notice of Suspension pursuant to paragraph(b) of this section. Concurrent with its filing with OHA, the concern shallalso serve the AA/MSBandamp;COD with a copy of the petition including allattachments.(e) A request for a hearing on the suspension will be considered by anAdministrative Law Judge in OHA, and granted as a matter of his/her discretion.(f) Proceedings conducted under the authority of this section shall beconducted in accordance with the provisions of this section and part 134of this title.(g) For any oral hearing convened pursuant to andSection; 134.19 of thisTitle resulting from a request filed in accordance with this section, theAdministrative Law Judge shall give due regard to the convenience and necessityof the parties or their authorized representatives in designating the placeof the oral hearing.(h) A hearing on the suspension will commence as soon as possible followingthe decision of the Administrative Law Judge to grant a request, but inno case more than 20 calendar days after the Administrative Law Judge'sruling if the request is granted.(i) At the close of such suspension hearing, the Administrative Law Judgeshall issue a decision upholding or lifting the suspension.The decisionof the Administrative Law Judge shall be the final Agency decision.(j) Any program suspension which occurs in accordance with these regulationswill continue in effect until such time as the SBA lifts the suspensionor the 8(a) concern's participation in the program is fully terminated.If all program assistance to an 8(a) concern has been suspended under theseregulations and the concern's participation in the program is not terminated,the suspension will be lifted and the Program Term remaining as of theeffective date of Program Suspension will be restored to the concern. However,nothing in this paragraph precludes SBA from initiating termination, graduationor suspension proceedings at any time during the concern's Program Term.(k) SBA does not recognize the concept of <T3>de facto</T3> suspension. Reinstatement of the remaining portion ofa Program Term will occur only where a concern's program participationhas been formally suspended by SBA in accordance with the procedures setforth in this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.300</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Business development.</ITAG>The regulations at andSection; 124.301 through andSection; 124.321 addressthe provision of various forms of assistance to 8(a) Program Participantsto promote the business development of such concerns. Such assistance includesfinancial, management and technical assistance, and contract support. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.301 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Development of business plan.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>In order to assist the SBA in determining the businessdevelopment needs of each 8(a) Program Participant, each such Participantshall develop a comprehensive business plan, setting forth the Participant'sbusiness targets, objectives, and goals. The business plan shall be submittedto the SBA servicing field office in final form promptly after the Participant'sreceipt of notice of certification to participate in the 8(a) program.The Participant will not be eligible for 8(a) Program benefits until theSBA approves its business plan. The approved business plan will constitutethe Participant's short and long term goals and the strategy for developmentalgrowth to the point of economic viability independent of the 8(a) program.(b) <T3>Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) code designations. </T3>Theconcern's primary industry classification as defined in andSection; 124.100and all related secondary Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) codedesignations shall be stated in an 8(a) concern's original business plan.Such SIC codes may be changed, and new SIC codes may be added to the businessplan, however, where the conditions of andSection; 124.302(c) are met. Onceadmitted to the 8(a) program, a concern will only be permitted to perform8(a) contracts which are classified under approved SIC codes which appearin its business plan. An 8(a) concern may receive a Federal contract classifiedunder a SIC code not contained in its business plan where the contractis not awarded through the section 8(a) program.(c) <T3>Contents of business plan. </T3>The initial business plan shall containat least the following:(1) An analysis of market potential, competitive environment, and otherbusiness analyses estimating the Program Participant's prospects for profitableoperations during the term of program participation and after graduation;(2) An analysis of the Program Participant's strengths and weaknesses,with particular attention paid to the means of correcting any financial,managerial, technical, or labor conditions which could impede the Participantfrom receiving contracts other than those awarded through the 8(a) Program;(3) Specific targets, objectives, and goals for the business developmentof the Participant during the next two years, utilizing the results ofthe analyses conducted pursuant to paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2) of thissection;(4) Estimates of contract awards pursuant to section 8(a) and from othersources which would be needed by the Participant to meet the specific targets,objectives and goals for the years covered by the business plan; and(5) Such other information as SBA may require.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.302 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review and modification of business plan.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Annual review. </T3>Each Participant shall annually review its currentlyapproved business plan with the Business Opportunity Specialist (BOS) andshall modify such plan as may be appropriate. Any modified plan shall besubmitted to the BOS for approval. A currently approved plan shall be consideredthe applicable plan for all program purposes until the SBA approves inwriting a modified plan. SBA shall establish an anniversary date for reviewof the Participant's business plan and contract support forecasts. Theannual review of a Participant's business plan will generally occur within15 working days before or after the anniversary of the firm's certificationof 8(a) eligibility.(b) <T3>Contract support forecast. </T3>Each Participant shall annually forecastin writing its needs for contract awards for the next program year andthe succeeding program year during the review of its business plan conductedunder paragraph (a) of this section. Such forecast shall be included inthe Participant's business plan. The forecast shall include:(1) The aggregate dollar value of contract support to be sought under section8(a) (sole source and competitive), reflecting compliance with the businessmix requirements of andSection; 124.312;(2) The aggregate dollar value of non-8(a) contracts to be sought;(3) The types of contract opportunities being sought, identified by theappropriate Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) code; and(4) Such other information as may be requested by the SBA to aid in providingeffective business development assistance to the Participant.(c) <T3>Changes in SIC code designations. </T3>(1) Requests for changes inSIC code designations stated in a business plan shall be approved by SBAif it is determined that:(i)(A) The requested SIC code represents a logical business progressionfor the concern;(B) The 8(a) concern has demonstrated capacity and capability to performin the requested SIC code; and(C) Other applicable eligibility criteria (Walsh-Healey Act, the non-manufacturerrule, size rules, etc.) appear to be met; or(ii) SBA erred in omitting a previously requested and supported SIC code,improperly classifying a business industry or making a typographical orother error in its letter of approval to the 8(a) concern.(2) SBA will make a decision on such request within 45 days from the dateit receives the request.(d) <T3>Transition management plan. </T3>Beginning in the first year of thetransitional stage of program participation under andSection; 124.303, eachParticipant shall annually submit for inclusion in its business plan atransition management plan outlining specific steps to promote profitablebusiness operations after graduation. The transition management plan shouldbe submitted to the BOS at the same time other modifications are submittedpursuant to the annual review under paragraph (a) of this section. Suchplan shall set forth the same information as required under paragraph (b)of this section for the initial plan, incorporate the competitive mix requirementsof andSection; 124.312, and provide specific transition steps the Participantwill take to continue its business development after the expiration ofits Program Term. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.303</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stages of 8(a) program participation.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Program participation is divided into two stages_a developmentalstage and a transitional stage. For firms approved for 8(a) program participationafter November 15, 1988, the developmental stage shall be 4 years and thetransitional stage shall be 5 years unless the Participant has exited theprogram by one of the means set forth in andSection; 124.110. The developmentalstage is designed to assist participants to overcome their economic disadvantageby providing such assistance as may be necessary and appropriate to enablethem to access relevant markets and strengthen their financial and managerialskills. The transitional stage of program participation follows the developmentalstage and is designed to assist Participants to overcome, insofar as practicable,the remaining elements of economic disadvantage and to prepare Participantsfor leaving the 8(a) program.(b) <T3>Stages for grandfathered Program Participants. </T3>(1) For ProgramParticipants with five or fewer years remaining in the 8(a) program asof August 15, 1989, the program year they are in on August 15, 1989 shallbe considered the first year of the transitional stage. Such Participantsshall be subject to the modified business targets set forth in andSection;124.312. (2) For concerns with more than five years remaining in the 8(a) programas of August 15, 1989, the stages of program participation shall be determinedso that the Participant will have five years in the transitional stage.The remaining time in the program shall be considered time in the developmentalstage. For example, if a Participant has seven years remaining in the programas of August 15, 1989, it will be considered to have 2 years remainingin the developmental stage and five years in the transitional stage.(c) <T3>Developmental stage of program participation. </T3>A Program Participant,if otherwise eligible, shall be qualified to receive the following assistanceduring the developmental stage of program participation:(1) Sole source and competitive 8(a) contract support;(2) Financial assistance pursuant to andSection; 122.57 of this title;(3) Pursuant to andSection; 124.304, a maximum of two exemptions from therequirements of section 1(a) of the Walsh-Healey Act, 41 U.S.C. 35(a); (4) Pursuant to andSection; 124.305, a maximum of five exemptions from therequirements of the Miller Act (40 U.S.C. 270a through 270d) that performancebonds be issued for the protection of the United States and payment bondsbe issued for the protection of persons furnishing material and labor forthe construction, alteration, or repair of public buildings or public works; (5) Pursuant to andSection; 124.306, financial assistance from SBA for skillstraining or upgrading for employees or potential employees of Program Participants; (6) The transfer of technology or surplus property owned by the UnitedStates to Program Participants by grant, license, or sale. Technology orproperty transferred pursuant to this paragraph must be used by the Participantduring the normal conduct of its business operation and cannot be soldor transferred to any other party (other than the Government) during suchconcern's Program Term and for one year thereafter. A Participant mustagree to these conditions prior to any transfer of technology or property;and  (7) Training sessions to assist individuals and enterprises eligible toreceive 8(a) contracts in the development of business principles and strategiesto enhance their ability to compete successfully for contracts in the marketplace. (d) <T3>Transitional stage of program participation. </T3>A Program Participant,if otherwise eligible, shall be qualified to receive the following assistanceduring the transitional stage of program participation:  (1) The same assistance as that provided to Participants in the developmentalstage under paragraphs (c)(1), (c)(2), (c)(6) and (c)(7) of this section; (2) Assistance from procuring agencies (in cooperation with SBA) in formingjoint ventures, leader-follower arrangements, and teaming agreements betweenthe Participant and other Program Participants or other business concerns,in accordance with all applicable statutes and regulations, with respectto contracting opportunities for research, development, fullscale engineeringor production of major systems. In the case of a requirement to be procuredas a Small Business Set-aside, a Small Disadvantaged Business Set-aside,or through the 8(a) program, applicable size regulationis will apply indetermining whether the cooperative venture between a Participant and anotherbusiness entity qualifies as a small business concern; and  (3) Training and technical assistance in transitional business planning. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.304  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Statutory exemption from the Walsh-Healey Act.  </ITAG>(a) SBA is authorized to grant Program Participants in the developmentalstage of participation a maximum of two exemptions from the requirementsof section 1(a) of the Walsh-Healey Act, 41 U.S.C. 35(a). These exemptionsapply only to specific 8(a) contracts with anticipated contract valuesunder $10,000,000 (including options) and shall be used only to allow forcontingent agreements by a Participant to acquire the machinery, equipment,facilities, or labor needed to perform such contracts. An exemption maybe granted only where such exemption is needed to permit the firm to performa contract which is consistent with the business development goals setforth in its approved business plan and SBA determines that the Participantis fully capable of performing the contract. SBA must be provided witha copy of the intended contingent agreement for its review prior to grantingan exemption.  (b) The exemptions described in this section are authorized only untilOctober 1, 1992 and apply only to those contracts awarded on or after August21, 1989, the effective date fo these regulations.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.305  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Statutory exemption from Miller Act bonds.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Policy. </T3>Subject to the conditions contained in this section, SBAmay exempt an 8(a) Participant in the developmental stage of program participationfrom any payment and performance bonds required by the Miller Act (40 U.S.C.270a through 270d) for, and in connection with, any 8(a) construction contractwhenever it is determined by SBA that the 8(a) concern is unable to obtainthe requisite bond(s) from a surety for the performance of the 8(a) contract.The exercise of this authority by SBA is subject to the conditions setforth in paragraph (b) of this section.  (b) <T3>Conditions for SBA exemption of bonding requirements. </T3>In orderto be eligible to obtain an exemption from the bonds required by the MillerAct, the following requirements must be met:  (1) The Program Participant must have been engaged in construction activitiesfor a period of at least two years;  (2) SBA must find that the concern is otherwise eligible to receive a specific8(a) construction contract, but is unable to obtain the requisite bond(s)required by the Miller Act for the performance of the contract;  (3) The Participant must demonstrate that it cannot obtain a bond for theperformance of the requirement by submitting to SBA written denials fromat least two sureties, one of which is a corporate surety and one of whichis an individual surety.  (4) SBA must determine that the firm has the potential to become bondablefor future contracts if assisted by the bond exemption.  (c) <T3>Limitations. </T3>(1) The maximum dollar value of an 8(a) contracton which a bond requirement can be exempted is $3,000,000 (including options). (2) Exemptions from Miller Act bond requirements are available only onsole source 8(a) contracts. Exemptions will not be granted on competitive8(a) contracts.  (3) In no event shall the exemption described in paragraph (a) of thissection be construed to make SBA liable to the procuring agency, 8(a) concernor any supplier, subcontractor, laborer or others for contractual obligationsentered into by the 8(a) concern under the 8(a) contract to which the exemptionapplies.  (4) Unless approved in writing by the Regional Administrator or his/herdesignee. Participant may receive an exemption for a 8(a) contract underthis section. If it is performing a contract for which an exemption underthis section has been granted.  (5) No Participant may receive more than a total of five exemptions underthis section. Where a Participant receives an exemption for a procurementhaving a base year and one or more option years, a continuation of theexemption, an option which is exercised does not count as an additionalexemption (i.e., an exemption on such a contract counts as one exemption,not one for the base year and one for each of the option years exercised). (6) No further bond exemptions shall be granted where a contract for whicha Participant has previously received an exemption has been terminatedfor default.  (d) <T3>Protection of third parties. </T3>The following requirements must bemet before a contract will be awarded under this section. These requirementsare intended to protect third parties to the contract.  (1) The 8(a) contractor must make timely payment to all persons furnishingmaterials or labor to the 8(a) concern in the performance of the contract. (2) There must be established a special bank account in an institutioninsured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), into whichthe procuring agency will deposit all payments relating to the performanceof the contract, or, in the alternative, the procuring agency, at its option,shall provide for direct disbursement of contract proceeds to suppliers,subcontractors, laborers and others.(3) All disbursements from any special bank account established shall besubject to the approval and counter signature by SBA or a third party approvedin writing by the AA/MSB andamp; COD. (This requirement for a controlledaccount will be satisfied if SBA makes an advance payment to the Participantpursuant to andSection; 124.401 of these regulations and a special bank accountis established in connection therewith.)(4) The 8(a) contractor must notify persons supplying it with materialsor labor in writing that the contract is exempt from the Miller Act's bondingrequirement and must also notify such suppliers in writing that SBA willnot be liable for payment for materials or labor. The 8(a) contractor mustobtain a written acknowledgment of such notification from each supplierof materials or labor, and such acknowledgment(s) must be in SBA's possessionprior to award of the contract where practicable, and, in all instancesprior to payment of invoices.(5) The requirements set forth in paragraphs (d)(1), (d)(2), (d)(3), and(d)(4) of this section must be contained in the special 8(a) contract clauses,as appropriate.(e) <T3>Procedure for obtaining a bond exemption. </T3>(1) A Program Participantwhich seeks a bond exemption under this section may submit a written requestto the applicable SBA servicing field office.(2) Upon receipt of the request, SBA shall notify the Participant of supportingdocumentation that must be submitted in order to process the exemptionrequest.(3) If SBA preliminarily determines that a bond exemption is appropriate,SBA shall contact the procuring agency and obtain its written views withrespect to the bond exemption.(4) The views and concerns of the procuring agency will be heavily weighedin determining whether to grant a bond exemption.(5) If the procuring agency does not concur with the bond exemption andSBA determines that an exemption should not be granted, SBA may acceptthe offer for another 8(a) concern.(f) <T3>Expiration date. </T3>The exemptions described in this section areauthorized only until October 1, 1992 and apply only to those contractsawarded on or after August 21, 1989, the effective date of these regulations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.306</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Financial assistance for skills training.</ITAG>(a) SBA may pay in whole or in part the costs of training or upgradingof employees or potential employees of 8(a) concerns. An owner participatingin the day-to-day management of a Participant may be considered to be anemployee for purposes of this section. Payments may be made directly tothe training provider or by reimbursing the Program Participant or theParticipant's employee, if such reimbursement is found to be reasonableand appropriate.(b) SBA assistance under this section is subject to the following conditionsand requirements:(1) The concern must be in the developmental stage of program participation.(2) The 8(a) concern must document that it has explored the use of existingcost-free or cost-subsidized training programs offered by public and privatesector agencies working with programs of employment and training and economicdevelopment and that no such programs are available or are capable of meetingthe training needs of the participant.(3) The concern must be current with any reporting requirements establishedby SBA for ongoing program participation.(4) The employee receiving the training or upgrading may not be a beneficiaryof any other publicly or privately funded training program which benefitsthe trainee or upgraded employee for the same activity SBA is compensatingunder this section.(5) The training provider must be an institution of higher education, acommunity or vocational college, or an institution eligible to provideskills training under the Job Training Partnership Act (29 U.S.C. 1501,<T3>et seq</T3>.).(6) The training provider may not be debarred or suspended from any Federalprograms. (7) The training of employees or potential employees of a concern mustbe consistent with the concern's approved business plan.(8) SBA must approve the training in writing prior to its commencement.(9) No more than five employees or potential employees of a single 8(a)concern may be recipients of benefits under this section at one time.(10) The length of training or skills upgrading financed under this sectionmay be no less than one month nor more than six months.(11) The training of skills upgrading assistance must be of a type whichwill offer genuine capacity development for the employing firm.(12) No more than $2,500 shall be made available for any one employee orpotential employee.(13) The Participant must execute and submit to SBA any appropriate writtenemployment agreements in accordance with paragraph (f) of this section.(c) SBA's allocation of resources appropriated for the purposes of thissection shall generally be based on the identification of needs of developmentalstage concerns. SBA shall evaluate training needs in the annual businessplan review process, and may conduct other surveys as appropriate.(d) Projects to be funded under this section shall be initiated by a requestprepared by the 8(a) concern and submitted to SBA. SBA may request additionalinformation before the request is processed.(e) Assistance under this section will be made only when the agreementsentered into by SBA to fund training or upgrading contain acceptable trainingand upgrading standards and acceptable monitoring standards and requirementsto insure the integrity and effectiveness of the training or upgrading.(f) The Participant must give adequate assurance that it will employ thetrainee or upgraded employee for at least six months after the trainingor upgrading financed pursuant to this section has been completed. Traineesand upgraded employees must provide a similar assurance that they willremain in the employ of the 8(a) firm for such six-month period. Such assurancewill consist of an appropriate written employment agreement. If a traineeor upgraded employee does not remain in the employ of the participant forat least six months after receiving such SBA-financed training or upgrading,the violating party must reimburse SBA for the amount expended togetherwith any reasonable interest and costs incurred for collection. In addition,the violating party, whether it is the Participant, individual traineeor upgraded employee, shall be barred from receiving any further assistanceunder this section. The appropriate SBA Regional Administrator, or his/herdesignee, may waive the reimbursement provisions of this paragraph in limitedcircumstances where an employee's leaving is due to an unforseen event(e.g., the employee's spouse is relocated by his/her business and the employeemust move).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.307 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contractual assistance.</ITAG>(a) It is the policy of SBA to enter into contracts with other Governmentagencies and to subcontract the performance of such contracts, pursuantto section 8(a)(1)(C) of the Small Business Act, to 8(a) Program Participantsat prices which will enable such concerns to perform the contracts andearn a reasonable profit.(b) Such subcontracts may either be sole source awards or awards attainedthrough competition reserved for eligible Participants.(c) Admission into the 8(a) program does not bestow a right to receive8(a) contracts. SBA's approval of a Participant's business plan pursuantto andSection; 124.301 does not guarantee the Participant any particularlevel of contract support.(d) An 8(a) contract will be provided to a Participant only when such contractis consistent with the Participant's capabilities and business developmentneeds, as determined by SBA.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.308 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for obtaining and accepting procurements for the 8(a) program.</ITAG>(a) <T3>PCR-serviced agencies. </T3>If an SBA Procurement Center Representative(PCR) is resident or has liaison responsibilities in a procuring agency,he/she will be responsible for screening proposed procurements for possible8(a) contracts, in accordance with 13 CFR 125.6.(b) <T3>Requirement identification. </T3>(1) A requirement for possible awardmay be identified by SBA, a particular Program Participant or the procuringagency itself. Once a requirement that appears suitable for the 8(a) programhas been identified, SBA shall verify the appropriateness of the SIC codedesignation assigned to the requirement and request the procuring agencyto offer the requirement to the 8(a) program. So long as the SIC code assigned to the requirement by the procuring agencycontracting officer is reasonable, the SIC Code will be accepted by SBA.(2) If SBA and the procuring agency are unable to agree as to the properSIC code designation for the requirement, SBA may refuse to accept therequirement for the 8(a) program, or appeal the contracting officer's determinationto the head of the agency pursuant to andSection; 124.320, or the AA/MSBandamp; COD file a SIC code appeal to SBA's Office of Hearings and Appeals.(3) If the requirement exceeds the thresholds established by andSection;124.311, the SBA will request that the requirement be offered to the 8(a)program to be competed among eligible Program Participants, unless SBAdetermines that there is not a reasonable expectation that at least twoeligible 8(a) concerns will submit offers.(4) If the requirement is below the thresholds established by andSection;124.311, the SBA may request that it be offered to the 8(a) program forpossible sole source award as an open requirement or in support of theapproved business plan of a specific Program Participant, or it may acceptthe requirement for competition upon the procuring agency's request.(c) <T3>Offering letter. </T3>When a requirement is offered to the 8(a) program,the offering letter or notification from the procuring activity shall containthe following information.(1) A description of the work to be performed or items to be deliveredand a copy of the statement of work, if available; (2) The estimated period of performance;(3) The SIC code that applies to the principal nature of the acquisition;(4) The anticipated dollar value of the requirement, including options,if any;(5) Any special restrictions or geographical limitations on the requirement;(6) The location of the work to be performed for construction and serviceprocurements;(7) Any special capabilities or disciplines needed for contract performance;(8) The type of contract to be awarded, such as firm fixed price, costreimbursement, or time and materials;(9) The acquisition history, if any, of the requirement;(10) The names and addresses of any small business contractors which haveperformed on this requirement during the previous 24 months;(11) A statement that no solicitation for the specific acquisition hasbeen issued as a small business set-aside or small disadvantaged businessset-aside and that no other public communication (such as a notice in theCommerce Business Daily) has been made evidencing the procuring agency'sclear intention to set aside the acquisition for small business or smalldisadvantaged business (<T3>see </T3>andSection; 124.309(a));(12) Identification of any particular 8(a) concern designated for consideration,including a brief justification, such as one of the following: (i) The 8(a) concern, through its own efforts, marketed the requirementand caused it to be reserved for the 8(a) program; or(ii) The acquisition is a follow-on or renewal contract and the nominatedconcern is the incumbent;(13) Bonding requirements, if applicable;(14) Identification of all 8(a) concerns which have expressed an interestin being considered for the acquisition;(15) If the requirement is a national buy, identification of all SBA districtor regional offices which have asked for the acquisition for the 8(a) program;(16) A request that the acquisition be competitive, if appropriate, andthe estimated contract value is under the applicable threshold; and(17) Any other information that the procuring agency deems relevant orSBA requests.(d) <T3>Acceptance of the requirement.</T3> Upon receipt of the procuring agency'soffer, SBA will determine whether it will accept the requirement for the8(a) program. SBA's decision whether to accept the requirement will betransmitted to the procuring agency in writing within 15 working days ofreceipt of the offer, unless SBA requests, and the procuring agency grants,an extension. If SBA decides to accept a sole source requirement for the8(a) program, it will advise the procuring agency in writing. In the caseof a local buy requirement, as defined in andSection;124.100, SBA will acceptthe offer both on behalf of the program and in support of the businessplan of a specific Participant. In the case of a national buy requirement,as defined in andSection;124.100 SBA will accept the offer for the 8(a) programgenerally and will advise the procuring activity that SBA's appropriatefield office will designate a specific Participant for contract performance.If SBA decides to accept a competitive requirement for the 8(a) program,it will send a letter to the procuring agency accepting the offer for thebenefit of the 8(a) program generally. SBA is not required to accept anyparticular procurement for the 8(a) program.(e) <T3>Sole source award where procuring agency nominates a specific programparticipant.</T3> If the procuring agency identifies a particular 8(a)concern for a sole source award, SBA will determine whether an appropriatematch exists.(1) Once a procurement is deemed suitable for acceptance as an 8(a) solesource contract, it will normally be accepted on behalf of the participantrecommended by the procuring agency, provided that:(i) The procurement is consistent with the Participant's business plan;(ii) The Participant is determined by SBA to be a responsible contractorwith respect to performance of the contract; and(iii) The award of the contract would not result in the Participant exceedingits approved 8(a) business support level or the business mix requirementsestablished under andSection;124.312.(2) If an appropriate match exists, SBA will send a letter accepting theoffer in support of the business plan of the identified Participant tothe procuring agency. This letter will advise the procuring agency whetherSBA will participate in contract negotiations or whether SBA will authorizethe procuring agency to negotiate directly with the identified ProgramParticipant. A Program Participant selected by SBA to perform a noncompetitive8(a) contract shall, when practicable, participate in any negotiation ofthe terms and conditions of such contract.(3) If SBA determines that an appropriate match with the nominated 8(a)concern does not exist based on the factors set forth in paragraph (e)(1)of this section, it will notify the affected 8(a) concern and may thenselect an alternate 8(a) concern, in accordance with paragraph (f)(3) ofthis section. It will so advise the procuring agency of its actions.(f) <T3>Open requirements.</T3> When a procuring agency does not nominate aparticular concern for performance of a sole source 8(a) contract (openrequirement), the following additional procedures will apply:(1) If the contract is a local buy item, SBA will examine the portfolioof 8(a) concerns for the SBA district office where the work is to be performedor the items delivered for selection of a qualified 8(a) concern. If noneis found to be qualified or a match for a concern in that district is determinedto be impossible or inappropriate, the requirement may be considered forother 8(a) concerns located within the region or, if appropriate, otherregions.(2) If the procurement is a national buy item, it shall be referred toSBA's Central Office in Washington, DC. The Central Office will allocatenational buy requirements on an equitable basis.(3) In cases in which SBA must select a participant for possible awardfrom among two or more eligible and qualified participants, the selectionwill be based upon consideration of relevant factors, including the businessdevelopment needs, compliance with competitive business mix requirements(if applicable), financial condition, management ability, and technicalcapability of each participant. SBA shall make its selection based uponan examination of the business plan and procurement history of the concernas well as any supplemental materials requested and received.(4) To the maximum extent practicable, the SBA shall promote the equitablegeographic distribution of 8(a) sole source contracts.(g) <T3>Formal technical evaluations.</T3> SBA will not authorize formal technicalevaluations for sole source 8(a) contracts. If a procuring agency requiresthe performance of a formal technical evaluation among more than one 8(a)concern, the procuring agency must request that the requirement be a competitive8(a) award. The procuring agency may request a formal two-step procurementprocess pursuant to section 14.5 of the FAR, 48 CFR subpart 14.5, or astandard negotiated competitive procurement. Agencies may, however, conductinformal assessments of several 8(a) firms' capabilities to perform a specificrequirement, provided that the statement of work for the requirement isnot released to any of the participating 8(a) firms.(h) <T3>Repetitive acquisitions.</T3> In order for repetitive acquisitionsto be awarded through the 8(a) program, there must be separate offers andacceptances. This enables the SBA to reassess a firm's eligibility, toevaluate the suitability of each acquisition for competitive 8(a) award,and to determine whether the requirement should continue under the 8(a)program.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.309</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Barriers to acceptance.</ITAG>SBA will not accept for 8(a) award proposed procurements not previouslyin the 8(a) program if any of the circumstances identified in paragraphs(a), (b), or (c) of this section exist.(a)<T3> Solicitation previously issued.</T3> A solicitation has already beenissued for the procurement as a small business set-aside, such as an Invitationfor Bid (IFB) or Request for Proposal (RFP). The AA/MSBandamp;COD may permitthe acceptance of the requirement, however, under extraordinary circumstances,such as where a procuring agency had made a decision to offer the requirementto the 8(a) program before the solicitation was sent out and the procuringagency acknowledges and documents that the solicitation was in error.(b)<T3> Reservation as small business or SDB set-aside.</T3> The procuringagency has expressed publicly a clear intention to reserve the procurementas a small business or small disadvantaged business (SDB) set-aside (<T3>e.g.,</T3> a notice of intent to set aside a procurement publishedin the Commerce Business Daily which invites a response from interestedsmall businesses). The AA/MSBandamp;COD may permit the acceptance of therequirement, however, under extraordinary circumstances, such as wherea procuring agency had made a decision to offer the requirement to the8(a) program before the notice was sent out and the procuring agency acknowledgesand documents that the notice was in error. An annual procurement forecastor solicitation of information for possible small business set aside willgenerally not be considered as a clear exhibition of intention to set asidea procurement for small businesses.(c)<T3> Adverse Impact.</T3> SBA has made a written determination that acceptanceof the procurement for 8(a) award would have an adverse impact on othersmall business programs or on an individual small business, whether ornot the affected small business is in the 8(a) program. The adverse impactconcept is designed to protect small business concerns which are performingGovernment contracts awarded outside the 8(a) program. Adverse impact doesnot apply to ``new'' requirements. A new requirement is a requirement whichhas not been previously procured by the relevant procuring agency. Wherea requirement is new, no small business could have performed the requirementand, thus, an impact determination need not be performed. The expansionor alteration of an existing requirement shall be considered a new requirementwhere the requirement is materially expanded or modified so that the ensuingrequirement is not substantially similar to the prior requirement due tothe magnitude of the expansion or alteration.(1) In determining whether or not adverse impact exist, all relevant factorswill be considered.(2) SBA presumes adverse impact to exist when a small business concernhas performed a specific requirement for at least 24 months, it is currentlyperforming the requirement or finished such performance within 30 daysof the procuring agency's offer of the requirement for the 8(a) program,and the estimated dollar value of the offered 8(a) award is 25 percentor more of its most recent annual gross sales (including those of its affiliates).(d)<T3> Release for non-8(a) competition.</T3> In limited instances, SBA maydetermine that a sole source 8(a) contract being performed by either aProgram Participant whose Program Term will expire prior to contract completion,or, by a former Program Participant whose Program Term has expired withinone year of the requirement may be rejected so that it may be competedoutside the 8(a) program. If such a determination is made, SBA will rejectthe procuring agency's offer of the requirement for award through the 8(a)program. In such a case, SBA will recommend that the requirement be procuredas a small business set-aside or, where appropriate, through a small disadvantagedbusiness competition authorized by Public Law 99-661.(1) In making such a determination, SBA will balance the importance ofthe contract for the (former) Participant's stability and business developmentneeds against the needs of other Program Participants qualified to performthe requirement in order to develop in accord with their business plan.Such a determination will include consideration of whether the rejectionof the requirement would seriously reduce the pool of similar types ofcontracts to be fulfilled through the 8(a) program. In making such determination,SBA will also seek the views of the procuring agency.(2) A written request for the rejection of a contract must be made to SBAby the applicable (former) Participant prior to SBA's acceptance of therequirement for the 8(a) program. SBA will not reject a requirement absentsuch a request.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.310</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of lower tier subcontractors.</ITAG>(a) SBA's approval must be obtained prior to a Particpant's subcontractingof the performance of an 8(a) contract to another concern.(b) SBA will not approve any subcontracting arrangement where:(1) The performance of work requirements set forth in andSection; 124.314would not be met;(2) The proposed subcontractor has been suspended, debarred, or determinedto be ineligible by any Federal agency;(3) SBA determines that the proposed subcontractor would control the performanceof the requirement;(4) SBA determines that the proposed subcontracting relationship is notan arms length agreement; or(5) SBA determines that the proposed subcontracting arrangement is an attemptto circumvent SBA's size regulations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.311</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">8(a) competition.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Competitive thresholds.</T3> A contract opportunity offered to the8(a) program for award shall be awarded on the basis of a competition restrictedto eligible Program Participants if:(1) There is a reasonable expectation that at least two eligible programparticipants will submit offers and that award can be made at a fair marketprice; and(2) The anticipated award price of the contract, including options, willexceed $5,000,000 for contracts assigned manufacturing Standard IndustrialClassification (SIC) codes and $3,000,000 for all other contracts. Forpurposes of indefinite quantity/delivery contracts, the thresholds willbe applied to the guaranteed minimum value of the contract.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example.</T4> If the anticipated award price for a professional servicesrequirement is determined to be $2.7 million and it is accepted as a solesource 8(a) requirement on that basis, a sole source award will be valideven if the contract price arrived at after negotiation is $3.1 million.</ITAG>(b) <T3>Effective date of thresholds.</T3> The thresholds specified in paragraph(a) of this section shall not apply to any 8(a) requirement that has beenaccepted for the 8(a) program prior to October 1, 1989.(c) <T3>Exemption from competitive thresholds for 8(a) concerns owned by Indiantribes.</T3> SBA may award an 8(a) subcontract on a non-competitive basisto an 8(a) concern owned and controlled by an economically disadvantagedIndian tribe, as defined in andSection; 124.100, even if such contract exceedsthe competitive thresholds set forth in paragraph (a) of this section.<T3>See</T3> generally, andSection; 124.112. However, once a requirementis accepted into the 8(a) program for competition and prospective offerorshave been notified of such acceptance, SBA may not remove the requirementfrom competition and award it to a disadvantaged Indian tribe as a solesource contract.(d) <T3>Competition below thresholds.</T3> The AA/MSBandamp;COD may, on a nondelegablebasis, approve a request from a procuring agency that an 8(a) contractbe competed even if the anticipated award price is not expected to exceedthe dollar amounts specified in paragraph (a) of this section. Such approvalswill be granted on a limited basis.(1) This authority will be used primarily in areas where technical competitionsare appropriate or when a large number of responsible 8(a) contractorsexists.(2) In determining whether to approve a request to compete an 8(a) contractbelow the applicable threshold amount, the AA/MSBandamp;COD shall considerwhether the requesting agency has made and will continue to make availablea significant number of its contracts to the 8(a) program on a noncompetitivebasis.(3) The AA/MSBandamp;COD shall deny a request to compete a contract havinga dollar figure below the applicable threshold amount where the requirementwas previously offered to the 8(a) program on a noncompetitive basis ifhe/she concludes that the request is based on the inability of the contractingagency and the Participant selected to perform the contract to reach anagreement on price or some other material term or condition.(e) <T3>Sole source above thresholds.</T3> Where a contract opportunity exceedsthe applicable threshold dollar figure and there is not a reasonable expectationthat at least two eligible Program Participants will submit offers at afair price, SBA may accept the requirement for a sole source 8(a) awardif SBA determines that an eligible participant in the 8(a) portfolio iscapable of performing the requirement at a fair price.(1) For purposes of national buy procurements, SBA will accept a contractopportunity above the applicable threshold as a sole source contract onlyif there are not two eligible offerors in the United States capable ofperforming the requirement at a fair price.(2) For purposes of local buy procurements, SBA will accept a contractopportunity above the applicable threshold as a sole source contract onlyif there are not two eligible offerors located in the applicable regionor adjacent regions which are capable of performing the requirement ata fair price.(f) <T3>Procedures for competition.</T3> (1) Competitions among eligible 8(a)participants shall be conducted by the procuring agencies in accordancewith the Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR). Such competitions shallbe representative of competitions which are the normal practice in therelevant industries. Competitions need not stress price as the dominantfactor, but may be based primarily on technical evaluations or other non-pricerelated factors. Selection of a particular Program Participant by the procuringagency shall be based on specific evaluation criteria set forth in thesolicitation.(2) All solicitations for competitive 8(a) requirements shall include theappropriate SIC code for the requirement.(3) The procuring agency shall evaluate offers pursuant to the evaluationcriteria in the solicitation and the applicable FAR provisions.(4) In a sealed bid procurement, the procuring agency shall submit to SBAa list of offerors ranked in the order of their standing for award; i.e.,first low, second low, etc., with the total evaluated price for each offer,differentiating between basic and any options. In a negotiated procurement,the procuring agency shall submit to SBA an unranked list of offerors withinthe competitive range. Actual offered prices in a negotiated acquisitionwill not be submitted or revealed to SBA. SBA will make business supportlevel and competitive business activity determinations based on the estimatedfair market price of the contract.(5) Within 5 working days after receipt of the list of offerors, the SBAwill determine whether any firm identified is eligible for award of thecontract, including:(i) Whether it has the SIC code for the requirement in its approved businessplan;(ii) Whether it is small under the SIC code for the requirement;(iii) If the firm is in the developmental stage, whether it has exceededits approved business support level by more than 25 percent (or will exceedsuch level if it is awarded the contract at issue); and,(iv) If the firm is in the transitional stage, whether it has achievedits competitive business mix targets under andSection; 124.312. Failure toachieve the competitive business activity targets will not affect a concern'seligibility for 8(a) competitive awards if SBA and the concern have agreedupon a remedial plan and such plan does not include denial of future 8(a)awards.(6) If the low bidder in a sealed bid procurement is determined to be ineligibleby SBA, SBA shall determine the eligibility of the next low bidder. Thisprocess shall be repeated until SBA determines that an identified participantis eligible for award, or until the list is exhausted.(7) In a negotiated procurement, the procuring agency will evaluate theoffers of those firms determined by SBA to be eligible for award pursuantto paragraph (f)(5) of this section and will conduct discussions and/ornegotiations with those firms deemed appropriate.(8) After negotiaitons and/or discussions occur in a negotiated procurement,the potential awardee will be selected by the procuring agency.(9) Award shall be made through the normal 8(a) award procedures (i.e.,a prime contract between the procuring agency and SBA and a subcontractbetween SBA and the selected 8(a) concern).(g) <T3>Protest restrictions.</T3> The eligibility of a Program Participantfor a competitive 8(a) award may not be challenged by another Program Participantor any other party to SBA or to any other administrative forum as partof a bid or other contract protest. Anyone with information concerningthe eligibility of a Program Participant to continue participation in the8(a) program may submit such information to SBA in accordance with andSection;124.111(c).(h) <T3>Restricted competition._</T3>(1) <T3>Competition within stages of program participation.</T3> SBA may accepta requirement to be awarded through a competition limited to 8(a) concernsin the developmental stage of program participation or limited to concernsin the transitional stage of program participation, or may accept a requirementto be competed among firms both in the developmental and transitional stagesof program participation.(2) <T3>SIC code requirements.</T3> Only those Participants that have in theirapproved business plan the SIC code identified in the solicitation maysubmit offers for the requirement. A participant will be deemed ineligiblefor award by SBA if it submits an offer for a requirement for which itdoes not have an approved SIC code.(3) <T3>Local buy competitions.</T3> Where a competitive 8(a) contract opportunityis a local buy requirement, the appropriate Assistant Regional Administratorfor Minority Small Business and Capital Ownership Development (ARA/MSBandamp;COD)will determine, based on his/her knowledge of the 8(a) portfolio, whetherthe competition should be limited only to those Program Participants locatedwithin the geographical boundaries of one or more district offices or theentire region. Only those participants located within the appropriate geographicalboundaries are eligible to submit offers. If SBA determines, however, thatthere is not a reasonable expectation that at least two participants withinsuch region will submit offers, SBA may authorize the procuring agencyto accept offers from eligible Program Participants in one or more otheradjacent regions. Without such authorization, Program Participants locatedoutside the relevant SBA regional boundaries which submit offers shallbe considered ineligible. In appropriate instances, a competition may belimited to eligible Program Participants in adjacent SBA district officeswhich are in different SBA regional offices where the ARA/MSBandamp;CODsin the two relevant regions so agree.(4) <T3>National buy competitions.</T3> Where a competitive 8(a) contract opportunityis a national buy requirement, all eligible Program Participants may submitoffers.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.312</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Competitive business mix.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> To ensure that 8(a) firms do not develop an unreasonablereliance on 8(a) contracts and to ease the transition of such firms intothe competitive marketplace after exiting the 8(a) program, Program Participantsmust make maximum efforts to obtain business outside the 8(a) program.(b) <T3>Non-8(a) business activity targets and support levels during developmentalstage._</T3>(1) <T3>Attainment of targeted levels.</T3> During the developmental stageof Program Participation, an 8(a) concern must make substantial and sustainedefforts to attain the targeted dollar levels of non-8(a) revenue establishedin its business plan.(2) <T3>Maintenance of existing business base.</T3> A business concern whichenters the 8(a) program must make maximum efforts to maintain its existingbusiness base and use the 8(a) program as a resource to strengthen thefirm after its 8(a) certification.(3) <T3>Marketing strategy to attain targeted levels.</T3> Every Program Participantmust engage in a reasonable marketing strategy that will maximize its potentialto achieve the targeted levels of non-8(a) revenue established in its businessplan.(4) <T3>Establishing support levels.</T3> SBA shall establish 8(a) and non-8(a)support levels by considering the firm's salesforecast and supporting datain its business plan, the firm's demonstrated capacity and capability level,current level of non-8(a) contracts on hand and the availability of 8(a)support. The aggregate dollar amount of 8(a) support provided to a ProgramParticipant for any year of program participation during the developmentalstage may not exceed the applicable 8(a) support level approved by SBAas reflected in the concern's business plan by more than 25 percent.(5) <T3>Increasing support levels.</T3> An 8(a) concern in the developmentalstage of program participation may request an increase in its approved8(a) support level no more than once during a program year other than atthe date of its annual review. Such request must be made in writing andmust be made within 15 days (either before or after) of the six month dateof its preceding annual review (e.g., if a firm's annual review occurson June 23, the firm may request an increase in its approved 8(a) supportlevel between December 8 and January 7_15 days before and after December23). A revision to a Participant's business plan may not, however, be basedsolely on the identification of an 8(a) contract in excess of the ProgramParticipant's approved 8(a) support level. A Participant must demonstratethat it has increased its capacity and capability to the point that itscurrently approved 8(a) support level is inappropriate. The Participant'sincreased capacity and capability must be greater than the increased levelof 8(a) support requested so that the Participant is still able to increaseits non-8(a) revenue if the request is approved. Any increase in a Participant'sapproved 8(a) support level other than as part of the annual review processmust be approved in writing by the appropriate Regional Administrator orhis/her designee.(6) <T3>Measuring 8(a) support.</T3> In determining whether a Program Participanthas reached its approved 8(a) support level during any program year, thebase year value of all 8(a) contracts awarded during that program yearshall be added to the value of all options and other modifications executedduring that year. In the case of an indefinite quantity contract havinga guaranteed minimum condition, only the guaranteed minimum dollar amountand task orders above that amount actually issued are counted against aconcern's approved 8(a) support level.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example:</T4> During a specific program year, Program Participant Xreceives three 8(a) contracts as follows: (1) $1,000,000 contract_$400,000base year, and two $300,000 options; (2) $500,000 contract_$250,000 baseyear, and one $250,000 option; and (3) $100,000 contract with no options.In addition, two options on 8(a) contracts awarded in a previous programyear, each worth $200,000, are exercised in the program year under consideration.The 8(a) contract support received during that program year is $1,150,000.</ITAG>(7) <T3>Reporting and verification of business activity.</T3> Once admittedto the 8(a) program, the program participant must provide SBA with quarterlyand annual financial statements within 90 calendar days (180 days for auditedstatements) from the end of each quarter. The statements shall segregaterevenues as non-8(a) and 8(a) revenue as appropriate. Also, within 30 daysfrom the end of the program year, the Program Participant shall provideSBA with an annual report of all non-8(a) contracts, options and modificationsaffecting price executed during the program year.(c) <T3>Required Non-8(a) Business Activity Targets During Transitional Stage._</T3>(1)<T3>General.</T3> During the transitional stage of the program, the ProgramParticipant shall be required to achieve certain targets of non-8(a) contractrevenue. Such targets shall be referred to as non-8(a) business activitytargets and shall be expressed as a percentage of total revenue. The targetsshall reflect a reasonably consistent increase in non-8(a) revenue. Participantsapproved for participation on or after November 15, 1988 and Participantswith more than five years remaining in the program as of August 15, 1989shall be subject to the non-8(a) business activity targets set forth inparagraph (c)(4) of this section. Participants with five years or lessremaining in the program as of August 15, 1989 shall be subject to themodified non-8(a) business activity targets set forth in paragraph (c)(5)of this section.(2) <T3>Establishing support levels. </T3>During the transitional stage ofthe program, SBA shall establish 8(a) and non-8(a) support levels for eachProgram Participant. The aggregate dollar amount of 8(a) support providedto a program participant during the transitional stage may not exceed theestablished 8(a) support level for the applicable program year. The 8(a)support level shall be established so as to ensure that the 8(a) firm meetsthe non-8(a) business activity targets or the modified non-8(a) firm meetsthe non-8(a) business activity targets or the modified non-8(a) businessactivity targets set forth in paragraphs (c)(4) and (c)(5) of this section.In establishing the 8(a) support level, SBA will consider the following:(i) The 8(a) and non-8(a) sales forecast and support data contained inthe Program Participant's business plan;(ii) Current 8(a) and non-8(a) contracts on hand;(iii) Historical 8(a) and non-8(a) revenue and the current level of 8(a)and non-8(a) revenue;(iv) The Program Participant's demonstrated capacity and capability levelwhich may include current levels of 8(a) and non-8(a) revenue, current8(a) and non-8(a) contracts on hand, working capital, access to credit,production capacity, projected increase in 8(a) revenue, and managementand technical capability;(v) The applicable 8(a) business activity target for the applicable transitionalyear.(3) <T3>Increasing support levels. </T3>An 8(a) concern in the transitionalstage of program participation may request an increase in its approved8(a) support level once during a program year other than at the date ofits annual review. Such request must be in writing and must be made within15 days before or after of the six month date of its preceding annual review(e.g., if a firm's annual review occurs on June 23, the firm may requestan increase in its approved 8(a) support level between December 8 and January7-15 calendar days before and after December 23). A revision to a Participant'sbusiness plan may not, however, be based solely on the identification ofan 8(a) contract in excess of the Program Participant's approved 8(a) supportlevel. A Participant must demonstrate that it has increased its capacityand capability to the point that its currently approved 8(a) support levelis inappropriate and that an increase in its approved support level willnot conflict with the applicable non-8(a) business activity targets setforth in paragraphs (c)(4) and (c)(5) of this section.(4) <T3>Non-8(a) business activity targets. </T3>Firms approved for programparticipation on or after the enactment of Public Law 100-656 (November15, 1988) and current Program Participants that have more than five yearsremaining in the program as of August 15, 1989 shall be subject to thefollowing non-8(a) business activity targets during each year of programparticipation in the transitional stage:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,15</C> <H1>Program participant's year in the transitional stage</H1><H1>Non-8(a) business activity targets (non-8(a) revenue as a percentageof total revenue)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1 <D>15-25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2 <D>25-35</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3 <D>40-45</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4 <D>50-55</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">5 <D>65-75</D></ITAG></ITAG>(5) <T3>Modified non-8(a) business activity targets. </T3>Firms that have fiveyears or less remaining in the program as of August 15, 1989 shall be subjectto modified non-8(a) business activity targets during the transitionalstage of program participation.(i) A firm with three to five years remaining in the program as of August15, 1989 shall be subject to the following non-8(a) business activity targets:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,15</C> <H1>Program participant's year in the transitional stage</H1><H1>Modified non-8(a) business activity targets (non-8(a) revenue as apercentage of total revenue)</H1><ITAG tagnum="4">1 <D>10-15</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">2 <D>15-20</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">3 <D>20-30</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">4 <D>30-40</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">5 <D>40-50</D></ITAG></ITAG>(ii) A firm with less than three years remaining in the program as of August15, 1989 shall make substantial and sustained efforts to attain the targeteddollar levels of non-8(a) sales approved in its business plan.(6) <T3>Failure to meet required non-8(a) business activity target. </T3>Firmsthat fail to achieve the minimum percentage non-8(a) business activitytarget in any year of the transitional stage will be subject to the remedialmeasures set forth in paragraph (c)(12) of this section. Compliance withthe applicable business activity target is measured at the end of any programyear in the transitional stage of program participation (e.g., at the endof the first year in the transitional stage of program participation, non-8(a)revenue is compared to total revenue). Remedial measures, if appropriate,will be imposed during the subsequent program year (e.g., non-complaincewith the required business activity target in year one of the transitionalstage of program participation would cause remedial measures to be imposedin year two in the transitional stage).(7) <T3>Attainment of targeted levels. </T3>The program participant must makemaximum efforts to maintain and increase its targeted level of non-8(a)revenue during the transitional stage.(8) <T3>Marketing strategy to attain targeted levels. </T3>The program participantmust engage in a reasonable marekting strategy that will maximize its potentialto achieve the targeted levels of non-8(a) revenue established in the businessplan.(9) <T3>Measuring 8(a) support. </T3>In determining whether a Program Participanthas reached its approved 8(a) support level during any program year, thebase year value of all 8(a) contracts awarded during that program yearshall be added to the value of all options and other modifications executedduring that year. In the case of an indefinite quantity contract havinga guaranteed minimum condition, only the guaranteed minimum dollar amountand tasks orders above that amount actually issued are counted againsta concern's approved 8(a) support level. (<T3>See </T3>example in paragraph (b)(6) of this section).(10) <T3>Reporting and vertification of business activity. </T3>Program Participantsduring the transitional stage shall provide SBA with quarterly and annualfinancial statements with a breakdown of 8(a) and non-8(a) revenue within90 days (180 days for audited statements) from the close of the reportingperiod. The Program Participant shall also provide SBA with quarterly andannual reports of all non-8(a) contracts, options and modifications affectingprice executed during teh program year (and any other information as requiredby SBA) within thirty days from the end of the reporting period. At theend of each year of participation In the transitional stage, the BOS assignedto work with the participant shall review the participant's total revenuesto determine whether the participant's non-8(a) revenues have met the targetsestabished pursuant to paragraphs (c)(4) and (c)(5) of this section.(11) <T3>Certification of compliance. </T3>Before the receipt of any 8(a) contractduring the transitional stage of the program, a Program Participant mustcertify that it is in compliance with the non-8(a) business activity targetsestabished in its business plan as approved by SBA or that it is in compliancewith any remedial measures imposed by SBA pursuant to paragraph (c)(12)of this section, if such remedial measures allow the continued award of8(a) contracts.(12) <T3>Remedial measures for failure to achieve non-8(a) business activitytargets. </T3>SBA is authorized to take appropriate remedial measures withrespect to a Program Participant which has failed to attain the minimumrequired business activity targets as established in paragraphs (c)(4)and (c)(5) of this section. The type of remedial measure used depends inpart on the extent to which the Participant failed to obtain and the effortexpended in seeking non-8(a) business. These remedial actions include,but are not limited to:(i) Requiring the Program Participant to obtain management and technicalassistance or to obtain counseling and/or attend seminars relating to managementassistance, business development, financing, marketing, or proposal preparation.(ii) Conditioning the award of future sole source 8(a) contracts on theParticipant's taking affirmative steps to expand the dollar volume of itscompetitive business activity, such as changes in marketing of financingstrategies;(iii) Reducing a Participant's approved level of 8(a) support;(iv) Reducing, or eliminating, sole source 8(a) contracts;(v) Program termination pursuant to andSection; 124.209_program terminationproceedings will be commenced where a firm makes no efforts to obtain non-8(a)revenues.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.313</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certification of SBA's competency.</ITAG>(a) SBA will certify that it is competent to perform the requirement, asprovided by section 8(a)(1)(A) of the Small Business Act, based on itsdetermination that the 8(a) concern with which it intends to subcontractis responsible to perform the requirement. If SBA determines that the concernlacks the capability, competency, capacity, credit, integrity, or tenacityand perseverance to perform on a specific 8(a) subcontract, the subcontractwill not be awarded to such concern. A Program Participant which has notsubmitted required financial statements to SBA will be deemed not responsibleto receive 8(a) subcontracts. In addition, SBA will also certify whetheran 8(a) concern is eligible under the Walsh-Healey Public Contracts Act,41 U.S.C. 35(a), for each individual 8(a) subcontract.(b) SBA's determination not to award a Program Participant a specific 8(a)subcontract because the concern lacks an element of responsibility, oris ineligible under the Walsh-Healey Public Contracts Act, does not constitutea denial of total 8(a) program participation for the purposes of section8(a)(9) of the Small Business Act.(c) A Participant that is determined by SBA not to be responsible to performa sole source or competitive 8(a) contract may not seek the issuance ofa Certificate of Competency pursuant to andSection; 125.5 of this title.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.314</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Performance of work by the 8(a) concern.</ITAG>(a) To assure the accomplishment of the purposes of the 8(a) program, each8(a) subcontractor must perform work equivalent to the following percentages:(1) <T3>Services (except construction). </T3>In the case of an 8(a) contractfor professional and/or non-professional services (except construction),at least 50 percent of the cost of contract performance incurred for labormust be expended for employees of the 8(a) concern.(2) <T3>Supplies (other than procurement from a regular dealer in such supplies).</T3>In the case of an 8(a) contract for supplies, an 8(a) concern thatseeks to perform the requirement as a manufacturer must perform work forat least 50 percent of the cost of manufacturing the supplies, not includingthe cost of materials. This requirement does not apply to 8(a) concernsthat seek to perform 8(a) supply contracts as regular dealers in such supplies.(3) <T3>General construction.</T3> In the case of an 8(a) general constructioncontract, the 8(a) concern must perform at least 15 percent of the costof the contract, not including the cost of materials, with its own employees.(4) <T3>Construction by special trade contractors. </T3>In the case of an 8(a)contract for special trade construction (e.g., electrical, plumbing, mechanical),the 8(a) concern must perform at least 25 percent of the cost of the contract,not including the cost of materials, with its own employees.(b) The Program Participant must certify in its bid or proposal that itwill perform the required percentage of work with its own employees. Failureof the concern to provide such a statement will result in the firm beingconsidered ineligible for award.(c) For purposes of determining whether a Program Participant will performthe required percentage of the contract, the work to be performed by asubsidiary(ies) of the Participant or a concern(s) otherwise affiliatedwith the Participant is not counted as being performed by the Participant.(d) <T3>Indefinite quantity contracts. </T3>(1) In order to ensure that therequired percentage of an indefinite quantity 8(a) award is performed bythe Program Participant, at any point in time the Program Participant musthave performed the required percentage of the total value of the contractto that date. For a service or supply contract, this does not mean thatthe Program Participant must perform 50% of each task order with its ownforce. But, rather, the Participant is required to perform 50% of the combinedtotal of all task orders to date. The Regional Administrator or his/herdesignee may waive this requirement where a large amount of subcontractingis essential in the early stages of performance before the work to be doneby the Participant can be performed, provided that there are written assurancesfrom both the Participant and the procuring agency that the contract willultimately comply with the requirements of this section.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example.</T4> If a Program Participant performed 90 percent of a $100,000task order on an indefinite quantity service contract with its own workforce, it would only have to perform 10 percent of a second task orderfor $100,000 because the concern would still have performed 50 percentof the combined total value of the contract to date ($100,000 out of $200,000).</ITAG>(2) Where there is a guaranteed minimum condition in an indefinite quantity8(a) award, the required performance of work percentage need not be meton the first task order. In such a case, however, the percentage of workto be subcontracted to other concerns by the Program Participant on thefirst task order may not exceed 50 percent of the total guaranteed minimumdollar value to be provided by the contract. If the first task order exceeds50 percent of the guaranteed minimum amount, the Participant may subcontractno more than 50 percent of the guaranteed amount. Once the guaranteed minimumamount is met, the general rule for indefinite quantity contracts set forthin paragraph (d)(1) of this section applies.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Example. </T4>Where a contract guarantees a minimum of $100,000 inprofessional services and the first task order is for $60,000 in such services,it would be acceptable for the Program Participant to perform less than$30,000 (i.e., 50 percent of $60,000). The Program Participant could bepermitted to perform only $10,000 of that first task order. In such a case,the entire remainder of the guaranteed minimum ($40,000), however, wouldhave to be performed by the Program Participant so that the Participantwould have ultimately performed $50,000 (i.e., 50% of the $100,000 guaranteedminimum).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.315</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fair market price for 8(a) awards.</ITAG>(a) A ``fair market price'' for an 8(a) contract shall be determined bythe agency offering the procurement requirement to SBA in accordance withparagraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section.(1) The estimate of a current fair market price for a new procurement requirement,or a requirement that does not have a satisfactory procurement history,shall be derived from a price or cost analysis. Such analysis may takeinto account prevailing market conditions, commercial prices for similarproducts or services, or data obtained from any other agency. Such analysismust also consider any cost or pricing data that is timely submitted bythe SBA.(2) The estimate of a current fair market price for a procurement requirementthat has a satisfactory procurement history shall be based on recent awardprices adjusted to insure comparability. Such adjustments shall take intoaccount differences in quantities, performance, times, plans, specifications,transportation costs, packaging and packing costs, labor and material costs,overhead costs, and any other additional costs which may be deemed appropriate.(b) Upon the request of SBA, an agency offering a procurement requirementfor potential award through the 8(a) program shall submit to SBA a writtenstatement detailing the method used by the agency to estimate the currentfair market price for such contract. Such statement shall be submittedwithin 10 working days. The procuring agency must identify the information,studies, analyses, and other data it used in making its estimate. The procuringagency's estimate of fair market price and any supporting data may notbe disclosed to any potential contractor or subcontractor, other than SBA.(c) The concern selected to perform the 8(a) contract may request SBA toprotest the procuring agency's estimate of current fair market price tothe Secretary of the Department or head of the agency in accordance withandSection; 124.320(b).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.316</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contract administration.</ITAG>(a) SBA may delegate, by the use of special clauses in the prime contractand subcontract, certain responsibilities for administering an 8(a) subcontractto the procuring agency.(b) SBA may delegate to the procuring agency all subcontract administrationfunctions except the following: the approval of novation agreements (48CFR 42.302(a)(25)); and pertaining advance payments approved by SBA.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.317</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Performance of contracts by original 8(a) concern.</ITAG>(a) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (b) of this section, a contract(including options) awarded pursuant to section 8(a) of the Small BusinessAct on or after October 1, 1989 shall be performed by the concern thatinitially received such contract. If the owner or owners upon whom eligibilitywas based relinquishes ownership or control of such concern, or entersinto any agreement to relinquish such ownership or control, such contractor option shall be terminated for the convenience of the Government. Insuch a case, repurchase costs or other damages cannot be assessed againstthe concern due solely to the provisions of this paragraph. This provisionapplies whether the concern that initially received 8(a) certificationremains a separate legal entity after a transfer of ownership or whetherthe concern merges into or is acquired by another business concern.(b) The Administrator may, as a matter of discretion and on a nondelegablebasis, waive the requirements of paragraph (a) of this section if requestedto do so by the original 8(a) awardee if any of the following conditionsexist:(1) When it is necessary for the owner(s) of the concern to surrender partialcontrol of such concern on a temporary basis in order to obtain equityfinancing; (2) The head of the procuring agency for which the contract is being performedcertifies that termination of the contract would severely impair attainmentof the agency's program objectives or missions. (3) Ownership and control of the concern that is performing the contractwill pass to another Program Participant, but only if the acquiring firmwould otherwise be eligible to receive the award directly as an 8(a) contract;(4) The individuals upon whom eligibility was based are no longer ableto exercise control of the concern due to incapacity of death; and (5) When, in order to raise equity capital, it is necessary for the disadvantagedowner(s) of the concern to relinquish ownership of a majority of the votingstock of such concern, but only if_ (i) Such concern has exited the 8(a) program; (ii) The disadvantaged owner(s) will maintain ownership of the largestsingle outstanding block of voting stock (including stock held by affiliatedparties); and (iii) The disadvantaged owner(s) will maintain control of the daily businessoperations of the concern. (c) Requests pursuant to paragraph (b) of this section must be made priorto the relinquishment of ownership and control except in the case of deathor incapacity. A request for a waiver under paragraph (b)(4) of this sectionmust be made as soon as possible after the incapacity or death occurs.(d) A procuring agency may request a waiver of the requirements of paragraph(a) of this section if the head of the procuring agency certifies thattermination of the contract would severely impair attainment of the agency'sprogram objectives or missions. (e) A concern performing an 8(a) contract must notify the SBA in writingimmediately upon entering into an agreement or agreement in principle (eitheroral or written) to transfer all or part of its stock or other ownershipinterest or assets to any other party. Such an agreement could includean oral agreement to enter into a transaction to transfer interests inthe future. (f) Denial of a waiver request may be appealed to SBA's Office of Hearingsand Appeals in accordance with andSection; 124.210 and part 134 of the title.(g) For the purposes of determining ownership and control of a concernunder these regulations, any potential ownership interests (such as optionsor warrants) held by investment companies licensed under the Small BusinessInvestment Act of 1958 shall not be treated as ownership interests untilexercised. (h) An 8(a) concern may not transfer the performance of an 8(a) contractto another concern, absent a waiver or authorized by this section. Sucha transfer may be grounds for termination of the concern from the 8(a)program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.318 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exercise of options and modifications. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Unpriced Options. </T3>The exercise of an unpriced option is consideredto be a new contracting action. As such, if a concern has exited the 8(a)program or is no longer small under the size standard corresponding tothe SIC code for the requirement, negotiations to price the option cannotbe entered into and the option cannot be exercised. If, however, the concernis still a Program Participant and is still a small business under thesize standard corresponding to the SIC code for the requirement, negotiationsto price the option may be entered into provided the estimated fair marketprice falls below the applicable threshold amount set forth in andSection;124.311 and, if a fair and reasonable price is negotiated, and it is otherwiseconsistent with program requirements, the option may be exercised. If theestimated fair market price exceeds the applicable threshold amount setforth in andSection; 124.311, the requirement must be competed among eligible8(a) concerns. Because this equates to a new contracting action, SBA'sconcurrence in the exercise of such options is required. (b) <T3>Priced Options. </T3>A priced option to an 8(a) contract award maybe exercised whether the concern that received the award has existed the8(a) program and whether the concern is no longer small under the sizestandard corresponding to the SIC Code for the requirement, if to do sois in the best interests of the Government considering the purposes ofthe 8(a) program. (c) <T3>Modifications Beyond the Scope. </T3>A modification beyond the scopeof the initial 8(a) contract award is considered to be a new contractingaction. As such, if a concern has exited the 8(a) program or is no longersmall under the size standard corresponding to the SIC Code for the requirement,the modification cannot be exercised. If, however, the concern is stilla Program Participant and is still a small business under the size standardcorresponding to the SIC Code for the requirement, the modification maybe made provided the estimated fair market price falls below the applicablethreshold amount set forth in andSection; 124.311 and other program requirementsare met, since the authority exists to enter into a new 8(a) contract tofulfill the requirement. If the estimated fair market price exceeds theapplicable threshold amount set forth in andSection; 124.311, the requirementmust be competed among eligible 8(a) concerns. Because this equates toa new contracting action, SBA's concurrence in the exercise of such modificationsis required. (d) <T3>Modifications Within the Scope. </T3>A modification within the scopeof the initial 8(a) contract award may be exercised whether the concernthat received the award has exited the 8(a) program and whether the concernis no longer small under the size standard corresponding to the SIC Codefor the requirement.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.319</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contract termination.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Termination for default. </T3>A decision to terminate a specific 8(a)contract for default is made by the procuring agency contracting officerin cooperation with SBA. The contracting officer will advise SBA in writingin advance of his/her intent to terminate the 8(a) contract for default.SBA may provide to the 8(a) concern any program benefits reasonably availablein order to assist in preventing termination for default of the contract.SBA will advise the contracting officer of this effort. If, despite theefforts of the SBA, the procuring agency contracting officer believes groundsfor termination continue to exist, he/she may terminate the 8(a) contractfor default, after consulting with SBA. Such terminations shall be processedin accordance with the FAR, 48 CFR. SBA will have no liability for terminationcosts or reprocurement costs.(b) <T3>Termination for convenience. </T3>(1) In cooperation with SBA, theprocuring agency contracting officer may terminate an 8(a) contract forconvenience any time it is determined to be in the best interest of thegovernment to do so.(2) Pursuant to andSection; 124.317, a contract shall be terminated for convenienceif the owner or owners upon whom eligibility was based relinquish ownershipor control of such concern, or enter into any agreement to relinquish suchownership or control, unless a waiver is granted pursuant to andSection;124.317. Such terminations shall be processed in accordance with the FAR,48 CFR.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.320 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disputes and appeals.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Contract disputes generally. </T3>(1) Except as provided in paragraphs(a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section, for purposes of the Disputes Clauseof a specific 8(a) contract, the contracting officer is that of the procuringagency. A dispute arising between an 8(a) subcontractor and the procuringagency contracting officer will be decided unilaterally by the procuringagency contracting officer. (2) For disputes arising out of advance payments or business developmentexpense funds, the contracting officer is that of SBA.(3) For disputes arising out of construction contracts where SBA has waivedbonding pursuant to andSection; 124.305, the appropriate contracting officerdepends upon the dispute. Where the dispute arises out of the disbursementof funds from the special bank account established to protect persons furnishingmaterials or labor to the 8(a) concern, the SBA contracting officer shalldecide the dispute. In all other disputes, including disputes arising outof the performance of the contract, the procuring agency contracting officershall decide the dispute. (4) Decisions by contracting officers (either of SBA or a procuring agency)may be appealed as provided by the Contract Disputes Act of 1978.(b) <T3>SBA appeals of nonselection or terms and conditions. </T3>(1) The Administratorof SBA may appeal the following matters to the head of the procuring agency:(i) The decision not to make a particular procurement requirement availablefor award under the 8(a) program; or(ii) The terms and conditions of a particular contract to be awarded underthe 8(a) program, including selection of an appropriate SIC code.(2) The SBA must notify the contracting officer of the Administrator'sintent to appeal an adverse determination within 5 working days of theSBA's receipt of such determination. The SBA Administrator must file awritten request to reconsider the adverse decision with the head of theprocuring agency (appeal) within 15 working days of the SBA's notificationof intent to appeal.(3) Upon receipt of the notice of intent to appeal, the procuring agencyshall suspend further action regarding the procurement until the head ofthe procuring agency issues a written decision on the appeal, unless thehead of the procuring agency makes a written determination that urgentand compelling circumstances which significantly affect interests of theUnited States will not permit waiting for a reconsideration of the adversedecision. (4) If the Administrator's appeal is denied, the procuring agency headshall so notify the SBA, specifying the reasons for the denial. This informationshall be made a part of the contract file for the requirement. (c) An 8(a) Participant selected by the SBA to perform or negotiate an8(a) contract may request the SBA to protest the procuring agency's estimateof the fair market price for such contract pursuant to paragraph (b) ofthis section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.321 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Joint venture agreements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Prerequisites for joint venture agreement. </T3>If approved by theAA/MCBandamp;COD or his/her designee, an 8(a) concern may enter into a jointventure agreement, as defined in andSection; 124.100, with another smallbusiness concern, whether or not an 8(a) participant, for the purpose ofperforming a specific 8(a) contract. A joint venture agreement is permissibleonly when the 8(a) concern lacks the necessary capacity to perform thecontract on its own, and when the agreement is fair and equitable and willbe of substantial benefit to the 8(a) concern.(b) <T3>Size limitations. </T3>Except for certain Program Participants ownedand controlled by Indian tribes, an 8(a) concern entering into a jointventure agreement with another concern is considered to be affiliated forsize purposes with the other concern with respect to performance of the8(a) subcontract. As such, the annual receipts or employees of the otherconcern are included in determining the size of the selected 8(a) concern.The combined annual receipts or employees of the concerns entering intothe joint venture must meet the size standard for the SIC code industrydesignated for the contract. <T3>See</T3> paragraph (h) of this section for joint ventures controlledby tribally-owned concerns.(c) <T3>Contents of joint venture agreements. </T3>The following provisionsshall be included in all joint venture agreements:(1) A provision setting forth the purpose of the joint venture.(2) A provision designating the parties to the joint venture as co-managers.(3) A provision stating that not less than 51 percent of the net profitsearned by the joint venture shall be distributed to the 8(a) concern.(4) A provision providing for the establishment and administration of aspecial bank account in the name of the joint venture. This account shallrequire the signature of all participants to the joint venture or designeesfor withdrawal purposes. All payments due the joint venture for performanceon an 8(a) subcontract shall be deposited in the special account from whichall expenses incurred under the subcontract shall be paid.(5) An itemized description of all major equipment, facilities, and otherresources to be furnished by each participant to the joint venture, witha detailed schedule of cost or value of each.(6) A provision specifying the responsibilities of the parties with regardto contract performance, source of labor and negotiation of the 8(a) contractand any subcontracts to the joint venture.(d) <T3>Other requirements. </T3>Joint venture agreements are subject to thefollowing additional requirements:(1) The joint venture agreement must be approved in advance of contractaward by AA/MSBandamp;COD or his/her designee.(2) An employee of the 8(a) concern must be the designated project managerresponsible for contract performance.(3) Accounting and other administrative records relating to the joint ventureshall be kept in the office of the 8(a) concern, unless approval to keepthem elsewhere is granted by the Regional Administrator or his/her designeeupon written request. Upon completion of the contract performed by thejoint venture, the final original records shall be retained by the 8(a)concern.(4) Quarterly financial statements showing cumulative contract receiptsand expenditures (including salaries of the joint venture's principals)shall be submitted to SBA not later than 45 days after each operating quarterof the joint venture.(5) A project-end profit and loss statement shall be submitted no laterthan 90 days after completion of the contract including a statement offinal profit distribution.(e) <T3>Obligation of performance. </T3>All parties to the joint venture mustsign such documents as are necessary to obligate themselves to ensure performanceof the 8(a) contract.(f) <T3>Performance of work by 8(a) concern(s). </T3>The 8(a) partner(s) toan eligible joint venture, and not the aggregate of all parties to thejoint venture, must perform the applicable percentages of work requiredby andSection; 124.314.(g) <T3>Inspection of records. </T3>The SBA shall have the right to inspectthe records of the joint venture without notice at any time deemed necessary.(h) <T3>Joint ventures with concerns owned by Indian tribes_</T3>(1) <T3>Exemption from size limitations. </T3>The size limitations set forthin paragraph (b) of this section will not be applied to joint venturesentered into by an 8(a) concern owned and controlled by an economicallydisadvantaged Indian tribe, as defined in andSection; 124.100, if the concern:(i) Owns and controls 51 percent or more of the joint venture;(ii) Is located on the reservation of or land owned by the tribe;(iii) Performs most of its activities on such reservation or tribally ownedland; and(iv) Employs members of such tribe for at least 50 percent of its totalworkforce.(2) <T3>Identification of requirements. </T3>Requirements suitable for jointventures with tribally owned concerns must be identified by SBA and/orthe tribally owned concern. Large business concerns may not be involvedin identifying such requirements.(3) <T3>Limitations. </T3>A tribally owned 8(a) concern as a party to a jointventure may receive the exemption set forth in paragraph (h) of this sectionon no more than two contracts.(4) <T3>Sunset. </T3>This paragraph shall cease to be effective after September30, 1991.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.401</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Advance payments.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>(1) Advance payments are disbursements of cash made bySBA to an 8(a) concern prior to the completion of performance of a specific8(a) subcontract and are based on anticipated performance on the part ofthe 8(a) concern under a particular 8(a) subcontract. Advance paymentsare made for the purpose of assisting the 8(a) concern to meet financialrequirements pertinent to the performance of an 8(a) subcontract. Advancepayments will be considered only after all other forms of financing havebeen considered by SBA and are determined to be either unavailable or unacceptableto support performance of the 8(a) subcontract.(2) Advance payments may be authorized only for concerns which are currentProgram Participants at the time of the approval of the advance payment.A firm which has graduated from or otherwise exited the 8(a) program priorto approval is ineligible for advance payments. Where the concern willgraduate from the 8(a) program during the initial performance period (baseyear), advance payments may be authorized only for that year, and may notbe authorized for option years.(3) The gross amount of advance payments will be determined by SBA at thetime the request for such payments is approved. The gross amount of advancepayments must be determined by SBA prior to commencement of performanceof the contract. In no event shall the total amount of advance paymentsdisbursed and not repaid exceed 90 percent of the outstanding unpaid proceedsof the 8(a) subcontract to which the advance payments relate. The valueof unexercised options is not considered in determining the outstandingunpaid proceeds of the 8(a) subcontract. In the case of requirements andindefinite quantity type contracts, advance payments will be authorizedonly when a guaranteed minimum value is established in the 8(a) subcontract,and the amount of advance payments approved shall not exceed 90 percentof that guaranteed minimum. SBA must approve in writing any subsequentchange in the gross amount of advance payments.(4) All advance payments, whether disbursed by letter of credit or otherwise,and all 8(a) subcontract proceeds shall be deposited into a Special BankAccount established exclusively for that purpose pursuant to the AdvancePayment clause of the 8(a) subcontract. Under no circumstances may advancepayment funds be deposited in certificates of deposit or other securities.The procuring agency shall pay all 8(a) subcontract proceeds directly intothe Special Bank Account until notified by SBA in writing that the advancepayments have been fully liquidated. SBA will not authorize any withdrawalsfrom the Special Bank Account that are inconsistent with the disbursementschedule established by the 8(a) subcontract under which the advance paymentswere made.(5) Advance payments shall be liquidated from proceeds derived from theperformance of the specific 8(a) subcontract to which they pertain or fromother revenues of the business (except other advance payments). 8(a) subcontractproceeds shall be applied first to liquidate outstanding advance payments.Repayment must occur according to the liquidation schedule establishedby the 8(a) subcontract under which the advance payments were made.(6) The special bank account may not be used as a revolving line of credit.The cumulative total amount of advance payments disbursed may not exceedthe amount authorized by the Regional Administrator or his/her designee.(b) <T3>Requirements and conditions.</T3> (1) Advance payments may be approvedfor an 8(a) concern only when all of the following conditions are foundby SBA to exist:(i) An 8(a) concern does not have adequate working capital to perform aspecific 8(a) subcontract.(ii) Adequate and timely private financing is not available on reasonableterms to provide necessary capital.(iii) Progress payments based on costs at customary rates will not satisfythe working capital requirements of the 8(a) concern to perform the 8(a)subcontract.(iv) When applicable, loan guarantees for defense production are not available.(v) Progress payments based on costs with unusual terms will not satisfythe working capital requirements of the 8(a) concern to perform the 8(a)subcontract.(vi) The 8(a) concern has established or agrees to establish and maintainfinancial records and controls which will provide for complete accountabilityand required reporting of advance payment funds. These records must bemade available upon request for review and copying by SBA and other appropriateFederal officials.(vii) The 8(a) concern has no unliquidated advance payments outstandingon another 8(a) subcontract which is completed, terminated or in default,unless such unliquidated advance payments are due only to the contractingagency's delay in making final payment to the 8(a) concern after it hassuccessfully completed the 8(a) subcontract.(2) Advance payments shall not be made to an 8(a) concern in any case inwhich the concern has assigned its right to receive any payment under thespecific 8(a) subcontract to any person or entity.(3) SBA shall not charge interest on advance payments disbursed pursuantto these regulations, except upon an event of default, as defined in thesubcontract. When charged, interest shall be assessed at such rate as establishedby the Secretary of the Treasury pursuant to Public Law 92-41.(4) Under no circumstances may a liquidation schedule be waived. However,the cognizant Regional Administrator or ARA/MSBandamp;COD may authorize amodified liquidation schedule in appropriate cases. Such modified schedulebecomes effective when contained in an appropriate modification to thesubcontract.(c) <T3>Application and approval procedure.</T3> The following procedures applyto the approval of advance payments:(1) The 8(a) concern must submit a written request for advance paymentsto the cognizant SBA Regional Administrator or his/her designee. Such requestmust include such detailed documentation as SBA may specify to support8(a) concern's need for such funds and proof that working capital financingcannot be found from financing institutions at reasonable terms.(2) The 8(a) concern must identify a commercial bank which is a memberof the Federal Reserve System in which it will establish a Special BankAccount for the deposit of advance payments and all payments made to itby the procuring agency for its performance of the 8(a) subcontract. Thisspecial account shall be a non-interest bearing demand deposit account.(3) The 8(a) concern must, as required by IRS regulations, select a FederalDepository into which the Federal withholding and FICA payment will bemade.(4) Upon review of all of the circumstances, the Regional Administratoror the ARA/MSBandamp;COD shall decide whether to approve or deny a requestfor advance payments, and, if approval is granted, shall designate theamount thereof and the terms and conditions upon which such advance paymentsmay be made.(d) <T3>Post-approval procedures.</T3> The Contracting Officer shall be responsiblefor assuring that advance payments are implemented consistent with theFinding, Determination and Authorization for Advance Payments issued bythe Regional Administrator or his/her designee. Before any advance paymentsare disbursed, the following actions must occur:(1) The 8(a) concern must execute a note evidencing the full amount ofthe advance payments and any other documents needed to create and perfectsuch other sources of security as SBA shall require, including, but notlimited to the following:(i) Real estate, deeds of trust and mortgages;(ii) Security agreements and financing statements; and(iii) Personal guarantees.(2)(i) The 8(a) concern and SBA shall execute a modification to the 8(a)subcontract adding an Advance Payment clause prior to the disbursementof any advance payments. The clause shall state the amount of the advancepayments, a liquidation schedule and all other terms and conditions togovern the advance payments, consistent with the Finding, Determinationand Authorization for Advance Payments issued by the Regional Administratoror ARA/MSBandamp;COD.(ii) The Contracting Officer, when other contract terms reducing the quantity,price or term of performance of the 8(a) prime and subcontract are modifiedby the procuring agency, shall initiate action to modify the Advance Paymentclause and, if appropriate, the letter of credit as necessary, includingbut not limited to reduction of the total amount of advance payments authorizedor the amount of the letter of credit and/or restructuring the liquidationschedule, to ensure that at no time during the performance of the 8(a)subcontract does the unliquidated advance payments exceed 90 percent ofthe unpaid value of the 8(a) subcontract.(3) The 8(a) concern, SBA and the bank in which the Special Bank Accounthas been established will enter into a Special Bank Account Agreement priorto disbursement of any funds. The agreement shall specify the respectiverights and responsibilities of the parties. The Agreement shall grant toSBA the unilateral right to withdraw any funds in the Special Bank Accountto the extent necessary to liquidate any unliquidated advance payments.(i) The cognizant SBA Regional Administrator shall designate at least twoSBA employees to serve as countersignatories on the Special Bank Account.Withdrawals from the account will be made only upon the authorized signaturesof a representative of the 8(a) concern and one of the designated SBA employees,as identified on the signature card for the Special Bank Account. Underno circumstances shall the requirement for an SBA employee countersignaturebe waived.(ii) At the time that SBA disburses advance payment funds into the SpecialBank Account, SBA shall obtain a paramount lien upon the Special Bank Account,any property contracted for, supplies, material and other property acquiredwith the advance payment funds, and the most superior lien possible uponany other security required by the Finding, Determination and Authorizationfor Advance Payments.(4) Prior to disbursement of an advance payment, SBA shall modify the primecontract with the procuring agency in the following respects:(i) Reassign contract administration authority to the extent necessaryto administer the Advance Payment clause of the 8(a) subcontract to SBA'sContracting Officer.(ii) Direct payment of all contract proceeds into the Special Bank Accountuntil SBA issues written notice that the advance payments have been fullyliquidated.(iii) Require prompt notice of any adverse developments in contract performance,changes in the Government requirement, or of any other condition that mayaffect contract payments.(iv) Require that copies of all payment vouchers issued by the procuringagency's disbursing office be sent to the Contracting Officer.(e) <T3>Procedures for use of Advance Payment funds. </T3>(1) Except for repaymentto SBA in appropriate circumstances, advance payment funds may be usedby an 8(a) concern only for the purchase of materials, payment of labor,payment for equipment expenses, general and administrative expenses andoverhead, and payments to the subcontractors of the 8(a) concern necessaryfor the performance of the specific 8(a) subcontract for which the advancepayments were authorized. Program Participants shall follow a two-stepprocess to gain access to advance payment funds. The first step is thedisbursement of the advance payment funds from SBA, either directly orby way of letter of credit into the Special Bank Account. The second stepis the withdrawal of funds from the Special Bank Account by check to payparticular contract expenses.(2) <T3>Disbursement of advance payment funds by SBA. </T3>(i) SBA shall disburseadvance payments through a letter of credit where the Agency anticipatesthat all of the following conditions exist:(A) Its relationship with the particular 8(a) concern will last for a yearor more.(B) The cumulative disbursements to that 8(a) concern will total at least$120,000 annually.(C) The 8(a) concern has submitted a schedule of its projected monthlyadvance requirements for 8(a) subcontract disbursements and SBA has reviewedit and found it to be reasonable.(D) The 8(a) concern has established or agrees to establish and maintainfinancial records and controls which will provide for complete accountabilityand required reporting of program funds. These records must be made availableupon request for review and audit by SBA and the General Accounting Office.(ii) <T3>Procedures for disbursements by letter of credit. </T3>The proceduresfor the utilization of the letter of credit method of payment shall bein accord with 48 CFR 32.406. Where disbursement is by the letter of creditmethod, 8(a) concerns shall draw down funds against their letters of creditfor deposit into the Special Bank Account only as needed and in such amountsnecessary for its immediate cash needs under the 8(a) subcontract for whichthe advance payments were authorized. Such immediate cash needs shall bedocumented by the 8(a) concern and verified by SBA prior to draw down.The amount of each draw down against the letter of credit shall be forthe minimum amount needed to satisfy immediate cash needs, taking intoaccount other financial resources available to the 8(a) concern, includingprogress payments not required for the liquidation of disbursed advancepayments.(iii) In all instances not covered by paragraph (e)(2)(i) of this section,SBA shall disburse advance payments by Treasury check or electronic fundstransfer. In such cases, the Contracting Officer shall request SBA's Officeof Financial Operations, Denver, Colorado, to disburse the authorized amountof the advance payments into the Special Bank Account.(3) <T3>Procedures for withdrawal of funds from the Special Bank Account.</T3>All payments to the 8(a) concern under the 8(a) subcontract for which advancepayments were authorized, together with all disbursements of such advancepayments, shall be paid into the Special Bank Account.(i) <T3>Liquidation of disbursed advance payments</T3>. The funds in the SpecialBank Account shall be applied by SBA first to liquidate the balance ofdisbursed advance payments, in accordance with the liquidation schedulein the Advance Payment clause of the 8(a) subcontract. Withdrawals forliquidation of disbursed advance payments shall be made in accordance withthe procedures contained in the Advance Payment clause of the 8(a) subcontract.(ii) <T3>Payment of 8(a) subcontract expenses.</T3> Any amounts in the SpecialBank Account not required to liquidate disbursed advance payments shallnext be applied to pay allowable and allocable costs incurred in the performanceof the 8(a) subcontract for which the advance payments were authorized.To obtain withdrawals from the Special Bank Account for the payment ofsuch costs, the 8(a) concern shall request issuance of checks for the paymentof expenses to the Contracting Officer, supported by the documentationdescribed below. Such requests shall be made sufficiently in advance ofthe due date for such obligations to permit the review of the request bySBA and countersignature by the designated SBA countersignatories. The8(a) concern shall support each request for a withdrawal from the SpecialBank Account by submitting to the Contracting Officer or his/her designee,to the extent applicable, the following:(A) The original vendor invoice or original payroll record;(B) A certified statement, dated and signed by the concern's authorizedcertifying official, attesting to the truth and accuracy of the vendorinvoice, and/or the payroll records for the requested withdrawal, includingrecords of direct payroll expenditures as well as labor overhead;(C) A certification by the 8(a) concern that all Federal taxes and FICApayments are current, or a copy of any agreement with the Internal RevenueService (IRS) providing for payment of delinquent taxes; and(D) Documentation of overhead and general and administrative rates, usingprojected indirect costs applied to a valid base, which have been properlyallocated to direct material, labor, or other direct costs.(E) Where the requested withdrawal is for payroll expenses, the 8(a) concernmust prepare a check for Federal taxes in the name of the tax collectingagency, or the Federal Depository selected by the 8(a) concern into whichits Federal withholding and FICA payments are made, to be signed by SBAand the 8(a) concern concurrent with the check for the submitted payroll.If the amount of a check payable to IRS or to the Federal Depository isless than 25 percent of the gross payroll for the period, the 8(a) concern'sauthorized certifying official shall prepare a statement certifying thatthe amount designated as payable to IRS or to the Federal Depository istrue and correct. There shall be no change of Federal Depository withoutobtaining the prior written consent of SBA.(iii) <T3>Release of residual funds after liquidation of the advance paymentsand payment of 8(a) subcontract expenses. </T3>Any funds remaining in theSpecial Bank Account after the 8(a) subcontract has been successfully completedor terminated and after the advance payments have been fully liquidatedand all allowable and allocable 8(a) subcontract performance costs havebeen paid shall be disbursed to the 8(a) concern. Upon receipt of the finalprogress payment, the Contracting Officer shall expeditiously close theSpecial Bank Account, executing a check withdrawing the remaining balanceof the Account payable to the 8(a) concern.(f) <T3>Cancellation. </T3>(1) SBA may determine that advance payments shouldbe cancelled under appropriate circumstances, including but not limitedto the following:(i) The terms and conditions of the Advance Payment clause have not beenadhered to by an 8(a) concern.(ii) The 8(a) concern is not in compliance with its 8(a) ParticipationAgreement.(iii) The 8(a) concern has been suspended pursuant to andSection; 124.115or has been terminated by administrative action under section 8(a)(9) ofthe Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. 637(a)(9).(2) In the event of cancellation of advance payments to an 8(a) concern,all previous advance payments made to that 8(a) concern shall become dueand payable to SBA prior to the receipt of final contract payment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.402 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Business development expense.</ITAG>(a) Any Business Development Expense (BDE) funds received by a ProgramParticipant prior to the expiration of the BDE program must be used exclusivelyfor the purposes stated in the BDE approval. Use of such funds for anyother purpose may be good cause for termination from the 8(a) program pursuantto andSection; 124.209.(b) Any Program Participant which received BDE funds prior to the expirationof the BDE program shall maintain records to substantiate the uses forwhich the BDE funds have been expended.(c) In the event of default on an 8(a) contract to which BDE funds relate,the Participant shall be liable for repayment of the full amount of theBDE to SBA.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 124.403 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Development Assistance Program.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Section 7(j)(1) of the Small Business Act provides forfinancial assistance to public or private organizations to pay all or partof the cost of projects designed to provide technical or management assistanceto individual or enterprises eligible for assistance under sections 7(a)(11),7(j)(10) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act. The AA/MSBandamp;COD is responsiblefor coordinating and formulating policies relating to the disseminationof this assistance to small business concerns eligible for assistance undersections 7(a)(11), 7(j)(10) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act.(b) <T3>Services. </T3>(1) Section 7(j)(1-2) of the Small Business Act empowersthe SBA to provide through public and private organizations the managementand technical assistance enumerated in paragraph (b)(3) of this sectionto those individuals or concerns who meet the eligibility criteria containedin sections 7(a)(1) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act.(2) The SBA shall give preference to projects which promote the ownership,participation in ownership, or management of small businesses owned bylow-income individuals and small businesses eligible to participate inthe section 8(a) program.(3) This assistance may include any or all of the following:(i) Planning and research, including feasibility studies and market research;(ii) The identification and development of new business opportunities;(iii) The furnishing of centralized services with regard to public servicesand Federal Government programs including programs authorized under sections7(a)(11), 7(j)(10) and 8(a) of the Small Business Act. (iv) The establishment and strengthening of business service agencies,including trade associations and cooperatives;(v) The furnishing of business counseling, management training, with specialemphasis on the development of management training programs using the resourcesof the business community, including the development of management trainingopportunities in existing business, and with emphasis in all cases uponproviding management training of sufficient scope and duration to developentrepreneurial and managerial self-sufficiency on the part of the individualsserved.(4) Sections 7(j)(3) and 7(j)(9) of the Small Business Act authorize SBAto:(i) Encourage the placement of subcontracts with small business concernslocated in areas of high concentration of unemployed or low-income individuals,with small businesses owned by low-income individuals, and with small businesseseligible to receive contracts pursuant to section 8(a) of the Act. SBAmay provide incentives and assistance to such business that will aid inthe training and upgrading of potential subcontractors or other small businessconcerns eligible for assistance under sections 7(a)(11), 7(j), and 8(a)of the Small Business Act.(ii) Coordinate and cooperate with the heads of other Federal departmentsand agencies, to insure that contracts, subcontracts, and deposits madeby the Federal Government or with programs aided with Federal funds areplaced in such a way as to further the purposes of sections 7(a)(11), 7(j)and 8(a) of the Small Business Act.(c) <T3>Eligibility. </T3>(1) Eligibility for the assistance enumerated underparagraph (b) of this section above shall include, but not limited to:(i) Businesses which qualify as small within the meaning of size standardsprescribed in 13 CFR part 121, and which are located in urban or ruralareas with a high proportion of unemployed or low-income individuals, orwhich are owned by such low-income individuals; and(ii) Businesses eligible to receive contracts pursuant to section 8(a)of the Small Business Act.(d) <T3>Delivery of services.</T3> (1) The financial assistance authorizedfor projects under paragraph (b) of this section includes assistance advancedby grant, cooperative agreement, or contract.(2) To the extent feasible, services available under paragraph (b) of thissection shall be provided in a location which is easily accessible to theindividuals and small business concerns served.(e) <T3>Coordination and cooperation with other government agencies.</T3> (1)The AA/MSBandamp;COD may utilize the resources of other agencies and departmentswhenever practicable which can directly or indirectly support or augmentthe purposes of sections 7(a)(11), 7(j) and 8(a) of the Small BusinessAct.(2) The AA/MSBandamp;COD shall enter into agreements with Federal agenciesand departments to further the objectives of sections 7(a)(11), 7(j) and8(a) of the Small Business Act.(3) The AA/MSBandamp;COD shall encourage the placement of deposits made bythe Federal Government, or by programs aided with Federal Funds, in sucha way as to further the purposes of section 7(a)(11), 7(j) and 8(a) ofthe Small Business Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;124.404</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Small Business and Capital Ownership Development Program.</ITAG>Section 7(j)(10) of the Small Business Act establishes a Small Businessand Capital Ownership Development program which shall provide additionalassistance exclusively for small business concerns eligible to receivecontracts pursuant to section 8(a) of Small Business Act. The managementof the Capital Ownership Development program is vested in the AA/MSBandamp;CODwho is responsible for the oversight of the program and activities setforth in this part of these regulations. The development assistance describedbelow shall be provided exclusively to those small business concerns eligibleto receive contracts pursuant to section 8(a) of the Small Business Act.Such small business concerns shall be participants in the Small BusinessCapital Ownership Development program. This program shall:(a) Assist small business concerns participating in the program to developcomprehensive business plans with specific business targets, objectives,and goals;(b) Provide for such other nonfinancial services as deemed necessary forthe establishment, preservation, and growth of small business concernsparticipating in the program, including but not limted to:(1) Loan packaging,(2) Financial counseling,(3) Accounting and Bookkeeping assistance,(4) Marketing assistance, and(5) Management assistance.(c) Assist small business concerns participating in the program to obtainequity and debt financing;(d) Establish regular performance monitoring and reporting systems forsmall business concerns participating in the program to assure compliancewith their business plans;(e) Analyze and report the causes of success and failure of small businessconcerns participating in the program; and(f) Provide assistance necessary to help small business concerns participatingin the program to procure surety bonds. Such assistance shall include,but not be limited to:(1) The preparation of surety bond participating forms;(2) Special management and technical assistance designed to meet the specificneeds of small business concerns participating in the program and whichhave received or are applying to receive a surety bond, and(3) Preparation of all forms necessary to receive a surety bond guaranteefrom the SBA pursuant to Title IV, part B of the Small Business InvestmentAct of 1958.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;124.501</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Miscellaneous reporting requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Capability statements.</T3> Each 8(a) concern shall annually prepareand submit to the SBA a capability statement. Such statement shall brieflydescribe the concern's various contract performance capabilities and shallcontain the name and telephone number of the BOS assigned to the concern.SBA will submit the capability statements to appropriate procuring agenciesfor the purpose of matching requirements with 8(a) concerns.(b) <T3>Participant reports on parties assisting it and fees.</T3> (1) Each8(a) Program Participant shall submit semi-annually a written report toits assigned BOS to include the following information:(i) A listing of any agents, representatives, attorneys, accountants, consultantsand other parties (other than employees) receiving fees, commissions, orcompensation of any kind to assist such participant in obtaining a Federalcontract;(ii) The amount of compensation received by any person listed under paragraph(b)(1)(i) of this section during the relevant reporting period along witha description of the activities performed for such compensation.(2) The BOS will review the report and forward it to the AA/MSBandamp;COD.Any report that raises a suspicion of improper activity shall be referredimmediately to the SBA Inspector General.(3) The failure to submit a report pursuant to the requirements of thissection shall be considered good cause for the initiation of a terminationproceeding pursuant to andSection;124.209.(c) <T3>Reporting requirements after exiting the 8(a) program.</T3> Former8(a) Program Participants shall provide such information as SBA may requestconcerning such former Participant's continued business operations, contractportfolio and financial condition for a period of three years followingthe date on which the concern exits the program. Failure to provide suchinformation when requested may result in the nonexercise of options oncontracts awarded through the 8(a) program.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: August 14, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Susan S. Engeleiter,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-19500 Filed 8-16-89; 1:26 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 8025-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>